Ace Steel
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2005, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: Spinal Shock, Steel Spike, Missouri Cloverleaf.
Brief description: A key figure in the early years of ROH, Ace Steel was part of the promotion’s formative years, often competing in tag team matches alongside his partner CM Punk as part of the Second City Saints faction. His sporadic appearances included high-intensity matches and contributing to storylines that established the identity of the promotion.

ACH
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2012-2016, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional title contender.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Midnight Star, Buster Call, Dragonfly Cutter.
Brief description: ACH gained recognition for his explosive athleticism and charismatic presence, becoming a fan favorite in ROH. Known for matches that showcased his agility, ACH participated in tournaments such as the Top Prospect Tournament and had notable bouts with top stars. He was a standout in ROH’s television division, delivering exciting matches that left a lasting impression.

Action Andretti
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2023-present, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Rising mid-card talent.
Wrestling style: High-flying and fast-paced.
Signature moves: Running Shooting Star Press, Springboard Tornado DDT, Falcon Arrow.
Brief description: A young talent, Andretti brought his dynamic and energetic style to ROH in its post-2023 relaunch under the AEW umbrella. While his appearances have been limited, he has shown potential in matches against established names, earning recognition for his agility and determination.

Adam Cole
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2010-2017, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and world champion.
Wrestling style: Technical, charismatic, and opportunistic.
Signature moves: Last Shot (Kneecap Brainbuster), Panama Sunrise, Florida Key (Straight Jacket Suplex).
Brief description: Adam Cole was a cornerstone of ROH, becoming a three-time ROH World Champion, the first wrestler to achieve this feat. A key member of factions like The Kingdom and later Bullet Club, he excelled in high-profile matches and storylines, cementing his place as one of the top stars in ROH history. Cole’s blend of charisma and in-ring skill made him a fan favorite and a compelling villain when needed.

Adam Page
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2011-2018, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and versatile with high-impact moves.
Signature moves: Buckshot Lariat, Rite of Passage, Standing Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: Adam Page evolved from a promising mid-card talent to a major player during his time in ROH. As a member of The Decade and later Bullet Club, Page showcased his growth as both a singles competitor and a tag team wrestler. His hard-hitting style and character progression resonated with fans, making him a standout performer during his tenure.

Adam Pearce
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2008, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card and authority figure.
Wrestling style: Traditional and methodical with a focus on storytelling.
Signature moves: Jumping Piledriver, Figure-Four Leglock, Slingshot Suplex.
Brief description: Adam Pearce was a key figure in ROH during his tenure, blending his in-ring abilities with his role as a booker. Known for his old-school style and mic skills, Pearce played both a competitor and a significant backstage influence, shaping several storylines and events. He was instrumental in bridging ROH’s style with a more traditional wrestling approach.

Addiction (Christopher Daniels and Frankie Kazarian)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2018, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and world champions.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Celebrity Rehab (Tombstone Lift into a Lungblower), Best Moonsault Ever (Daniels), Wave of the Future (Kazarian).
Brief description: The Addiction was one of the premier tag teams in ROH during their tenure. As multi-time ROH World Tag Team Champions, Daniels and Kazarian combined experience, charisma, and in-ring innovation to dominate the tag team division. They played a key role in high-profile feuds and matches, becoming fan favorites for their chemistry and storytelling ability.

Adrenaline RUSH (ACH and Tadarius Thomas)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2013-2014, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and hybrid technical.
Signature moves: Frog Splash (ACH), Capoeira Strikes (Thomas), Tandem Dropkick into German Suplex.
Brief description: Adrenaline RUSH was a dynamic tag team that combined ACH’s explosive athleticism with Tadarius Thomas’ unorthodox capoeira-inspired offense. They competed against some of ROH’s top tag teams, showcasing their innovative styles, though they never captured tag team gold.

Age of the Fall (Jimmy Jacobs, Tyler Black, Necro Butcher, Lacey, others)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007-2009, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction, upper card.
Wrestling style: Brawling, technical, and psychological.
Signature moves: Contra Code (Jacobs), God’s Last Gift (Black), Chair-assisted Senton (Necro Butcher).
Brief description: One of the most infamous factions in ROH history, Age of the Fall was led by Jimmy Jacobs and included Tyler Black (later known as Seth Rollins) and other members. Known for their dark and anarchistic promos, they were involved in high-profile feuds, including battles for the ROH World Tag Team Championships. Their debut remains one of the most controversial moments in ROH history.

AJ Styles
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2006, sporadic appearances; 2014-2016, guest appearances.
Position on the card: Main event.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Styles Clash, Spiral Tap, Phenomenal Forearm.
Brief description: AJ Styles was one of the early pillars of ROH, helping to establish the company’s reputation for high-caliber wrestling. A former ROH Pure Champion, he returned in the mid-2010s during the ROH/New Japan Pro-Wrestling (NJPW) partnership as part of Bullet Club, participating in headline matches and showcasing his evolution into a global superstar.

Alberto El Patron
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015, guest appearances.
Position on the card: Main event.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Cross Armbreaker, Superkick, Backstabber.
Brief description: Known internationally, Alberto El Patron made a brief but impactful run in ROH during 2015. Competing in high-profile matches, including a memorable bout against Jay Lethal, he brought star power and technical prowess to the promotion. His appearances added prestige to ROH’s partnership with global wrestling audiences.

Alex Payne
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2009, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Enhancement talent and lower card.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Snap Suplex, Cross Armbar, Rolling Neck Snap.
Brief description: Alex Payne, also known as "Sugarfoot," served primarily as enhancement talent in ROH. While often positioned to elevate other stars, he gained experience in tag and singles competition. Payne’s dedication to improving his craft earned him respect among peers and fans.

Alex Shelley
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2010, sporadic appearances; 2015-2016, guest appearances; 2022-present, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event; tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying with innovative offense.
Signature moves: Shellshock, Border City Stretch, Sliced Bread #2.
Brief description: Alex Shelley’s technical prowess and charisma made him a standout performer in ROH. Early in his career, he participated in factions like Generation Next, helping shape ROH’s style during its formative years. His partnership with Chris Sabin as The Motor City Machine Guns earned acclaim in ROH’s tag division, and his return in later years continued to showcase his skills in both singles and tag competition.

Alex Zayne
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2020-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and high-risk.
Signature moves: Crunchwrap Supreme (450 Splash into a Knee Drop), Taco Driver (Reverse Michinoku Driver), Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: Alex Zayne quickly gained attention for his innovative, high-risk style during his ROH tenure. Competing in standout matches in 2020 and 2021, Zayne’s creativity in the ring and crowd-pleasing maneuvers made him a rising star in the promotion.

Alexis Laree (later known as Mickie James)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division and valet.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Mickie-DT, Hurricanrana, Spinning Heel Kick.
Brief description: Alexis Laree made early career appearances in ROH, showcasing her athleticism in singles matches and serving as a valet for The Amazing Red. Though her time in the promotion was brief, she demonstrated potential that would later propel her to greater fame in the wrestling world.

All-Night Express (Kenny King and Rhett Titus)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2009-2012, regular appearances; 2015-2017, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division; occasional main eventers.
Wrestling style: Power and technical with charismatic teamwork.
Signature moves: One Night Stand (Powerbomb/Blockbuster Combo), Coronation (Neckbreaker/Powerbomb Combo), Double-Team Dropkick.
Brief description: The All-Night Express was a popular tag team in ROH known for their dynamic chemistry and cocky charisma. They were embroiled in notable rivalries with teams like The Briscoes and The Young Bucks. Their 2011 ROH World Tag Team Championship win cemented their legacy as a standout team in the promotion.

Allison Danger
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2008, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Manager and occasional competitor.
Wrestling style: Managerial and technical when competing.
Signature moves: DDT, Northern Lights Suplex, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Allison Danger was a founding figure in ROH’s early years, serving as a manager for The Prophecy faction led by Christopher Daniels. Her involvement helped solidify the faction as a dominant force in ROH’s storylines. While primarily a manager, she also stepped into the ring occasionally, showcasing her technical abilities.

Allüre (Angelina Love and Mandy Leon)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and methodical.
Signature moves: Botox Injection (Love), Astral Projection (Leon), Double-Team Suplex.
Brief description: Allüre was formed as a heel faction in ROH’s Women of Honor division. The team brought a mix of charisma and in-ring ability, drawing heat from the audience while competing in singles and tag matches. They were key players in the revitalization of the women’s division during their tenure.


Here are the verified profiles for wrestlers and teams with documented connections to Ring of Honor (ROH):

Amazing Red
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2005, sporadic appearances; 2011, guest appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative.
Signature moves: Code Red, Infrared, Red Eye (450 Splash).
Brief description: Amazing Red was a pioneer in high-flying wrestling, bringing his innovative style to ROH during its early years. He competed in memorable singles and tag matches, often teaming with AJ Styles. Despite his sporadic appearances, Red’s matches helped set the tone for the high-octane style that became synonymous with ROH.

American Dragon (later known as Bryan Danielson)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2009, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event; ROH World Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Cattle Mutilation, Regal-Plex, Triangle Choke.
Brief description: As one of ROH’s founding stars, Bryan Danielson played a pivotal role in establishing the promotion’s identity. A dominant ROH World Champion from 2005-2006, he was known for his incredible technical skills and storytelling ability. Danielson had classic matches with Nigel McGuinness, Samoa Joe, and others, cementing his status as one of the greatest in ROH history.

American Wolves (Davey Richards and Eddie Edwards)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2008-2013, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and main event.
Wrestling style: Technical and hard-hitting.
Signature moves: Force of Nature (Powerbomb/Lungblower Combo), Alarm Clock (Enzuigiri/German Suplex Combo), Double Stomp/Ankle Lock Combo.
Brief description: The American Wolves were one of the most dominant and celebrated tag teams in ROH history. As multi-time ROH World Tag Team Champions, Richards and Edwards delivered a series of high-caliber matches against teams like The Briscoes and The Young Bucks. Their technical prowess and chemistry made them fan favorites and a cornerstone of the tag team division.

Amy Rose
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Manager and occasional competitor.
Wrestling style: Managerial with occasional high-flying moves.
Signature moves: Tornado DDT, Diving Crossbody, Standing Hurricanrana.
Brief description: Amy Rose served as a manager for La Facción Ingobernable, one of the most prominent factions in ROH during her tenure. Known for her charisma and occasional in-ring appearances, she was integral to the group’s storylines, often influencing match outcomes through her ringside antics.

Andrew Everett
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2016, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, 630 Splash, Moonsault Fallaway Slam.
Brief description: Andrew Everett brought his high-flying style to ROH, competing in standout matches that showcased his agility and creativity. While his appearances were sporadic, he was involved in the tag team division and participated in thrilling multi-man matches that highlighted his aerial abilities.

Andy Ridge
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2009-2011, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Enhancement talent and lower card.
Wrestling style: Striker and technical.
Signature moves: Superkick, Rolling Elbow, Bridging Suplex.
Brief description: Andy Ridge, also known as "Right Leg Ridge," was a product of the ROH wrestling school. He frequently competed in the promotion's lower card, earning a reputation as a striker with an impressive superkick. Ridge was part of the Top Prospect Tournament and gained valuable experience facing more seasoned competitors.


Here are the verified profiles for wrestlers with documented connections to Ring of Honor (ROH):

Angelina Love
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division; main event.
Wrestling style: Technical and methodical.
Signature moves: Botox Injection, Lights Out, Break-A-Bitch.
Brief description: Angelina Love made a significant impact in ROH’s Women of Honor division as a member of Allüre alongside Mandy Leon. A former Women of Honor World Champion, Love's veteran presence and heel tactics brought attention to the division. Her charisma and in-ring prowess made her one of the top names in ROH's women’s roster during her tenure.

Anthony Greene
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2021-2022, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and charismatic.
Signature moves: So Much Prettier (Modified Unprettier), Springboard Cutter, Flying Crossbody.
Brief description: Anthony Greene showcased his charisma and technical skills during his brief ROH appearances. Competing in matches that highlighted his adaptability and creativity, Greene impressed fans and demonstrated potential for future growth within the promotion.

Anthony Henry
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017, sporadic appearances; 2021-2022, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and hard-hitting.
Signature moves: Kudo Driver, Dragon Sleeper, Diving Double Stomp.
Brief description: Anthony Henry first appeared in ROH as part of its 2017 events before returning in 2021. Known for his technical mastery and striking ability, Henry competed both as a singles competitor and in the tag team division, often teaming with JD Drake as The WorkHorsemen. His physical matches earned him respect from fans and peers alike.

April Hunter
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division and manager.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and managerial.
Signature moves: Northern Lights Suplex, Running Powerslam, Spear.
Brief description: April Hunter was an early presence in ROH, appearing both as a wrestler in the women's division and as a manager for tag teams like The Carnage Crew. Her charisma and strength brought diversity to the ROH roster during its formative years, and she was notable for breaking barriers as one of the promotion’s first prominent female competitors.

AR Fox
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2023-present, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and high-flying standout.
Wrestling style: High-flying and hybrid technical.
Signature moves: Lo Mein Pain (Springboard Spanish Fly), 450 Splash, Brainbuster.
Brief description: AR Fox became a regular in ROH during its relaunch under the AEW umbrella in 2023. Known for his innovative and high-risk style, Fox has been a crowd-pleaser, delivering thrilling performances against a variety of opponents. His agility and creativity have established him as a valuable addition to the modern ROH roster.

Arik Cannon
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004-2005, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and occasional tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Hybrid technical and striking.
Signature moves: Glimmering Warlock (Shining Wizard), Total Anarchy (Swinging Neckbreaker), Brainbuster.
Brief description: Arik Cannon made sporadic appearances in ROH during the mid-2000s. Known for his unorthodox style and striking offense, Cannon participated in several undercard matches and tag team competitions, contributing to the promotion’s diverse in-ring offerings.

Ariya Daivari
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2023-present, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and methodical.
Signature moves: Magic Carpet Ride (Frog Splash with a carpet), Hammerlock Lariat, Persian Lion Splash.
Brief description: Ariya Daivari became part of the revamped ROH roster under AEW’s management in 2023. Known for his tactical in-ring approach and heel persona, Daivari has competed in singles and faction-based matches, solidifying his role as a reliable mid-card performer.

Ashley Vox
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2021, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Reel Catch (Diving DDT), Seaweed Stretch (Modified Octopus Hold), Running Dropkick.
Brief description: Ashley Vox made a brief appearance in ROH as part of its Women’s Division reboot. Known for her energy and unique sea-inspired gimmick, she competed in a handful of matches that showcased her versatility and in-ring creativity.

Athena
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2022-present, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division; main event.
Wrestling style: Power and technical with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: O-Face (Top Rope Stunner), Diving Double Knee Strike, Bridging Suplex.
Brief description: Since joining ROH under the AEW banner, Athena has become a dominant figure in the Women’s Division, capturing the ROH Women’s World Championship. Her aggressive style and compelling matches have established her as a cornerstone of the promotion’s women’s roster.


Here are the verified profiles for wrestlers and teams with documented connections to Ring of Honor (ROH):

Aussie Open (Kyle Fletcher and Mark Davis)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2023-present, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division; occasional main event.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical with power-based offense.
Signature moves: Coriolis (Double-Arm Helicopter Slam), Aussie Arrow (Fletcher’s Assisted Cutter), Davis’ Spinning Sit-Out Powerbomb.
Brief description: Aussie Open became a key part of ROH’s tag team division under the AEW umbrella. Known for their innovative double-team maneuvers and dominant presence, Fletcher and Davis have competed against top-tier opponents, cementing their reputation as one of the most exciting tag teams in modern wrestling.

Austin Aries
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004-2007, regular appearances; 2009-2010, regular appearances; 2015, guest appearances.
Position on the card: Main event; ROH World Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, Last Chancery (Bridging Arm Triangle Choke), Heat-Seeking Missile (Suicide Dive).
Brief description: Austin Aries is one of ROH’s most celebrated performers, becoming the first two-time ROH World Champion. Known for his technical mastery and charisma, Aries delivered classic matches against top names like Samoa Joe and Bryan Danielson. His versatility and in-ring psychology helped elevate ROH during its early years and beyond.

Ayumi Kurihara
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2011, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical with strong joshi influence.
Signature moves: Uranage, Diving Double Knee Drop, Bridging German Suplex.
Brief description: Ayumi Kurihara brought her acclaimed joshi style to ROH as part of the Women of Honor division. She participated in a series of high-profile matches during her brief stint, showcasing her stiff strikes and technical prowess in memorable bouts against other top women’s wrestlers.

Azrieal
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004-2006, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Senton Bomb, Moonsault, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Azrieal competed in ROH’s tag team and singles divisions, often delivering high-energy matches. He was part of the Special K faction, known for their flashy, fast-paced style, and participated in key moments in ROH’s early tag team scene.

Backseat Boyz (Trent Acid and Johnny Kashmere)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and brawling.
Signature moves: Dream Sequence (Drop Toe Hold into Running Dropkick), T-Gimmick (Double Piledriver), Acid Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb).
Brief description: The Backseat Boyz were a charismatic and innovative tag team that brought excitement to ROH’s early years. They competed in several memorable matches, including a prominent feud with The Briscoes, and were well-regarded for their combination of charisma and in-ring chemistry.

Bandido
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2022, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event; ROH World Champion.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre.
Signature moves: 21 Plex (Bridging German Suplex from a Rope-Rebound), Fosbury Flop, Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: Bandido became one of ROH’s most electrifying stars, capturing the ROH World Championship in 2021. Known for his incredible agility and lucha-inspired offense, Bandido had standout matches against top-tier opponents like Jonathan Gresham and Rush. His high-energy performances and fan connection made him a standout in ROH’s later years.

Bateman
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Methodical and striking-based.
Signature moves: This Is A Kill (Reverse STO), Discus Elbow, Piledriver.
Brief description: Bateman became a key member of ROH during his tenure as part of Vincent’s The Righteous faction. Known for his unsettling persona and hard-hitting offense, he competed in both singles and faction-based matches, adding depth to ROH’s character-driven storytelling.

Becky Bayless
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2006, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Valet and occasional competitor.
Wrestling style: Managerial with occasional in-ring work.
Signature moves: Headscissors Takedown, Snapmare, Hair-pull Slam.
Brief description: Becky Bayless appeared in ROH primarily as a valet and personality, often associated with Special K. Her bubbly and chaotic persona fit well with the faction’s aesthetic, and she occasionally stepped into the ring, adding to the entertainment value of their segments.

Beer City Bruiser
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Brawling and powerhouse.
Signature moves: Beer City Slam (Spinning Side Slam), Top Rope Splash, Running Cannonball.
Brief description: Beer City Bruiser became a popular mid-card act in ROH, known for his beer-drinking brawler persona and hard-hitting matches. Often teaming with Brian Milonas as "The Bouncers," he participated in several notable tag matches and was a consistent presence in ROH’s tag division.

Beretta
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2016, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Dudebuster DDT, Gobstopper Knee (Running Knee Strike), Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Beretta competed in ROH as part of Roppongi Vice alongside Rocky Romero. The team participated in ROH’s tag team division while simultaneously competing in New Japan Pro-Wrestling. Known for their entertaining style and hard-hitting matches, they became fan favorites during their tenure.

Best Friends (Chuck Taylor and Beretta)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017-2019, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and comedic with strong teamwork.
Signature moves: Strong Zero (Double Team Dudebuster), Sole Food/Half-and-Half Suplex Combo, Hugging Spot into Tandem Attack.
Brief description: Best Friends brought their mix of humor and technical prowess to ROH, engaging in exciting matches in the tag division. Their unique blend of comedy and skill made them crowd favorites and helped them stand out in the competitive tag scene.

Bishop Kaun
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019-2021, regular appearances; 2023-present, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with technical elements.
Signature moves: Powerbomb, Spinebuster, Pop-Up Cutter.
Brief description: Bishop Kaun was part of Shane Taylor Promotions, a dominant faction in ROH’s tag team division. As a member of the group, Kaun helped secure the ROH World Six-Man Tag Team Championships. His imposing presence and strength made him a standout performer in the faction and a valuable contributor to the promotion.

Bison Smith
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2008-2010, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Bisontennial (Spinning Sit-Out Powerbomb), Iron Claw Slam, Running Shoulder Block.
Brief description: Bison Smith made an impact in ROH as an enforcer-type wrestler, aligning with Prince Nana’s Embassy faction. Known for his physical dominance and intense brawling style, Smith competed against top stars in both singles and tag matches, making a lasting impression during his time in the promotion.

BJ Whitmer
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2008, regular appearances; 2012-2018, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and hard-hitting.
Signature moves: Exploder Suplex, Wrist-Clutch Exploder, Frog Splash.
Brief description: BJ Whitmer was a cornerstone of ROH’s roster, known for his gritty matches and resilience. A multi-time ROH World Tag Team Champion, Whitmer was involved in major feuds and factions, including The Prophecy and later feuds with Jimmy Jacobs. His loyalty to ROH and willingness to endure extreme matches earned him respect from fans and peers alike.

Blake Christian
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2022-present, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and fast-paced.
Signature moves: 450 Splash, Standing Spanish Fly, Golden Trident (Running Knees to Opponent on the Ropes).
Brief description: Blake Christian became part of the ROH roster during its AEW-managed relaunch. Known for his explosive and high-risk offense, Christian has delivered standout performances in singles competition, showcasing his athleticism and versatility against a variety of opponents.

Blood Generation (CIMA, Naruki Doi, Masato Yoshino)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006, guest appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; tag team division and special attractions.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with lucha libre influence.
Signature moves: Schwein (CIMA), Doi 555 (Naruki Doi), Sol Naciente (Masato Yoshino).
Brief description: Blood Generation brought their dynamic and innovative style to ROH during the promotion’s collaboration with Dragon Gate. They participated in acclaimed multi-man and tag team matches, including the legendary bout against Do FIXER at "Supercard of Honor," which is often regarded as one of the best matches in ROH history.

Bob Evans
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2010-2016, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Enhancement talent and mentor.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical.
Signature moves: Backbreaker, Sleeper Hold, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Bob "Brutal" Evans served as both an in-ring competitor and a mentor during his time in ROH. Often appearing in lower-card matches, Evans also worked as a trainer, helping younger talent develop their skills. His role behind the scenes contributed to the development of several rising stars in ROH.

Bobby Dempsey
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2010, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Comedy act and lower card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Running Senton, Splash, Shoulder Tackle.
Brief description: Bobby Dempsey was a fan-favorite in ROH, initially introduced as part of Sweet & Sour Inc., where he played an underdog babyface. His comedic persona and eventual defiance of his abusive stablemates won over the crowd, leading to memorable moments during his tenure.

Bobby Fish
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2013-2017, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: Fish Hook Deluxe Edition (Kneebar), Exploder Suplex, Roundhouse Kick.
Brief description: Bobby Fish was a key player in ROH, excelling both as a singles competitor and as part of the renowned tag team reDRagon with Kyle O'Reilly. The duo captured the ROH World Tag Team Championships multiple times and delivered standout matches against top-tier teams. Fish also competed for the ROH World Television Championship, solidifying his legacy in the promotion.

The Bouncers (Beer City Bruiser and Brian Milonas)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Closing Time (Double Team DDT), Beer City Slam (Bruiser’s Spinning Slam), Sit-Out Splash (Milonas).
Brief description: The Bouncers were a popular tag team in ROH, combining comedic elements with hard-hitting, beer-fueled brawling. Their chemistry and larger-than-life personas made them a fan-favorite act in the tag team division, where they engaged in rivalries with The Briscoes, Silas Young, and other top teams.

The Boys (Brandon and Brent Tate)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Valets and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Tandem Superkick, Plancha Dive.
Brief description: Known as Dalton Castle’s flamboyant valets, The Boys were integral to Castle’s presentation as a larger-than-life performer. Eventually transitioning into a tag team, The Boys competed in the tag division and participated in several notable matches. Their mix of humor and in-ring ability complemented Castle’s dynamic character.

Brandon Tate
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Valet and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Tandem Superkick, Plancha Dive.
Brief description: As one-half of The Boys alongside his twin brother Brent Tate, Brandon Tate served as a valet for Dalton Castle before transitioning into tag team competition. The duo brought a blend of humor and athleticism to ROH, contributing to memorable matches in the tag division.

Brandon Tate
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Valet and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Tandem Superkick, Plancha Dive.
Brief description: As one-half of The Boys alongside his twin brother Brent Tate, Brandon Tate played a key role in Dalton Castle’s presentation. Transitioning into tag team competition, the duo showcased their athleticism in the tag division, becoming fan favorites.

Bravado Brothers (Harlem and Lancelot Bravado)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2010-2015, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and teamwork-focused.
Signature moves: Gentleman’s Agreement (Double Team Suplex), Gentleman’s Dropkick (Tandem Corner Dropkick), Enzuigiri/Back Suplex Combo.
Brief description: The Bravado Brothers were a charismatic tag team that competed in ROH’s tag division. Known for their polished teamwork and gentlemanly personas, they delivered consistent performances against some of the top teams in the promotion, showcasing steady improvement throughout their run.

Brawler Milonas
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Sit-Out Splash, Corner Avalanche, Running Senton.
Brief description: Brawler Milonas teamed with Beer City Bruiser as part of The Bouncers, a fan-favorite tag team in ROH’s tag division. His imposing size and brawling style complemented Bruiser’s beer-drinking antics, making them an entertaining act in the division.

Brent Albright
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2009, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional main event.
Wrestling style: Power and technical.
Signature moves: Half Nelson Suplex, Crowbar (Fujiwara Armbar), Alabama Slam.
Brief description: Brent Albright was a versatile competitor in ROH, known for his strength and technical prowess. He was heavily involved in faction wars, including feuds with The Embassy and Sweet & Sour Inc. Albright’s intensity and submission skills made him a consistent threat in both singles and multi-man matches.

Brent Tate
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Valet and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Tandem Superkick, Plancha Dive.
Brief description: As one-half of The Boys with his brother Brandon Tate, Brent Tate was instrumental in Dalton Castle’s persona and later transitioned into tag team competition. Their teamwork and athleticism made them a popular act within ROH’s tag team division.

Brian Cage
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2023-present, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and hybrid technical.
Signature moves: Drill Claw, Weapon X, Deadlift Suplex.
Brief description: Brian Cage became a dominant presence in ROH after its relaunch under AEW’s management. As a member of The Embassy, Cage competed in both singles and faction matches, showcasing his strength, agility, and versatility. His powerhouse style has made him a standout in the promotion.

Brian Johnson
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and occasional main event.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: The Process (Swinging Neckbreaker), Johnson City Stretch (Camel Clutch), Diving Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Brian Johnson, known as “The Mecca,” gained notoriety for his fiery promos and antagonistic persona. His technical skill and in-ring psychology allowed him to stand out, leading to competitive matches in both singles and tag competition during his ROH tenure.

Brian Kendrick
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004-2005, sporadic appearances; 2010-2011, guest appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and guest attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Sliced Bread #2, The Kendrick (Bulldog Choke), Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Brian Kendrick made sporadic appearances in ROH, participating in memorable matches that showcased his unique blend of agility and creativity. He often competed in one-off contests or as part of special attraction events, delivering exciting performances for ROH audiences.

Brian Milonas
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Sit-Out Splash, Corner Avalanche, Running Senton.
Brief description: As one-half of The Bouncers with Beer City Bruiser, Brian Milonas brought an entertaining mix of power and humor to ROH’s tag team division. Known for their larger-than-life personas and hard-hitting style, The Bouncers were a fan-favorite team in the promotion.

Briscoe Brothers (Jay and Mark Briscoe)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2023, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and main event.
Wrestling style: Brawling, technical, and high-flying.
Signature moves: Doomsday Device (Tag Finisher), Jay Driller (Jay), Froggy Bow (Mark).
Brief description: The Briscoe Brothers are synonymous with ROH, serving as the heart and soul of the promotion for over two decades. As 13-time ROH World Tag Team Champions, they delivered classic matches against teams like The Young Bucks, FTR, and The American Wolves. Their blend of in-ring innovation, charisma, and grit made them one of the most iconic teams in professional wrestling history.


Here are the verified profiles for wrestlers and teams with documented connections to Ring of Honor (ROH):

Brody King
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and striking-based.
Signature moves: Gonzo Bomb, Lariat, Death Valley Driver.
Brief description: Brody King was a dominant force in ROH, becoming a key member of Villain Enterprises alongside Marty Scurll, PCO, and Flip Gordon. King held the ROH World Six-Man Tag Team Championships and competed in high-profile singles matches, showcasing his blend of power and agility.

Broken Hardys (Matt and Jeff Hardy)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017, guest appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and special attractions.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative.
Signature moves: Twist of Fate (Matt), Swanton Bomb (Jeff), Poetry in Motion (Tag Finisher).
Brief description: The Broken Hardys had a brief but impactful run in ROH during their “Broken” gimmick era. They captured the ROH World Tag Team Championships and had a notable feud with The Young Bucks, culminating in a high-profile Ladder Match at Supercard of Honor XI.

Brutal Burgers (Bob Evans and Cheeseburger)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2016, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and comedy act.
Wrestling style: Technical and comedic.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Cheeseburger’s Palm Strike, Evans’ Spinebuster.
Brief description: Brutal Burgers combined the comedic underdog charm of Cheeseburger with the veteran presence of Bob Evans. The team brought humor and heart to ROH’s tag division, delivering entertaining matches despite often being positioned as underdogs.

Bryan Danielson
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2009, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event; ROH World Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Cattle Mutilation, Regal-Plex, Triangle Choke.
Brief description: Bryan Danielson, known as the “American Dragon,” was one of the founding figures of ROH. As ROH World Champion from 2005 to 2006, he established himself as one of the best technical wrestlers in the world. Danielson had classic matches against stars like Nigel McGuinness, Samoa Joe, and KENTA, cementing his legacy as an ROH icon.

Bull James
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2022-present, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Bull Hammer (Running Clothesline), Samoan Drop, Diving Splash.
Brief description: Bull James joined ROH during its relaunch under AEW management. Known for his size and strength, James has competed in singles matches that highlight his hard-hitting style and crowd connection.

BULLET CLUB
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2019, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of brawling, high-flying, and technical.
Signature moves: Magic Killer (Tag Finisher, Gallows & Anderson), One-Winged Angel (Kenny Omega), Superkicks (Young Bucks).
Brief description: BULLET CLUB became a dominant force in ROH during its partnership with New Japan Pro-Wrestling. Featuring members like The Young Bucks, Cody Rhodes, Adam Cole, and Kenny Omega, the faction headlined major events, captured the ROH World Championship and World Tag Team Championships, and brought international recognition to ROH through their popularity and iconic merchandise.

Bully Ray
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017-2020, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Brawling and power-based.
Signature moves: Bully Bomb (Full Nelson Sit-Out Powerbomb), Bubba Cutter, Diving Headbutt.
Brief description: Bully Ray joined ROH in a veteran role, bringing his experience and star power to the promotion. Competing as a singles competitor and in tag matches, he feuded with top stars and helped elevate younger talent. His hard-hitting style and fiery promos made him a key figure during his ROH tenure, where he also competed in high-profile hardcore matches.

C&C Wrestle Factory (Caprice Coleman and Cedric Alexander)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2011-2014, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Overtime (Vertical Suplex into Frog Splash), Dropkick/Backbreaker Combo, Diving Moonsault (Coleman).
Brief description: C&C Wrestle Factory was an exciting and athletic tag team that energized the ROH tag division. Known for their innovative tandem offense, they competed in several standout matches against top teams like The Briscoes and The Young Bucks, earning fan support despite not capturing tag team gold.


Here are the verified profiles for wrestlers, teams, and factions with documented connections to Ring of Honor (ROH):

The Cabinet (Caprice Coleman, Rhett Titus, Kenny King)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2017, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and faction.
Wrestling style: Technical and charismatic with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Dropkick/Leg Sweep Combo, Coronation (Neckbreaker/Powerbomb Combo), Double-Team Suplex.
Brief description: The Cabinet was a satirical faction led by Caprice Coleman, presenting themselves as "wrestling politicians." Their entertaining promos and cohesive tag work made them a unique act in ROH’s mid-card, delivering comedic yet competitive performances.

Caleb Konley
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2015, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: O-Face (Flying Double Knee), Cradle Shock, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Caleb Konley showcased his versatility during his brief ROH tenure, competing in singles and tag matches. Known for his athleticism, Konley participated in multi-man matches and events that highlighted his in-ring capabilities.

Caprice Coleman
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team division, and commentator.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Sky Splitter (Top Rope Leg Drop), Thermal Shock (DDT/Neckbreaker Combo), Backcracker.
Brief description: Caprice Coleman was a mainstay in ROH, excelling as a wrestler and later transitioning to commentary. As a competitor, he formed successful teams, including C&C Wrestle Factory, and was involved in notable storylines. His charisma and versatility also made him a respected voice on the commentary team, providing insights and humor to enhance the product.

Carístico (formerly known as Mistico and Sin Cara in WWE)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016, guest appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre and high-flying.
Signature moves: La Mistica (Tilt-a-Whirl Armbar), Springboard Moonsault, Tornillo.
Brief description: Carístico appeared in ROH as part of the company’s partnership with CMLL. His matches featured his signature lucha libre style and highlighted his star power as a former international sensation, bringing a unique flair to the promotion’s events.

Carnage Crew (Loc, DeVito, Justin Credible, and Masada)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2006, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and hardcore matches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling.
Signature moves: Spiked Piledriver, Death Valley Driver, Chair Shots.
Brief description: The Carnage Crew were ROH’s resident hardcore specialists, engaging in brutal brawls and chaotic tag matches. Known for their grizzled personas and use of weapons, the faction was a staple of ROH’s early years, delivering unforgettable moments in hardcore stipulation bouts.

Cedric Alexander
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2011-2016, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Lumbar Check (Backbreaker), Springboard Clothesline, Brainbuster.
Brief description: Cedric Alexander rose to prominence in ROH as one-half of C&C Wrestle Factory before branching out into singles competition. His athleticism and captivating matches against top-tier opponents made him a fan favorite. Cedric’s run showcased his growth as a performer, setting the stage for greater success in his career.

Chad Collyer
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2005, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Texas Cloverleaf, German Suplex, Dragon Sleeper.
Brief description: Chad Collyer brought his technical expertise to ROH during its early years. Known for his precision and mat-based wrestling style, Collyer participated in singles matches and tournaments that showcased his mastery of submissions and technical holds.

CHAOS (featuring Kazuchika Okada, Will Ospreay, Hirooki Goto, and others)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2019, guest appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of striking, technical, and high-flying.
Signature moves: Rainmaker (Okada), Storm Breaker (Ospreay), GTR (Goto).
Brief description: As part of the NJPW and ROH partnership, CHAOS members frequently appeared in ROH, competing in high-profile singles and tag matches. Stars like Okada and Ospreay brought international acclaim to the promotion, delivering classic performances and elevating ROH's prestige.

Charlie Haas
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2010-2013, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and powerhouse.
Signature moves: Haas of Pain (Inverted Cloverleaf), German Suplex, Olympic Slam.
Brief description: Charlie Haas had a prominent run in ROH, forming a dominant tag team with Shelton Benjamin known as Wrestling’s Greatest Tag Team. Together, they captured the ROH World Tag Team Championships and delivered standout matches against top teams like The Briscoes and The Kings of Wrestling. Haas also competed in singles matches, showcasing his technical ability and intensity.

Chase Owens
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Package Piledriver, Knee Drop, Forearm Smash.
Brief description: As a member of the Bullet Club, Chase Owens made sporadic appearances in ROH during the promotion’s partnership with NJPW. Known for his technical skill and ability to deliver solid performances, Owens participated in faction-based matches and tournaments that highlighted Bullet Club’s dominance.

Cheeseburger
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2013-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team division, and comedic act.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Shotei Palm Strike, Tilt-a-Whirl Headscissors, Superkick.
Brief description: Cheeseburger became a beloved underdog in ROH, winning fans over with his heart and resilience. Often competing in tag teams like Brutal Burgers alongside Bob Evans, Cheeseburger also had memorable singles matches, blending comedic elements with skillful execution in the ring.

Chelsea Green
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and charismatic.
Signature moves: Unprettier, Flying Crossbody, Armbar Takedown.
Brief description: Chelsea Green joined ROH as part of the rebooted Women of Honor division, immediately showcasing her charisma and in-ring talent. Although her time in ROH was brief, she competed in notable matches, contributing to the resurgence of the women’s division.

Chris Dickinson
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2021-2022, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical.
Signature moves: Pazuzu Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Brainbuster, Spinning Roundhouse Kick.
Brief description: Chris Dickinson made a strong impact in ROH’s final years before the hiatus. Known for his stiff strikes and powerhouse style, Dickinson competed in both singles and tag team matches, including aligning with the Violence Unlimited faction, adding a rugged edge to ROH’s roster.

Chris Hero
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2009, regular appearances; 2010-2012, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: Death Blow (Rolling Elbow), Hero’s Welcome (Cravate Cutter), Cyclone Kill (Spinning Boot).
Brief description: Chris Hero was a standout in ROH’s singles and tag team divisions, forming the legendary Kings of Wrestling with Claudio Castagnoli. As multi-time ROH World Tag Team Champions, they delivered some of the most celebrated tag matches in the promotion’s history. Hero also competed in compelling singles matches, showcasing his striking and technical mastery.

Chris Sabin
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2005, sporadic appearances; 2014-2018, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Cradle Shock, Hail Sabin (Diving Tornado DDT), Springboard Clothesline.
Brief description: Chris Sabin made his mark in ROH primarily as one-half of the Motor City Machine Guns alongside Alex Shelley. Together, they became one of the most innovative and exciting tag teams in the promotion’s history, competing against top teams like The Young Bucks and The Briscoes. Sabin also had a strong singles presence, delivering high-quality performances throughout his tenure.

Christian York
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and power-based.
Signature moves: Mood Swing (Neckbreaker), Snap Suplex, Springboard Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Christian York competed in ROH during its early years, appearing in both singles and tag team matches. Known for his athleticism and charisma, York brought a mix of power and agility to his performances, participating in several notable matches that contributed to ROH’s growing reputation.

Christopher Daniels
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2014, sporadic appearances; 2015-2018, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Angel’s Wings (Double Underhook Facebuster), Best Moonsault Ever, Koji Clutch.
Brief description: Christopher Daniels is one of ROH’s most iconic figures, being part of the inaugural event and establishing himself as a mainstay in its history. He was a founding member of The Prophecy and a multi-time ROH World Tag Team Champion. Daniels achieved a career highlight in 2017 by winning the ROH World Championship, solidifying his legacy as a top performer and fan favorite.

Christopher Street Connection (Buff-E and Mace Mendoza)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Comedy act and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Entertainment-focused with technical elements.
Signature moves: Double Dropkick, Diving Elbow Drop, Tandem Suplex.
Brief description: The Christopher Street Connection brought humor and flamboyance to ROH’s early years. Known for their over-the-top antics and crowd interactions, they served as a comedic foil during their time in the promotion, adding variety to the roster.

Chuck Taylor (Chuckie T)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017-2019, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and comedic with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Awful Waffle (Cradle Belly-to-Back Piledriver), Sole Food (Step-Up Enzuigiri), Moonsault.
Brief description: Chuck Taylor became a fan-favorite in ROH, particularly as part of Best Friends with Beretta. Known for his blend of comedic timing and in-ring skill, Taylor delivered memorable matches in the tag team division while engaging fans with his unique personality.

CIMA
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006, guest appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and faction member.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative.
Signature moves: Schwein (Modified Driver), Iconoclasm, Meteora.
Brief description: CIMA brought his high-flying and dynamic style to ROH as part of Blood Generation during the promotion’s partnership with Dragon Gate. His matches, including the iconic clash against Do FIXER at "Supercard of Honor," remain highly acclaimed and contributed to ROH’s reputation for showcasing international talent.

Claudio Castagnoli (later known as Cesaro)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2011, regular appearances; 2022-present, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and powerhouse.
Signature moves: Ricola Bomb, Neutralizer (Gotch-Style Piledriver), Giant Swing.
Brief description: Claudio Castagnoli was a key figure in ROH’s tag team and singles divisions. As one-half of The Kings of Wrestling with Chris Hero, Claudio won multiple ROH World Tag Team Championships, delivering classic matches against top teams. After returning in 2022, Claudio captured the ROH World Championship, solidifying his status as one of the promotion’s premier talents.

Cliff Compton
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2013-2014, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Brawling and charismatic.
Signature moves: Cliffhanger (Swinging Neckbreaker), Diving Crossbody, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Cliff Compton brought his unique charisma and brawling style to ROH during his tenure. A standout moment in his time with the promotion was his involvement in faction warfare with S.C.U.M., where he played a pivotal role in the group’s storyline dominance.

CM Punk
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2005, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Pepsi Plunge (Top Rope Pedigree), Anaconda Vise, GTS (Go to Sleep).
Brief description: CM Punk was one of the most influential figures in ROH’s early years. As a former ROH World Champion and co-holder of the ROH World Tag Team Championship with Colt Cabana, Punk delivered legendary matches against stars like Samoa Joe, culminating in his iconic “Summer of Punk” storyline. His promos and in-ring storytelling remain a hallmark of ROH history.

Coast 2 Coast (Leon St. Giovanni and Shaheem Ali)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2020, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Coast to Coast Dropkick (Assisted Corner Dropkick), Tandem Moonsault, Suplex/Splash Combo.
Brief description: Coast 2 Coast was a dynamic tag team known for their innovative tandem offense and energy. Despite struggling to break into the championship scene, they were crowd favorites and had memorable matches against teams like The Briscoes and The Bouncers.

Cody (Cody Rhodes)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2018, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and ROH World Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and charismatic.
Signature moves: Cross Rhodes, Beautiful Disaster (Springboard Kick), Figure-Four Leglock.
Brief description: Cody joined ROH after leaving WWE, immediately positioning himself as a top star. He captured the ROH World Championship and played a significant role in the promotion’s collaboration with NJPW. Cody’s presence helped elevate ROH’s profile during his tenure, contributing to major events like Final Battle and All In.

Colby Corino
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2015, sporadic appearances; 2019-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Sunset Bomb, Shining Wizard, Rolling Neckbreaker.
Brief description: Colby Corino first appeared in ROH as part of his father Steve Corino’s storylines, later establishing himself as a competitor. He became part of Villain Enterprises in his later tenure, showcasing his potential as a rising star in matches that highlighted his agility and technical skills.

Colt Cabana
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2006, regular appearances; 2009-2011, regular appearances; 2016-2021, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team division, and commentary.
Wrestling style: Technical and comedic.
Signature moves: Colt .45 (Double Underhook Piledriver), Flying Apple (Corner Senton), Billy Goat’s Curse (Reverse Boston Crab).
Brief description: Colt Cabana is one of ROH’s most beloved figures, known for his mix of comedy and technical prowess. As a multi-time ROH World Tag Team Champion with CM Punk, Cabana delivered memorable matches and rivalries, including feuds with The Briscoes and Homicide. He later contributed as a commentator, adding humor and insight to ROH broadcasts.

Colby Corino
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2015, sporadic appearances; 2019-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Sunset Bomb, Shining Wizard, Rolling Neckbreaker.
Brief description: Colby Corino first appeared in ROH as part of his father Steve Corino’s storylines, later establishing himself as a competitor. He became part of Villain Enterprises in his later tenure, showcasing his potential as a rising star in matches that highlighted his agility and technical skills.

Colt Cabana
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2006, regular appearances; 2009-2011, regular appearances; 2016-2021, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team division, and commentary.
Wrestling style: Technical and comedic.
Signature moves: Colt .45 (Double Underhook Piledriver), Flying Apple (Corner Senton), Billy Goat’s Curse (Reverse Boston Crab).
Brief description: Colt Cabana is one of ROH’s most beloved figures, known for his mix of comedy and technical prowess. As a multi-time ROH World Tag Team Champion with CM Punk, Cabana delivered memorable matches and rivalries, including feuds with The Briscoes and Homicide. He later contributed as a commentator, adding humor and insight to ROH broadcasts.

Curry Man (Christopher Daniels under a masked persona)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2007, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Comedy act and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Spicy Drop (Inverted Sit-Out Facebuster), Curry Kick (Superkick), Diving Headbutt.
Brief description: Curry Man was a humorous alter-ego of Christopher Daniels, bringing lighthearted entertainment to ROH. While primarily a comedic act, Curry Man's in-ring skill shone through, delivering fun yet competitive matches that entertained fans during his appearances.

Curt Stallion
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017-2018, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: DDT, Big Boot, Diving Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Curt Stallion made a handful of appearances in ROH, showcasing his gritty style and determination. Although he primarily wrestled in undercard matches, Stallion demonstrated potential and contributed to the diverse roster of the promotion during his tenure.

CW Anderson
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Superkick, Anderson Armbar.
Brief description: CW Anderson brought his old-school, hard-hitting style to ROH during its early years. Competing in both singles and tag matches, he provided a solid presence in the mid-card, known for his methodical offense and tribute to the Anderson wrestling family tradition.

D-Lo Brown
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2009, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Guest attraction and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical.
Signature moves: Lo Down (Frog Splash), Sky High (Sit-Out Spinebuster), Leg Lariat.
Brief description: D-Lo Brown appeared briefly in ROH, bringing his experience and star power to the promotion. Known for his charisma and impactful moves, Brown participated in a few matches that highlighted his veteran presence, adding depth to ROH’s roster during his time.

Da Hit Squad (Mafia and Monsta Mack)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2004, sporadic appearances; 2016-2018, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and hardcore.
Signature moves: Burning Hammer, Superplex/Splash Combo, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Da Hit Squad were an integral part of ROH’s early years, known for their physical brawling and hardcore style. They participated in notable early events, including ROH’s inaugural show, "The Era of Honor Begins." Their return to ROH later added nostalgic value and showcased their influence on the promotion’s history.

Daizee Haze
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004-2011, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division and valet.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Heart Punch, Mind Trip (Snapmare Driver), Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Daizee Haze was a cornerstone of ROH’s Women of Honor division, known for her blend of speed and technical skill. She also served as a manager for factions like The Embassy and was involved in high-profile matches that highlighted her as one of the most prominent women in the promotion during her tenure.

Dak Draper
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2020-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical.
Signature moves: Magnum KO (Spinning Sit-Out Powerbomb), Belly-to-Back Suplex, Running Boot.
Brief description: Dak Draper became a standout in ROH’s Pure division, showcasing his technical and athletic abilities. Competing in the Pure Championship Tournament, Draper demonstrated his potential as a future star, blending his charisma with a traditional wrestling style.

Dalton Castle
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-present, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and flamboyant.
Signature moves: Bang-A-Rang (Spinning Facebuster), Deadlift German Suplex, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Dalton Castle is one of ROH’s most unique and charismatic performers. Known for his extravagant entrance and "The Boys" as his valets, Castle captured the ROH World Championship in 2017. His blend of showmanship and technical wrestling has made him a fan favorite and one of the most recognizable figures in modern ROH history.

Damian Martinez (later known as Damian Priest in WWE)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2018, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card and ROH World Television Champion.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and striking.
Signature moves: South of Heaven (Sit-Out Chokeslam), Spinning Roundhouse Kick, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Competing under the name Damian Martinez, he became a dominant force in ROH, winning the ROH World Television Championship in 2018. Known for his size and agility, Martinez excelled in high-profile matches before transitioning to WWE, leaving a mark as one of ROH’s rising stars.


Here are the verified profiles for wrestlers and teams with documented connections to Ring of Honor (ROH):

Dan Maff
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2005, regular appearances; 2019-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Burning Hammer, Cannonball Senton, Lariat.
Brief description: Dan Maff was an integral part of ROH’s early years as a member of Da Hit Squad, delivering hard-hitting matches. He returned in 2019 as a veteran presence, competing in singles and tag team bouts, including notable matches against top talent. His ability to blend power and agility made him a standout performer during both tenures.

Dangerous Angels (Sara Del Rey and Allison Danger)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2008, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Royal Butterfly (Del Rey), Northern Lights Suplex (Danger), Double Suplex.
Brief description: The Dangerous Angels were a pivotal part of ROH’s Women of Honor division, combining Sara Del Rey’s technical dominance with Allison Danger’s charisma and leadership. Together, they delivered memorable matches and helped elevate women’s wrestling in ROH during their tenure.

Danhausen
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and comedic act.
Wrestling style: Technical with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Goodnight Hausen (GTS), Teeth Spot (Stuffing Teeth in Opponent’s Mouth), Diving Senton.
Brief description: Danhausen quickly became a cult favorite in ROH due to his unique character, blending comedy with credible in-ring ability. His eccentric promos and in-ring antics earned him a devoted fanbase, making him one of the most entertaining and unconventional stars in the promotion.

Daniel Garcia
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2023-present, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and technical division.
Wrestling style: Submission and technical.
Signature moves: Dragon Slayer (Sharpshooter), Piledriver, Rear-Naked Choke.
Brief description: Daniel Garcia joined ROH as part of its AEW-managed relaunch, showcasing his pure wrestling ability. Competing in the Pure Division and high-profile singles matches, Garcia has solidified his reputation as a technician and rising star in the promotion.

Danny Daniels
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and occasional tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Moonsault, Snap Suplex.
Brief description: Danny Daniels competed in ROH during its early years, participating in singles and tag team matches. While primarily positioned on the lower card, he showcased a solid technical style and contributed to the promotion’s diverse roster.

Danny Maff
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2005, regular appearances; 2019-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Burning Hammer, Cannonball Senton, Lariat.
Brief description: As a member of Da Hit Squad, Danny Maff was a crucial part of ROH’s early tag team scene. His return to ROH in 2019 saw him competing as a singles star, delivering hard-hitting matches against the top talent of the promotion. His intensity and power earned him a respected place in ROH’s history.

Darin Waid
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004-2005, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Moonsault, Tornado DDT, Dropkick.
Brief description: Darin Waid competed in ROH during its early years, primarily in tag team matches. While not a major star, he contributed with solid performances in the lower card, providing a platform for more established talent to shine.

Darius Martin
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2023-present, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and athletic.
Signature moves: Nose Dive (Springboard Cutter), Double Springboard Arm Drag, Dropkick.
Brief description: Darius Martin joined ROH as part of the relaunch under AEW’s management. Alongside his brother Dante Martin, he showcased his athleticism in the tag team division, delivering exciting, fast-paced performances against established teams.

Dark City Fight Club (Jon Davis and Kory Chavis)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2009-2010, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Project Mayhem (Spinebuster/Powerbomb Combo), Doomsday Device, Double Backbreaker.
Brief description: The Dark City Fight Club brought a hard-hitting style to ROH’s tag team division. Known for their strength and brutality, they competed in notable matches against teams like The Briscoes and The American Wolves. While they never captured gold, their dominant presence left a lasting impression in the tag scene.

Dark Order (including Evil Uno, Stu Grayson, and others)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2023-present, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling with power-based elements.
Signature moves: Fatality (Double Team Gory Bomb/Blockbuster Combo), Uno’s Flatliner, Grayson’s Nightfall (Spinning Torture Rack Bomb).
Brief description: Dark Order has become a staple of ROH’s tag team division under the AEW banner. Featuring members like Evil Uno and Stu Grayson, the faction delivers compelling matches that combine technical skill, teamwork, and character-driven storytelling.

Davey Andrews
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004-2005, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and student prospect.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Snap Suplex, Boston Crab, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Davey Andrews was a graduate of the ROH Wrestling Academy and competed in early matches showcasing student talent. Though primarily positioned on the lower card, he gained experience wrestling against more seasoned competitors, contributing to the development of ROH’s homegrown talent pipeline.

Davey Richards
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2013, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: DR Driver (Double Underhook Piledriver), Ankle Lock, Alarm Clock (Double-Team Enzuigiri).
Brief description: Davey Richards is one of ROH’s most celebrated performers, excelling as both a singles competitor and as one-half of The American Wolves with Eddie Edwards. A former ROH World Champion and multiple-time ROH World Tag Team Champion, Richards delivered classic matches with top stars like Tyler Black, Roderick Strong, and The Briscoes, solidifying his legacy in ROH history.

David Finlay
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: Prima Nocta (Elevated Cutter), Acid Drop, Diving Uppercut.
Brief description: David Finlay competed in ROH during its partnership with NJPW, participating in faction-based matches with Lifeblood. Known for his technical prowess and lineage as the son of Fit Finlay, David contributed to ROH’s international flavor and showcased his ability to thrive in tag and singles competition.

David Starr
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017-2018, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Han Stansen (Lariat), Product Placement (Arm-Trap Backbreaker), Sharpshooter.
Brief description: David Starr appeared in ROH as an independent standout, showcasing his technical skill and charisma. Known for his ability to deliver intense matches, Starr competed in several mid-card bouts and gained recognition for his character work and in-ring storytelling.

The Dawgs (Rhett Titus and Will Ferrara)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017-2019, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and comedic act.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: Who Let the Dawgs Out? (Double Suplex), Sit-Out Spinebuster, Double Bulldog.
Brief description: The Dawgs brought a mix of comedy and aggression to ROH’s tag team division. Despite often being positioned as underdogs, their chemistry and antics made them a fan-favorite act, providing lighthearted entertainment while delivering solid in-ring performances.

Decade (BJ Whitmer, Roderick Strong, Jimmy Jacobs, Adam Page, and others)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2015, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: Contra Code (Jacobs), Stronghold (Strong’s Elevated Crab), Exploder Suplex (Whitmer).
Brief description: The Decade was formed by ROH veterans to criticize and discipline younger talent, showcasing an “old school vs. new school” dynamic. The faction competed in tag and singles matches, with a focus on mentoring rising stars like Adam Page. Their presence added depth to ROH’s storylines during their tenure.

Delirious
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004-present, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and comedic act; later transitioned to backstage roles.
Wrestling style: Unorthodox and high-flying.
Signature moves: Panic Attack (Corner Running Knee Strike), Shadows Over Hell (Diving Splash), Cobra Stretch.
Brief description: Delirious is a longstanding member of ROH, known for his eccentric character and unpredictable style. He competed in numerous memorable matches and became an important figure behind the scenes as ROH’s head booker, influencing the creative direction of the promotion.

Demonic Flamita
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2020-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre.
Signature moves: 450 Splash, Flam Fly (Tilt-a-Whirl Cutter), Diving Moonsault.
Brief description: As a member of MexaSquad, Flamita initially gained popularity in ROH’s tag division. Transitioning to his “Demonic Flamita” persona, he showcased a darker edge in singles competition, delivering exciting matches against top-tier opponents while adding depth to the roster’s character dynamics.

Deonna Purrazzo
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2018, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Fujiwara Armbar, Russian Leg Sweep, Standing Moonsault.
Brief description: Deonna Purrazzo made a name for herself in ROH’s Women of Honor division, showcasing her technical skills and submission mastery. Though she never captured the Women of Honor Championship, her performances established her as one of the top wrestlers in the division, paving the way for her future success.

Deranged
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2006, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and faction member.
Wrestling style: High-flying and hardcore.
Signature moves: Code Red, Shooting Star Leg Drop, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Deranged was part of the Special K faction, bringing a high-energy and chaotic style to ROH. Known for his acrobatics and unorthodox offense, Deranged contributed to the faction’s flashy, party-centric gimmick, delivering entertaining matches during his tenure.

Derrick Dempsey
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004-2006, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Suplex variations, Crossface, Diving Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Derrick Dempsey, a graduate of the ROH Wrestling Academy, competed in tag and singles matches during his time with the promotion. While primarily positioned in the lower card, he gained valuable experience competing against more seasoned performers.

DeVito
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2006, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and hardcore matches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling.
Signature moves: Spiked Piledriver, Chair-assisted DDT, Corner Splash.
Brief description: DeVito was a member of the Carnage Crew, known for their hard-hitting and chaotic style. He participated in brutal tag team matches and hardcore brawls, contributing to ROH’s early years with memorable performances in stipulation-heavy bouts.


Here are the verified profiles for wrestlers, teams, and factions with documented connections to Ring of Honor (ROH):

Divine Storm (Chris Divine and Quiet Storm)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Storm Cradle Driver (Quiet Storm), Superkick (Chris Divine), Double Suplex.
Brief description: Divine Storm was one of the early tag teams in ROH, known for their high-energy performances and innovative offense. They contributed to the foundation of ROH’s tag division, competing against teams like The SAT and The Briscoes.

Dixie
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and faction member.
Wrestling style: High-flying and unorthodox.
Signature moves: Moonsault, Tornado DDT, Crossbody.
Brief description: Dixie was a member of the Special K faction, contributing to their chaotic and flashy style. Often competing in multi-man matches, Dixie showcased his aerial ability while being a key part of Special K’s party-centric storyline.

Do FIXER (Dragon Kid, Ryo Saito, and Genki Horiguchi)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006, guest appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and special attractions.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre-inspired.
Signature moves: Ultra Hurricanrana (Dragon Kid), SaiRyo Rocket (Saito’s Double Team Move), Beach Break (Horiguchi).
Brief description: Do FIXER was part of the Dragon Gate collaboration with ROH, delivering one of the most celebrated matches in wrestling history at "Supercard of Honor" in 2006 against Blood Generation. Their high-paced and innovative style earned them critical acclaim and left a lasting impression on ROH fans.

Don Juan
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2005, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and charismatic.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, Flying Crossbody, Neckbreaker.
Brief description: Don Juan was a part of The Texas Wrestling Academy contingent in ROH’s early years. Known for his charisma and flashy style, he competed in singles and tag matches, often representing the academy alongside other graduates.

Donovan Dijak (later known as Dominik Dijakovic)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2017, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical.
Signature moves: Feast Your Eyes (Fireman’s Carry Knee Strike), Chokebreaker, Moonsault.
Brief description: Donovan Dijak was a standout in ROH, known for his agility despite his size. As a member of Truth Martini’s House of Truth faction, he delivered impressive matches against top stars, including his breakout victory in the 2015 Top Prospect Tournament. Dijak’s presence and performances made him a rising star during his ROH tenure.

Donovan Morgan
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Sayonara (Double Underhook Suplex into Slam), Cross Armbar, Northern Lights Suplex.
Brief description: Donovan Morgan was one of ROH’s early stars, bringing his technical expertise to the promotion. As a member of The Prophecy alongside Christopher Daniels, he competed in notable singles and tag matches, helping to establish the faction’s dominance during ROH’s formative years.

Doug Williams
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Chaos Theory (Rolling German Suplex), Guillotine Choke, High-Angle Belly-to-Belly Suplex.
Brief description: Doug Williams brought his European technical wrestling style to ROH, competing in several high-profile matches. His methodical and innovative offense made him a standout performer in the early days of the promotion, particularly in the Pure Division.

Dragon Kid
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006, guest appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre-inspired.
Signature moves: Dragonrana (Top Rope Hurricanrana), Ultra Hurricanrana, Christo (Tilt-a-Whirl Submission).
Brief description: Dragon Kid was part of the Dragon Gate collaboration with ROH, appearing as a member of Do FIXER in the legendary match against Blood Generation at "Supercard of Honor" in 2006. His incredible aerial maneuvers and agility made him a standout performer in one of the most acclaimed matches in ROH history.

Dragon Lee
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team division, and ROH World Television Champion.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre.
Signature moves: Desnucadora (Vertical Suplex Powerbomb), Tornillo Dive, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Dragon Lee became a central figure in ROH’s partnership with CMLL, showcasing his high-flying style and earning accolades as the ROH World Television Champion. His matches against stars like Shane Taylor and Bandido were highlights of his tenure, and he was also a member of La Facción Ingobernable.

Dunn (of Dunn and Marcos, The Ring Crew Express)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2006, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and comedic act.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Double-Team Elbow Drop, Tandem Suplex, Moonsault.
Brief description: As part of The Ring Crew Express with Marcos, Dunn competed in ROH’s tag team division, providing lighthearted entertainment. Though often positioned as underdogs, the team gained a following for their spirited performances and comedic interactions, adding variety to the ROH roster.


Here are the verified profiles for wrestlers with documented connections to Ring of Honor (ROH):

Eddie Edwards
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2013, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Die Hard (Fisherman Buster), Achilles Lock, Boston Knee Party (Running Knee Strike).
Brief description: Eddie Edwards is one of the most decorated competitors in ROH history, becoming the first-ever ROH World Television Champion and later capturing the ROH World Championship. As one-half of The American Wolves with Davey Richards, Edwards delivered classic tag matches against teams like The Briscoes and The Young Bucks. His technical skill and intensity made him a cornerstone of the promotion during his tenure.


Here are the verified profiles for wrestlers with documented connections to Ring of Honor (ROH):

Eddie Kingston
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2012-2013, sporadic appearances; 2023-present, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and main event.
Wrestling style: Brawling and striking.
Signature moves: Backfist to the Future (Spinning Backfist), Sliding D (Lariat), Stretch Plum.
Brief description: Eddie Kingston brought his hard-hitting and no-nonsense style to ROH, initially appearing in faction warfare and multi-man matches. In 2023, under the AEW management of ROH, Kingston returned as a major player, competing in high-profile singles matches and feuds, showcasing his gritty persona and unmatched promo skills.

El Generico (later known as Sami Zayn)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2012, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Brainbustaaaaa!!! (Top Turnbuckle Brainbuster), Helluva Kick, Exploder Suplex into the Corner.
Brief description: El Generico was a beloved performer in ROH, known for his incredible athleticism and underdog persona. As a multi-time ROH World Tag Team Champion with Kevin Steen (later Kevin Owens), he participated in some of the most iconic matches and feuds in ROH history, including his brutal rivalry with Steen. Generico's blend of humor, heart, and in-ring excellence left an indelible mark on the promotion.

Eli Isom
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, High-Angle Frog Splash, Springboard Dropkick.
Brief description: Eli Isom emerged as a promising talent in ROH, showcasing his athleticism and resilience. A graduate of the ROH Dojo, Isom competed in singles and tag matches, impressing fans with his energy and versatility. His performances in matches against veterans established him as one of the promotion’s rising stars.

Embassy (Prince Nana’s faction)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004-2012, sporadic appearances; 2022-present, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical (varied based on members).
Signature moves: Moves varied depending on members, including Nana’s Ghanaian Clutch and faction members’ double-team finishers.
Brief description: The Embassy, led by Prince Nana, was one of ROH’s most enduring factions. Known for its revolving roster of members, including Jimmy Rave, Alex Shelley, and Brian Cage, the faction blended wealth-driven arrogance with dominant in-ring performances. The Embassy often participated in faction rivalries and multi-man matches, cementing their place as one of ROH’s iconic heel stables.

Erick Stevens
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007-2010, regular appearances; 2020, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and striking.
Signature moves: Doctor Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Choo Choo (Running Corner Splash), Lariat.
Brief description: Erick Stevens was a prominent competitor in ROH during his initial run, engaging in intense feuds with wrestlers like Roderick Strong. Known for his explosive power and hard-hitting style, Stevens was a consistent presence in ROH’s singles and faction-based storylines. He returned briefly in 2020 to compete in a handful of matches, showcasing his veteran presence.

Ernie Osiris
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007-2010, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and comedic act.
Wrestling style: High-flying and comedic.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Tornado DDT, Flying Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Ernie Osiris was primarily used as a comedic character in ROH, often appearing in undercard matches. A graduate of the ROH Wrestling Academy, he contributed to the entertainment aspect of ROH events, providing lighthearted moments for fans.

Evil Uno
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2023-present, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: Fatality (Double-Team Gory Bomb/Blockbuster Combo), Something Evil (Spinning Flatliner), Senton Bomb.
Brief description: Evil Uno became a key part of ROH’s tag team division under AEW’s management as a member of the Dark Order. Known for his blend of power and agility, Uno has delivered compelling performances in both singles and tag team matches, furthering faction-based storylines and enhancing ROH’s roster depth.

EZ Money
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Money Clip (Springboard Clothesline), Cha-Ching (Over-the-Shoulder Backbreaker Drop), Top Rope Leg Drop.
Brief description: EZ Money competed in the early years of ROH, showcasing his innovative offense and athleticism. While his appearances were limited, he provided exciting performances in undercard and mid-card matches, leaving a lasting impression with his unique style.

Fast Eddie
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2005, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Moonsault Slam, Top Rope Moonsault, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Fast Eddie was a member of The Embassy, contributing to their faction-driven storylines and competing in both singles and tag matches. Known for his athleticism despite being legally blind, he impressed audiences with his daring high-flying maneuvers, making him a unique presence in the promotion.

Faye Jackson
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017-2018, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Cannonball Splash, Running Butt Strike, Vertical Suplex.
Brief description: Faye Jackson competed in ROH’s Women of Honor division, bringing charisma and power to her performances. Known for her confident persona and crowd engagement, she participated in matches that highlighted her personality and physicality.

Flamita
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2020-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre.
Signature moves: Flam Fly (Tilt-a-Whirl Cutter), 450 Splash, Tornillo.
Brief description: Flamita was a key part of MexaSquad alongside Bandido and Rey Horus, capturing the ROH World Six-Man Tag Team Championships. Known for his athleticism and dynamic offense, Flamita delivered standout performances in both tag team and singles competition. His transition to the darker "Demonic Flamita" persona added a new layer to his character during his ROH tenure.

Flip Gordon
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017-2022, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Flip-5 (Fireman’s Carry Spun into Cutter), Star-Spangled Stunner, 450 Splash.
Brief description: Flip Gordon rose to prominence in ROH with his incredible athleticism and aerial offense. Initially a fan favorite, Gordon’s character evolved into a more aggressive and complex role, aligning with Villain Enterprises. His matches against stars like Bandido and Jay Lethal showcased his growth as a competitor, making him a consistent highlight of the promotion.

Forever Hooligans (Rocky Romero and Alex Koslov)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2013-2014, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Contract Killer (Diving Knee Strike/Superkick Combo), Double Suplex, Romero’s Forever Clotheslines.
Brief description: Forever Hooligans brought their dynamic style to ROH during its partnership with NJPW. The team competed in high-profile matches, delivering exciting performances against top tag teams like The Briscoes and reDRagon. Their international appeal and in-ring chemistry made them fan favorites.

The Foundation (Jonathan Gresham, Jay Lethal, Tracy Williams, and Rhett Titus)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2020-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; main event and Pure Division.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Octopus Stretch (Gresham), Lethal Injection (Lethal), Piledriver (Williams), Dropkick (Titus).
Brief description: The Foundation was a faction dedicated to restoring the purity of professional wrestling in ROH. Focusing on technical excellence and the Pure Division, the group competed in high-profile matches, feuds, and multi-man contests. The Foundation's efforts highlighted the tradition and sportsmanship of wrestling, playing a key role in ROH’s Pure Championship revival.

Frankie Kazarian
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2005, sporadic appearances; 2014-2018, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Flux Capacitor (Top Rope Spanish Fly), Wave of the Future (Rolling Cutter), Slingshot DDT.
Brief description: Frankie Kazarian made his mark in ROH as a member of The Addiction alongside Christopher Daniels. Together, they dominated the tag team division, winning the ROH World Tag Team Championships. Kazarian’s charisma, athleticism, and veteran presence elevated him as a key figure in ROH during his tenure.

Fred Yehi
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2020-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Pure Division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Koji Clutch, Dragon Suplex, Guillotine Choke.
Brief description: Fred Yehi was a standout competitor in ROH’s Pure Division, showcasing his grappling expertise and unique offense. His matches emphasized technical wrestling and precision, earning him respect from fans and peers. Yehi was a prominent participant in Pure Championship bouts and tournaments during his ROH tenure.

FTR (Dax Harwood and Cash Wheeler)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2022-present, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and old-school.
Signature moves: Big Rig (Assisted High-Angle Spinebuster), Superplex/Splash Combo, Piledriver.
Brief description: FTR became a centerpiece of ROH’s tag team division after its relaunch under AEW management. Known for their old-school wrestling philosophy and technical precision, FTR delivered classic matches, including a high-profile feud with The Briscoes, culminating in some of the most critically acclaimed tag team bouts in wrestling history.

Future Shock (Adam Cole and Kyle O’Reilly)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2010-2012, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Superkick/Brainbuster Combo, Kneeling Superkick, Double Suplex.
Brief description: Future Shock was a dynamic young tag team that showcased the future of professional wrestling. Adam Cole and Kyle O’Reilly’s innovative offense and chemistry made them a standout duo in ROH’s tag division. Though they didn’t win tag team gold, their matches against top teams like The Briscoes and The Young Bucks earned critical acclaim.

Gates of Agony (Kaun and Toa Liona)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2022-present, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Double Spinebuster, Running Powerslam, Corner Splash.
Brief description: Gates of Agony became a dominant force in ROH’s tag team division under AEW’s management. As members of The Embassy, Kaun and Toa Liona brought a brutal, power-based style to the promotion, competing in high-profile tag matches and establishing themselves as an imposing team in ROH’s roster.

Generation Next (Austin Aries, Roderick Strong, Jack Evans, and Alex Shelley)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004-2007, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: 450 Splash (Aries), Stronghold (Strong’s Elevated Crab), Ode to Blitzkrieg (Evans), Border City Stretch (Shelley).
Brief description: Generation Next was one of ROH’s most influential factions, representing the future of professional wrestling. They dominated the promotion, holding the ROH World Tag Team Championships and delivering standout performances in faction-based rivalries. Their blend of high-flying and technical styles made them fan favorites, and their impact is still felt in modern wrestling.

Genki Horiguchi
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006, guest appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre-inspired.
Signature moves: Beach Break (Over-the-Shoulder Back-to-Belly Piledriver), Tornillo, Springboard DDT.
Brief description: Genki Horiguchi was part of Do FIXER during the Dragon Gate collaboration with ROH. His participation in the legendary match against Blood Generation at "Supercard of Honor" 2006 remains a highlight in ROH’s history, showcasing his aerial mastery and crowd-pleasing style.

Ghost Shadow
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: 450 Splash, Tornado DDT, Springboard Moonsault.
Brief description: Ghost Shadow competed in ROH’s early years, bringing a high-flying style to the promotion. While primarily featured in lower-card matches, his performances highlighted the diverse talent that ROH showcased during its formative years.

Go Shiozaki
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2008-2009, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: Go Flasher (Modified Michinoku Driver), Moonsault, Lariat.
Brief description: Go Shiozaki competed in ROH as part of the talent exchange with Pro Wrestling NOAH. Known for his hard-hitting style and precision, Shiozaki delivered standout performances against ROH’s top stars, further strengthening the partnership between the two promotions.

Great Muta
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003, special appearance.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking with theatrical elements.
Signature moves: Shining Wizard, Dragon Screw Leg Whip, Moonsault.
Brief description: The Great Muta made a rare appearance for ROH during the promotion’s collaboration with All Japan Pro Wrestling. His legendary status and iconic style added prestige to the event, captivating fans with his unique blend of mystique and in-ring mastery.

Grizzly Redwood
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2008-2013, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and comedic act.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Tornado DDT, Running Chop, Springboard Crossbody.
Brief description: Grizzly Redwood, known as "The Littlest Lumberjack," was a fan-favorite comedic character in ROH. Despite his smaller stature, he used his quickness and resilience to compete against larger opponents. Grizzly added variety to the roster and provided lighthearted entertainment in multi-man and singles matches.

uardians of Truth
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2012, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Tandem Spinebuster, Corner Splash.
Brief description: The Guardians of Truth were a masked tag team managed by Truth Martini as part of The House of Truth. They competed in a few tag team matches, primarily serving as henchmen for Martini. Their mysterious presentation and alignment with Martini added an element of intrigue to their brief ROH tenure.

Guerrillas of Destiny (Tama Tonga and Tanga Loa)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Guerrilla Warfare (Double Flapjack/Double Facebuster Combo), Tonga Twist (Spinning Slam), Double Superkick.
Brief description: Guerrillas of Destiny appeared in ROH during the NJPW partnership, bringing their Bullet Club allegiance and hard-hitting tag team style to the promotion. They competed in high-profile matches against top teams, further elevating ROH’s tag division with their international star power.

Hangman Page
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2013-2018, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event; faction member.
Wrestling style: High-flying and brawling.
Signature moves: Buckshot Lariat (Slingshot Clothesline), Rite of Passage (Over-the-Shoulder Piledriver), Moonsault to the Outside.
Brief description: Hangman Page grew from a rising talent to a prominent figure in ROH during his tenure. Initially competing as a member of The Decade, Page later joined the Bullet Club, where he showcased his evolving skill set and charisma. His matches against top stars elevated his status, making him a standout performer in the promotion.

Hangmen Three (Adam Pearce, BJ Whitmer, and Brent Albright)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007-2008, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; mid-card and upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: Pearce’s Jumping Piledriver, Whitmer’s Exploder Suplex, Albright’s Crowbar (Fujiwara Armbar).
Brief description: The Hangmen Three was a heel faction focused on brute strength and brawling. They competed in faction-based rivalries and multi-man matches, bringing physicality and intensity to their storylines. Though the faction was short-lived, its members remained pivotal figures in ROH’s roster during that era.

Hania The Howling Huntress
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking.
Signature moves: Howling Moonsault (Springboard Moonsault), Running Knee Strike, Snap Suplex.
Brief description: Hania competed briefly in ROH’s Women of Honor division, showcasing her agility and high-energy offense. While her appearances were limited, she contributed to the division's development during her tenure.

Hanson (later known as Ivar in WWE)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2018, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and main event.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with agility.
Signature moves: Fallout (Diving Leg Drop/Slam Combo with Rowe), Spin Kick of Doom, Powerslam.
Brief description: Hanson was one-half of War Machine (alongside Raymond Rowe), a dominant tag team in ROH. Together, they captured the ROH World Tag Team Championships and delivered standout matches against teams like The Briscoes and The Young Bucks. Hanson’s rare combination of size and agility made him a standout in the tag division.

Hardys (Matt and Jeff Hardy)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017, guest appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and special attractions.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative.
Signature moves: Twist of Fate (Matt), Swanton Bomb (Jeff), Poetry in Motion (Tag Finisher).
Brief description: The Hardys had a short but impactful run in ROH during their "Broken" era. They captured the ROH World Tag Team Championships and engaged in a memorable feud with The Young Bucks, culminating in a classic Ladder Match at Supercard of Honor XI. Their stint elevated the tag division and provided unforgettable moments.

Harlem Bravado
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2010-2015, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and teamwork-focused.
Signature moves: Gentleman’s Agreement (Double Team Suplex with Lancelot Bravado), Enzuigiri, Corner Dropkick.
Brief description: Harlem Bravado, as one-half of The Bravado Brothers, brought a polished and cohesive tag style to ROH. The team competed in several entertaining matches, showcasing steady improvement and earning respect in the tag team division.

Havana Pitbulls (Ricky Reyes and Rocky Romero)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004-2005, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Powerbomb/Guillotine Leg Drop Combo, Romero’s Armbar, Reyes’ Backdrop Driver.
Brief description: The Havana Pitbulls were a dominant team in ROH’s tag division, capturing the ROH World Tag Team Championships. Their hard-hitting and submission-focused style made them a formidable duo, competing in intense matches against teams like The Briscoes and Generation Next.

Hernandez
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Border Toss (Crucifix Powerbomb), Pounce, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Hernandez competed in ROH’s early years, showcasing his impressive power and athleticism. While his appearances were limited, he participated in tag team and singles matches that demonstrated his potential as a physical competitor.

Hiromu Takahashi
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2016, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking.
Signature moves: Time Bomb (Fireman’s Carry Driver), Sunset Flip Powerbomb to the Outside, Dynamite Plunger.
Brief description: Before returning to NJPW as Hiromu Takahashi, he competed in ROH as Kamaitachi. Known for his unorthodox style and fierce rivalries, his matches against Dragon Lee, particularly in ROH’s partnership with CMLL, were critically acclaimed. Hiromu's agility and unique persona made him a standout during his time in the promotion.

Hirooki Goto
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Strong style and technical.
Signature moves: GTR (Goto Revolution), Ushigoroshi, Shouten Kai (Vertical Suplex Lift into Neckbreaker).
Brief description: Hirooki Goto appeared in ROH as part of its partnership with NJPW, competing in high-profile singles and tag matches. His strong style and physical matches added a unique flavor to ROH events, and he participated in notable cross-promotional events like Global Wars and War of the Worlds.

Hiroshi Tanahashi
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and main event.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: High Fly Flow (Frog Splash), Sling Blade, Texas Cloverleaf.
Brief description: As NJPW’s "Ace," Hiroshi Tanahashi brought star power to ROH during cross-promotional events. Competing in major matches against ROH’s top talent, he helped elevate the partnership between the two promotions and introduced NJPW’s style to ROH audiences.

Holidead
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017-2018, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and striking.
Signature moves: Darkness Falls (Gutwrench Suplex), Running Powerslam, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Holidead competed in ROH’s Women of Honor division, bringing a unique, dark persona and a hard-hitting style. Her appearances helped diversify the women’s roster and added depth to the division during its growth phase.

Homicide
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2007, regular appearances; 2010-2011, regular appearances; 2021-2022, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Brawling and hardcore.
Signature moves: Cop Killa (Vertebreaker), Da Gringo Killa (Double Underhook Driver), Suicide Dive.
Brief description: Homicide is one of ROH’s most iconic figures, known for his hard-hitting and intense style. As a founding member of The Rottweilers and a former ROH World Champion, he delivered classic feuds with stars like Samoa Joe and Bryan Danielson. His brutal in-ring work and charismatic persona made him a cornerstone of ROH’s early years and later a celebrated veteran.

Hotstuff Hernandez
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Border Toss (Crucifix Powerbomb), Pounce, Shoulder Block.
Brief description: Hernandez, wrestling as Hotstuff Hernandez, competed in tag and singles matches in ROH’s early years. Known for his size and power, he brought a physical presence to the promotion, adding variety to the roster.

House of Truth (Truth Martini’s faction)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2010-2016, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; main event and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based (varied based on members).
Signature moves: Martini’s Ghanaian Clutch (Manager Submission Spot) and members’ faction-based tag finishers.
Brief description: The House of Truth, led by the enigmatic Truth Martini, was one of ROH’s most memorable factions. Featuring stars like Roderick Strong, Jay Lethal, and Donovan Dijak, the faction played a significant role in ROH’s storylines, capturing championships and delivering impactful matches. Martini’s eccentric managerial style added a unique dynamic to the group.

Human Tornado
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and comedic.
Signature moves: Tornado DDT, Pimp Slap, Suicide Dive.
Brief description: Human Tornado brought his unique charisma and comedic style to ROH in a few appearances. Known for his entertaining antics and athleticism, Tornado added variety and fun to ROH events during his tenure.

Hydro (later known as Jay Lethal)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2004, regular appearances (as Hydro).
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Dragon Suplex, Diving Headbutt, Northern Lights Suplex.
Brief description: Before becoming one of ROH’s most celebrated champions, Jay Lethal wrestled under the name Hydro as part of the Special K faction. Known for his high-flying moves and youthful energy, Hydro was a key member of the faction’s chaotic and entertaining style. His transformation into a more serious competitor marked the beginning of his legendary career in ROH.

Ikuto Hidaka
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002, guest appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Tornado DDT, Fisherman Buster, Handspring Kick.
Brief description: Ikuto Hidaka appeared in ROH during its early days as part of its international talent exchange. Known for his fast-paced, technical style, Hidaka competed in singles and tag matches, showcasing his agility and skill to ROH audiences.

Insane Dragon
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: 450 Splash, Springboard DDT, Moonsault.
Brief description: Insane Dragon was an early competitor in ROH, bringing his innovative aerial style to matches. He often competed in tag team and multi-man bouts, showcasing his high-risk moves in the promotion’s formative years.

Irish Airborne (Dave and Jake Crist, later known as part of oVe in Impact Wrestling)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007-2008, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Irish Air Raid (Double Team Powerbomb), Superkick/German Suplex Combo, Double Stomp/DDT Combo.
Brief description: Irish Airborne brought their unique tag team style to ROH during their tenure. Known for their high-energy matches and innovative tandem moves, they competed against established teams in the tag division, leaving an impression with their athleticism.

J. Diesel (later known as Joey Daddiego)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2016, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse.
Signature moves: Powerbomb, Spinebuster, Fallaway Slam.
Brief description: J. Diesel was a member of Truth Martini’s House of Truth, serving as an enforcer for the faction. While primarily positioned in a supporting role, he competed in singles and multi-man matches, showcasing his strength and alignment with the faction’s storyline.

Jack Evans
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2007, regular appearances; 2010, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative.
Signature moves: 630 Senton, Standing Corkscrew Moonsault, Ode to Blitzkrieg (Handspring Backflip Elbow).
Brief description: Jack Evans was a high-flying sensation in ROH, known for his innovative aerial moves and charismatic persona. As a member of Generation Next, he was part of one of the most influential factions in ROH history. Evans consistently delivered thrilling performances in both singles and tag team matches, leaving a lasting impact on the promotion’s style.

Jado
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: Crossface of JADO, Lariat, Superplex.
Brief description: Jado competed in ROH as part of the partnership with NJPW. Known for his experience and alignment with the Bullet Club, Jado participated in tag team and faction-based matches, contributing to ROH’s international collaborations and cross-promotional events.

Jake Crist
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007-2008, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Spanish Fly, Tornado DDT, Suicide Dive.
Brief description: Jake Crist, as part of Irish Airborne with his brother Dave Crist, competed in ROH’s tag team division. Known for their innovative tandem offense, the team participated in matches against some of ROH’s established tag teams, showcasing their athleticism and creativity.

James Gibson (later known as Jamie Noble)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Trailer Hitch (Modified Leglock), Tiger Driver, Guillotine Choke.
Brief description: James Gibson had a short but impactful run in ROH, culminating in a reign as ROH World Champion. Known for his technical expertise and fiery intensity, Gibson delivered classic matches against stars like CM Punk and Samoa Joe, earning widespread acclaim for his contributions to the promotion before returning to WWE.

James Maritato (better known as Nunzio/Little Guido)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: Sicilian Slice (Leg Drop), Fujiwara Armbar, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: James Maritato appeared in the early days of ROH, bringing his veteran experience and technical skill to the promotion. While his appearances were brief, he competed in competitive matches that highlighted his wrestling ability and added credibility to ROH’s early events.

James Tighe
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Bridging German Suplex, Crossface, Top Rope Leg Drop.
Brief description: James Tighe appeared in ROH during its early years, representing the British wrestling style. Known for his technical proficiency, Tighe competed in competitive singles matches, showcasing his grappling skills and adding an international flavor to the roster.

Jamilia Craft
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2010-2011, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Fisherman’s Suplex, Running Knee Strike, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Jamilia Craft was a competitor in ROH’s Women of Honor division. Trained by Daizee Haze, Craft brought a solid technical foundation and potential to her matches, participating in the development of the division during her brief tenure.

Jason Blade
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2007, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Moonsault, Springboard DDT, Northern Lights Suplex.
Brief description: Jason Blade competed in ROH’s tag team division, often teaming with Kenny King. Known for his agility and athleticism, Blade participated in several entertaining matches, contributing to the tag team scene during his appearances.

Jason Kincaid
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2017, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and unorthodox.
Signature moves: Compassionate Release (Modified Rope-Hung Armbar), Coast-to-Coast Dropkick, Springboard Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Jason Kincaid brought a unique and spiritual persona to ROH, delivering innovative in-ring performances. Competing in singles and multi-man matches, he showcased his creative offense and agility, leaving a strong impression on the audience despite limited appearances.

Jasper Kaun (Bishop Kaun)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019-2021, regular appearances; 2022-present, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with technical elements.
Signature moves: Pop-Up Cutter, Powerbomb, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Jasper Kaun, also known as Bishop Kaun, was a key member of Shane Taylor Promotions, winning the ROH World Six-Man Tag Team Championships. His strength and versatility made him a standout performer in faction and tag matches. Kaun has continued to appear in ROH as part of The Embassy, delivering strong performances in the tag division.

Jax Dane
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse.
Signature moves: Dane Event (Chokeslam/Backbreaker Combo), Lariat, Powerbomb.
Brief description: Jax Dane appeared in ROH as part of his affiliation with the National Wrestling Alliance (NWA). Known for his size and strength, Dane competed in a handful of matches that highlighted his physical dominance and credibility as a powerhouse wrestler.

Jay Briscoe
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2023, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical.
Signature moves: Jay Driller (Double Underhook Piledriver), Froggy Bow (Diving Elbow Drop), Big Boot.
Brief description: Jay Briscoe was one of the most iconic figures in ROH history. As one-half of The Briscoe Brothers alongside his brother Mark, he captured the ROH World Tag Team Championships a record 13 times. Jay was also a two-time ROH World Champion, delivering classic matches against stars like Adam Cole and Kevin Steen. His contributions to ROH helped define the promotion’s legacy, both as a singles competitor and in tag team wrestling.

Jay Diesel (later known as Joey Daddiego)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2016, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse.
Signature moves: Powerbomb, Spinebuster, Fallaway Slam.
Brief description: Jay Diesel was a member of Truth Martini’s House of Truth, serving as an enforcer for the faction. While primarily in a supporting role, Diesel competed in singles and faction-based matches, showcasing his strength and alignment with the group’s storylines.

Jay Lethal
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2006, regular appearances; 2011-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Lethal Injection (Springboard Cutter), Hail to the King (Diving Elbow Drop), Figure Four Leglock.
Brief description: Jay Lethal is one of ROH’s most decorated wrestlers, a two-time ROH World Champion and the longest-reigning ROH World Television Champion in history. Known for his versatility and in-ring psychology, Lethal delivered classic matches against top stars like Adam Cole, Roderick Strong, and Samoa Joe. His legacy as the "Franchise of ROH" solidifies him as one of the greatest performers in the promotion’s history.

Jay White
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2017, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Blade Runner (Swinging Reverse STO), Kiwi Crusher (Fisherman Driver), Sleeper Suplex.
Brief description: Before becoming a global star in NJPW, Jay White had a successful excursion in ROH, where he competed in singles and tag matches. Known for his technical precision and character development, White showcased his potential through matches with top talent, helping bridge the partnership between ROH and NJPW.

JD Drake
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2022-present, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical.
Signature moves: Drill Bit (Spinning Corkscrew Neckbreaker), Vader Bomb, Lariat.
Brief description: JD Drake competed in ROH as part of The Workhorsemen with Anthony Henry. Known for his hard-hitting style and surprising agility, Drake brought a physical presence to the tag team division and participated in competitive matches against top teams in the promotion.

Jeff Cobb
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and ROH World Television Champion.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical.
Signature moves: Tour of the Islands (Spinning Powerslam), German Suplex, Standing Moonsault.
Brief description: Jeff Cobb was a dominant competitor in ROH, winning the ROH World Television Championship in 2018. Known for his combination of power and agility, Cobb delivered standout performances in singles and multi-man matches, competing against stars like Jay Lethal and Shane Taylor. His tenure solidified him as a top-tier talent in the promotion.

Jeff Hardy
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003, special appearance.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative.
Signature moves: Swanton Bomb, Twist of Fate, Whisper in the Wind.
Brief description: Jeff Hardy made a one-off appearance for ROH at Death Before Dishonor in 2003. His presence brought mainstream attention to the young promotion, though his match against Joey Matthews and Krazy K was met with mixed reactions due to his unorthodox persona at the time.


Here are the verified profiles for wrestlers with documented connections to Ring of Honor (ROH):

Jeff Cobb
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and ROH World Television Champion.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical.
Signature moves: Tour of the Islands (Spinning Powerslam), Standing Moonsault, German Suplex.
Brief description: Jeff Cobb made an immediate impact in ROH, capturing the ROH World Television Championship in his debut match. Known for his incredible strength and agility, Cobb competed in high-profile matches against top stars like Shane Taylor and Jonathan Gresham, solidifying his reputation as one of ROH’s premier talents during his tenure.

Jenny Rose
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Spear, Northern Lights Suplex, Running Bulldog.
Brief description: Jenny Rose was a key competitor in the Women of Honor division, consistently delivering solid performances in singles and tag matches. Her tenure included notable bouts against top competitors like Sumie Sakai and Kelly Klein, contributing to the growth of ROH’s women’s division.

Jerrelle Clark
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004-2005, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative.
Signature moves: 630 Splash, Tornado DDT, Springboard Moonsault.
Brief description: Jerrelle Clark brought his high-flying offense to ROH during its early years, competing in singles and tag team matches. Known for his agility and aerial maneuvers, Clark participated in multi-man matches that showcased his innovative style.

Jerry Lynn
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2008-2009, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and ROH World Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Cradle Piledriver, Tornado DDT, Diving Leg Drop.
Brief description: Jerry Lynn had a legendary run in ROH, capturing the ROH World Championship in 2009. As a seasoned veteran, he brought experience and credibility to the promotion, engaging in classic matches with stars like Austin Aries and Nigel McGuinness. His reign as champion and his farewell tour were highlights of his illustrious career.

Jessie McKay (later known as Billie Kay in WWE)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2008-2010, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Boyfriend Stealer (Neckbreaker), Running Big Boot, Missile Dropkick.
Brief description: Jessie McKay competed in ROH’s Women of Honor division, showcasing her charisma and technical abilities in matches against stars like Sara Del Rey. Her brief but impactful run demonstrated her potential as a rising star in women’s wrestling.

Jigsaw
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2013, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Jig N’ Tonic (Package Piledriver), Enzuigiri, Springboard Dropkick.
Brief description: Jigsaw appeared in ROH as a standout performer from CHIKARA, competing in singles and tag matches. Known for his innovative offense and technical prowess, Jigsaw delivered exciting performances, particularly in multi-man and faction-based matches.

Jimmy Havoc
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling.
Signature moves: Acid Rainmaker (Ripcord Lariat), Death Valley Driver, Double Stomp.
Brief description: Jimmy Havoc brought his hardcore style to ROH during its partnership with NJPW and AEW. Known for his violent and unorthodox approach, Havoc competed in brutal matches that showcased his unique character and added variety to ROH’s roster.

Jimmy Jacobs
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2015, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event, tag team division, and faction member.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical.
Signature moves: Contra Code (Shiranui), End Time (Guillotine Choke), Superkick.
Brief description: Jimmy Jacobs was one of ROH’s most influential characters, contributing to iconic storylines and factions such as The Age of the Fall with Tyler Black (later Seth Rollins). As a five-time ROH World Tag Team Champion, Jacobs’ blend of storytelling, charisma, and in-ring skill made him a pivotal figure in ROH history, particularly for his work in faction warfare and tag team excellence.

Jimmy Rave
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2007, regular appearances; 2011, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Rave Clash (Double Underhook Facebuster), Greetings from Ghana (Running Knee Strike), Armbar.
Brief description: Jimmy Rave was best known in ROH as a member of The Embassy, where his heel persona and association with Prince Nana made him one of the most hated figures in the promotion. Rave competed in notable feuds with AJ Styles, CM Punk, and The Briscoes, establishing himself as a key part of ROH’s early years.

Jimmy Yang
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Yang Time (Corkscrew Moonsault), Leg Lariat, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Jimmy Yang competed in ROH during its early years, bringing his high-flying style and charisma to matches against notable stars. While his appearances were brief, Yang’s exciting offense and energy left an impression on fans during his tenure.

Jody Fleisch
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative.
Signature moves: 720 DDT, Shooting Star Press, Springboard Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Jody Fleisch, a British high-flyer, appeared in ROH as part of its early international collaborations. Known for his breathtaking aerial moves, Fleisch competed in multi-man matches and highlighted the diversity of ROH’s talent roster during its formative years.

Joe Hendry
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based.
Signature moves: Fallaway Slam, Ankle Lock, Freak of Nature (Tilt-a-Whirl Slam).
Brief description: Joe Hendry joined ROH during its later years, bringing his unique charisma and technical wrestling style to the promotion. Known for his custom entrance songs and ability to engage the crowd, Hendry participated in singles and faction-based matches, leaving a memorable impact on ROH audiences.

Joe Keys
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017-2021, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Vertical Suplex, Spinebuster, Running Clothesline.
Brief description: A graduate of the ROH Dojo, Joe Keys competed in singles and tag matches, often representing the future of the promotion. He participated in the Pure Championship Tournament and showcased his potential as part of ROH’s developmental talent pool.

Joel Maximo
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Spanish Fly (Tag Finisher), Double Suplex, Springboard Moonsault.
Brief description: Joel Maximo, as part of The SAT (Spanish Announce Team) with his brother Jose Maximo, was an early staple of ROH’s tag division. Known for their innovative high-flying offense, The SAT competed in several multi-man and tag matches, contributing to the foundation of ROH’s tag team division.

Joey Daddiego (formerly known as J. Diesel)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2016, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse.
Signature moves: Powerbomb, Spinebuster, Fallaway Slam.
Brief description: Joey Daddiego, initially competing as J. Diesel, was an enforcer for Truth Martini’s House of Truth faction. While primarily in a supporting role, Daddiego participated in singles and multi-man matches, demonstrating his strength and alignment with the group’s storylines.

Joey Matthews (later known as Joey Mercury)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Double Underhook DDT, Superkick, Diving Leg Drop.
Brief description: Joey Matthews appeared in the early years of ROH, competing in singles and tag team matches. Known for his technical skill and ability to adapt to various styles, Matthews was a reliable performer during ROH’s formative years, before gaining further recognition in other promotions.

John Walters
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2005, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and ROH Pure Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Sharpshooter, Lungblower, Powerbomb Backbreaker.
Brief description: John Walters was a standout competitor in ROH’s Pure Division, capturing the ROH Pure Championship in 2004. Known for his technical expertise and ability to adapt to the Pure Rules format, Walters delivered memorable matches against stars like Nigel McGuinness and Samoa Joe, contributing significantly to the division's legacy.

Johnny Kashmere
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and hardcore.
Signature moves: T-Gimmick (Double Team Driver with Trent Acid), Springboard DDT, Moonsault.
Brief description: Johnny Kashmere was one-half of The Backseat Boyz with Trent Acid. Known for their charisma and innovative tag team offense, the duo competed in several entertaining matches in ROH’s early tag team division, leaving an impression on fans despite their limited appearances.

Jon Davis
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2011-2013, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and striking.
Signature moves: Three Seconds Around the World (Spinning Powerbomb), Pounce, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Jon Davis made an impact in ROH as a powerhouse competitor, often delivering hard-hitting performances. He was known for his physical style and participated in notable singles and tag matches, including as part of The Dark City Fight Club, where he showcased his dominance in the tag team division.

Jonathan Gresham
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2011, sporadic appearances; 2017-2022, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event, Pure Division, and ROH World Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Octopus Stretch, Figure Four Leglock, Springboard Moonsault.
Brief description: Jonathan Gresham is one of the most skilled technical wrestlers in ROH history. As the foundation of the revived Pure Division, Gresham captured the ROH Pure Championship and later became the ROH World Champion. Known for his incredible in-ring IQ and precise grappling, Gresham was instrumental in maintaining ROH’s identity as a promotion rooted in pure wrestling.

Jon Moxley
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): No documented connection.
Note: While Jon Moxley (formerly Dean Ambrose) is a significant figure in professional wrestling, there is no verified record of him competing in ROH.

Jonny Storm
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative.
Signature moves: Rewind Hurricanrana, 720 DDT, Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: Jonny Storm brought his high-flying, fast-paced style to ROH during its early years, representing the UK wrestling scene. Storm’s dynamic offense made him a standout in multi-man and singles matches, contributing to the promotion’s emphasis on showcasing international talent.

Jose Maximo
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Spanish Fly (Tag Finisher with Joel Maximo), Springboard Moonsault, Double Suplex.
Brief description: Jose Maximo, as one-half of The SAT (Spanish Announce Team) with Joel Maximo, was a pivotal part of ROH’s early tag team division. Known for their innovative high-flying maneuvers, The SAT competed in multi-man and tag matches, helping to establish ROH’s reputation for exciting tag team action.

Josh Alexander
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and powerhouse.
Signature moves: C4 Spike (Piledriver), Ankle Lock, Chaos Theory (Rolling German Suplex).
Brief description: Josh Alexander brought his technical expertise and intensity to ROH during his appearances in 2019. Known for his hard-hitting style, he competed in singles and tag matches, adding depth and variety to the roster during his brief stint in the promotion.

Josh Daniels
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2005, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: German Suplex, Dragon Suplex, Crossface.
Brief description: Josh Daniels was a technically proficient wrestler who competed in ROH’s early years, often in hard-hitting singles matches. His intensity and crisp execution of moves made him a respected competitor in the mid-card during his tenure.

Josh Woods
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017-2022, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Pure Division.
Wrestling style: Submission and technical.
Signature moves: Into the Woods (Rolling German Suplex), Cross Armbar, Rear-Naked Choke.
Brief description: Josh Woods rose to prominence in ROH as a Pure Division specialist, winning the 2021 ROH Pure Championship. A former Top Prospect Tournament winner, Woods was celebrated for his mat-based wrestling and submission prowess, engaging in standout matches against competitors like Jonathan Gresham.


Here are the verified profiles for wrestlers with documented connections to Ring of Honor (ROH):

Juice Robinson
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and faction member.
Wrestling style: High-energy and striking.
Signature moves: Pulp Friction (Unprettier), Left Hand of God (Punch), Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Juice Robinson competed in ROH as part of the NJPW partnership, bringing his charisma and dynamic wrestling style to cross-promotional events like Global Wars and War of the Worlds. As a member of Lifeblood, Juice participated in tag team and faction-based matches, helping to elevate the international appeal of ROH.

Jushin Thunder Liger
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004-2017, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Liger Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Shotei Palm Strike, Diving Headbutt.
Brief description: Jushin Thunder Liger appeared in ROH as a legendary special attraction, competing in high-profile singles and tag matches. His matches against stars like Samoa Joe and Dalton Castle brought international prestige to the promotion, with Liger’s presence elevating ROH’s standing in the wrestling world.

Justin Credible
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004-2006, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and technical.
Signature moves: That’s Incredible (Tombstone Piledriver), Superkick, DDT.
Brief description: Justin Credible competed in ROH during its early years, primarily in hardcore-style matches and faction-based storylines. His role often involved supporting other talent while adding a veteran presence to the roster.

Kamaitachi (later known as Hiromu Takahashi)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2016, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking.
Signature moves: Time Bomb (Fireman’s Carry Driver), Sunset Flip Powerbomb to the Outside, Dynamite Plunger.
Brief description: Kamaitachi brought his unorthodox style and intensity to ROH during its partnership with CMLL and NJPW. He gained critical acclaim for his rivalry with Dragon Lee, delivering high-octane matches that blended lucha libre with Japanese strong style.

Karen Q
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Boston Crab, Butterfly Suplex, Tilt-a-Whirl Backbreaker.
Brief description: Karen Q competed in ROH’s Women of Honor division, showcasing her technical prowess and strong character work. She participated in matches that helped establish the division, including notable bouts against competitors like Kelly Klein.

Kaun
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Pop-Up Spinebuster, Lariat, Corner Splash.
Brief description: Kaun was a key member of the tag team Soldiers of Savagery (SOS) alongside Moses, competing as part of Shane Taylor Promotions. Known for his brute strength and intensity, Kaun captured the ROH World Six-Man Tag Team Championships and was a dominant force in the tag team division.

Karl Anderson
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007-2009, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Striking and power-based.
Signature moves: Gun Stun (Cutter), Spinebuster, Running Boot.
Brief description: Before gaining international fame, Karl Anderson made sporadic appearances in ROH’s tag team and singles divisions. Known for his physical style and presence, Anderson competed in several competitive matches, contributing to the promotion’s growing reputation for high-caliber talent.

Katsuyori Shibata
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2017, guest appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Strong style and striking.
Signature moves: PK (Penalty Kick), Sleeper Hold, Backdrop Driver.
Brief description: Katsuyori Shibata appeared in ROH as part of its collaboration with NJPW, bringing his signature hard-hitting strong style to the promotion. Competing in major cross-promotional events, Shibata delivered intense matches that further solidified ROH’s partnership with NJPW.

Kazuchika Okada
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Rainmaker (Wristlock Short-Arm Lariat), Red Ink (Modified STF), Dropkick.
Brief description: Kazuchika Okada, as NJPW’s "Rainmaker," made multiple appearances in ROH as part of the NJPW-ROH partnership. Competing in high-profile matches and multi-man tag bouts, Okada brought star power and showcased his world-class wrestling ability, elevating the prestige of ROH events like Global Wars and War of the Worlds.

Keith Lee
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2017, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and agile.
Signature moves: Spirit Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Pounce, Big Bang Catastrophe (Fireman’s Carry into Powerslam).
Brief description: Keith Lee teamed with Shane Taylor during his ROH tenure, forming a powerhouse duo that left an impact in the tag team division. Known for his remarkable combination of size and agility, Lee participated in several standout matches that showcased his unique athleticism and charisma.

Kelly Klein
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2020, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division and Women of Honor World Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based.
Signature moves: End of the Match (Guillotine Choke), Belly-to-Belly Suplex, Northern Lights Suplex.
Brief description: Kelly Klein was a cornerstone of the Women of Honor division, capturing the Women of Honor World Championship three times. Known as "The Gatekeeper," Klein was a dominant competitor who delivered standout matches against stars like Sumie Sakai and Mayu Iwatani, playing a pivotal role in elevating the division.

Kenny King
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007-2012, regular appearances; 2015-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team division, and faction member.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Royal Flush (Fireman’s Carry into Spinebuster), Springboard Blockbuster, Capoeira Kick.
Brief description: Kenny King had a successful tenure in ROH, excelling as both a singles competitor and a tag team wrestler. As one-half of The All Night Express with Rhett Titus, King captured the ROH World Tag Team Championship. He also became a two-time ROH World Television Champion and joined The Foundation, showcasing his versatility as a performer.

Kenny Omega
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2008-2010, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: One-Winged Angel (Electric Chair Driver), V-Trigger (Running Knee Strike), Croyt’s Wrath (Electric Chair into Bridging German Suplex).
Brief description: Kenny Omega competed in ROH during his rise as an independent wrestling star. Known for his athleticism and innovative offense, Omega participated in singles and tag matches that highlighted his potential before becoming a global phenomenon in NJPW and AEW.

Kensuke Office (Kensuke Sasaki and Katsuhiko Nakajima)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2008, guest appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and special attractions.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse (Sasaki) and striking (Nakajima).
Signature moves: Lariat (Sasaki), Brainbuster, Kick Combinations (Nakajima).
Brief description: Kensuke Office appeared in ROH as part of a collaboration with Pro Wrestling NOAH. The team competed in high-profile tag matches, showcasing their power and precision, further bridging the gap between Japanese and American wrestling styles.

KENTA
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2009, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: Go 2 Sleep (Fireman’s Carry Knee Strike), Busaiku Knee Kick, Falcon Arrow.
Brief description: KENTA was a major international star brought in through ROH’s partnership with Pro Wrestling NOAH. Known for his hard-hitting strikes and innovative style, KENTA competed in marquee matches against top ROH stars like Bryan Danielson, cementing himself as a fan favorite and contributing to some of the most memorable bouts in ROH history.

Kenta Kobashi
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005, special appearance.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and striking.
Signature moves: Burning Hammer, Half Nelson Suplex, Lariat.
Brief description: Kenta Kobashi made a legendary appearance in ROH during its partnership with Pro Wrestling NOAH, most notably facing Samoa Joe at Joe vs. Kobashi. This match is considered one of the greatest in ROH history, showcasing Kobashi’s iconic status and hard-hitting style to an ROH audience.

Kevin Steen (later known as Kevin Owens)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007-2014, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and ROH World Champion.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and striking.
Signature moves: Package Piledriver, Steenalizer (Straight Jacket Powerbomb), Cannonball Senton.
Brief description: Kevin Steen is one of the most celebrated figures in ROH history, known for his brutal matches and intense rivalries, particularly with El Generico. As a former ROH World Champion, Steen carried the promotion with his in-ring storytelling and unmatched charisma. His feuds and matches against top stars helped define an era of ROH.

Kikutaro
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Comedy act and lower card.
Wrestling style: Comedy and technical.
Signature moves: Shining Wizard, Schoolboy Roll-Up, Atomic Drop.
Brief description: Kikutaro brought his unique comedic style to ROH, entertaining audiences with his humorous antics and lighthearted matches. His performances added variety to ROH events, showcasing a fun contrast to the intense competition that defined the promotion.

The Kingdom (Matt Taven, Mike Bennett, Maria Kanellis, and others)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying (varied based on members).
Signature moves: Proton Pack (Double-Team Neckbreaker/Powerbomb), Just the Tip (Knee Strike by Taven), Hail Mary (Spike Piledriver by Bennett).
Brief description: The Kingdom was one of ROH’s most prominent factions, led initially by Matt Taven and Mike Bennett, with Maria Kanellis serving as their manager. Known for their flashy offense and cohesive teamwork, The Kingdom captured the ROH World Tag Team Championships and the ROH World Six-Man Tag Team Championships, playing a pivotal role in ROH’s faction wars.

Kings of Wrestling (Chris Hero and Claudio Castagnoli)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2006, regular appearances; 2009-2011, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: KRS-One (Rolling Cutter/Powerbomb Combo), Bicycle Kick, Hero’s Rolling Elbow.
Brief description: The Kings of Wrestling are widely regarded as one of the greatest tag teams in ROH history. As multi-time ROH World Tag Team Champions, they delivered classic matches against The Briscoes, The Young Bucks, and other top teams. Their combination of technical mastery and brutal strikes left an indelible mark on the tag team division.

Kory Chavis
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2009-2010, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Project Mayhem (Powerbomb/Guillotine Leg Drop Combo with Jon Davis), Spinebuster, Corner Splash.
Brief description: Kory Chavis was one-half of the Dark City Fight Club alongside Jon Davis. The team was known for their hard-hitting style and dominance in the tag team division, competing against top teams like The Briscoes and The American Wolves. While they didn’t capture tag team gold, their performances made them a memorable part of ROH’s tag division.

KUSHIDA
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Hoverboard Lock (Kimura Lock), Back to the Future (Small Package Driver), Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: KUSHIDA competed in ROH during its partnership with NJPW, showcasing his incredible technical ability and aerial maneuvers. A former IWGP Junior Heavyweight Champion, KUSHIDA participated in cross-promotional matches and tournaments, delivering standout performances against ROH’s top talents.

Kyle O'Reilly
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2009-2017, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Armageddon (Cross Armbreaker), Brainbuster, Guillotine Choke.
Brief description: Kyle O'Reilly was a key figure in ROH, known for his tag team success as one-half of reDRagon with Bobby Fish. Together, they captured the ROH World Tag Team Championships multiple times and delivered classic matches against teams like The Briscoes and The Young Bucks. O'Reilly also had a successful singles run, culminating in an ROH World Championship victory in 2016 against Adam Cole.

La Bestia Del Ring
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Spear, Powerbomb, Running Lariat.
Brief description: La Bestia Del Ring was a member of La Facción Ingobernable, adding brute strength and an intimidating presence to the faction. As part of ROH's partnership with CMLL, he competed in singles and faction-based matches, contributing to the group’s dominance in storylines.

La Facción Ingobernable (Rush, Dragon Lee, La Bestia Del Ring, and Kenny King)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and faction warfare.
Wrestling style: Technical, high-flying, and brawling.
Signature moves: Rush’s Bull’s Horns (Running Corner Dropkick), Dragon Lee’s Desnucadora (Vertical Suplex Powerbomb), Kenny King’s Royal Flush (Fireman’s Carry Cutter).
Brief description: La Facción Ingobernable was one of ROH’s top heel factions, with members winning multiple championships, including the ROH World Championship (Rush) and ROH World Television Championship (Dragon Lee). Their mix of technical mastery, high-flying, and chaos made them a dominant force in ROH’s later years.

Lacey
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004-2008, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division and valet.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Implant DDT, Northern Lights Suplex, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Lacey was a prominent figure in ROH, competing in the Women of Honor division and serving as a manager for Lacey’s Angels. Her blend of charisma and in-ring ability made her a standout performer, contributing to both the women’s division and storylines involving factions like The Age of the Fall.

Lacey’s Angels (Lacey’s faction with Jimmy Jacobs, BJ Whitmer, and others)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2007, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: Jacobs’ Contra Code (Shiranui), Whitmer’s Exploder Suplex, Tandem Suplex.
Brief description: Lacey’s Angels were a heel faction led by Lacey, focused on creating chaos and elevating her personal interests. The group competed in faction-based storylines and rivalries, showcasing Lacey’s managerial prowess and adding depth to ROH’s mid-card during their tenure.

Lance Archer
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2011, sporadic appearances; 2019-2021, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Blackout (Inverted Crucifix Powerbomb), EBD Claw (Iron Claw Slam), Chokeslam.
Brief description: Lance Archer competed in ROH as part of his work with NJPW. Initially appearing in 2011 as part of the NJPW-ROH partnership, Archer returned in later years, showcasing his dominance in both singles and tag team matches. His size and agility made him a standout in any match he participated in.

Lance Bravado
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2010-2015, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and teamwork-focused.
Signature moves: Gentleman’s Agreement (Double Team Suplex with Harlem Bravado), Superkick, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Lance Bravado, as one-half of The Bravado Brothers with Harlem Bravado, competed in ROH’s tag team division. Known for their clean-cut personas and solid in-ring skills, the Bravado Brothers were a polished team that earned respect for their consistent performances in tag matches.

Lancelot Bravado (alternate name for Lance Bravado)
Brief description: Refer to the profile of Lance Bravado.

Lance Storm
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2009-2011, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Single-Leg Boston Crab, Superkick, Rolling Half Crab.
Brief description: Lance Storm made appearances in ROH as a legendary technician, competing in select matches against stars like Chris Hero. His presence brought credibility and nostalgia to ROH events, highlighting his enduring skill and status as a veteran of the business.

Larry Sweeney
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2009, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Manager and faction leader.
Wrestling style: Comedy and brawling.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Managerial Distraction Spots.
Brief description: Larry Sweeney was a charismatic manager and leader of Sweet & Sour Inc., a faction that included stars like Chris Hero and Sara Del Rey. Known for his larger-than-life personality, Sweeney’s antics and promo skills made him a memorable figure in ROH, contributing both in and out of the ring.

Latin American Exchange (LAX)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and brawling.
Signature moves: Street Sweeper (Powerbomb/Blockbuster Combo), Superkick, Suicide Dive.
Brief description: LAX, primarily represented by Santana and Ortiz, appeared in ROH as part of its partnership with other promotions. Known for their intense style and creative double-team maneuvers, they delivered exciting matches that added depth to ROH’s tag team division during their appearances.

Lee Moriarty
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2023-present, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and technical division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Border City Stretch (Arm Trap Crossface), Hammerlock Lariat, Spinning Enzuigiri.
Brief description: Lee Moriarty brought his technical prowess to ROH under AEW’s management, competing in singles and faction-based matches. Known for his innovative grappling style and smooth transitions, Moriarty quickly established himself as a rising star in the promotion’s reimagined roster.

Leon St. Giovanni (LSG)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Rocket Bye Baby (Double-Team Suplex with Shaheem Ali), Starjammer (Springboard Elbow Drop), Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Leon St. Giovanni was one-half of Coast 2 Coast with Shaheem Ali, a tag team known for their high-energy performances and innovative tandem offense. While they struggled to break into the championship scene, LSG became a fan favorite for his resilience and athleticism, later transitioning into singles competition.

Leyla Hirsch
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2021, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: Submission and technical.
Signature moves: Cross Armbar, German Suplex, Moonsault.
Brief description: Leyla Hirsch appeared in ROH’s Women’s Division during its revitalization, showcasing her unique blend of technical wrestling and submission mastery. Though her tenure was brief, she brought a level of intensity and legitimacy to the division’s matches.

Lifeblood (Juice Robinson, Bandido, Mark Haskins, Tenille Dashwood, Tracy Williams, and David Finlay)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019-2020, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical, high-flying, and submission-based (varied based on members).
Signature moves: Bandido’s 21-Plex (German Suplex off the Ropes), Juice Robinson’s Pulp Friction (Double Underhook Facebuster), Tracy Williams’ Piledriver.
Brief description: Lifeblood was a faction formed with the mission of revitalizing ROH’s focus on pure wrestling. With a mix of international stars and rising talent, they participated in faction-based rivalries, multi-man tag matches, and singles bouts, helping to add depth and excitement to ROH’s roster during their time.

Lio Rush
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2017, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and prospect.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Rush Hour (Springboard Stunner), Dragon’s Call (Frog Splash), Suicide Dive.
Brief description: Lio Rush quickly became a breakout star in ROH after winning the 2016 Top Prospect Tournament. Known for his lightning-fast offense and charisma, Rush delivered standout matches against stars like Jay Lethal and Marty Scurll. His exciting style and rapid ascent made him one of the promotion’s most promising young talents during his tenure.

Loc
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2006, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and hardcore matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling and hardcore.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Powerbomb, Chair-assisted DDT.
Brief description: Loc was one-half of the Carnage Crew, a tag team known for their brutal, hardcore style. Competing in numerous violent matches and feuds, Loc and his partner DeVito became staples of ROH’s hardcore matches during its early years, providing gritty entertainment and memorable rivalries.

Los Ingobernables de Japon
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; special attractions.
Wrestling style: High-flying, technical, and brawling.
Signature moves: Naito’s Destino (Spinning Reverse DDT), Takahashi’s Time Bomb (Fireman’s Carry Driver), BUSHI’s MX (Diving Codebreaker).
Brief description: Los Ingobernables de Japon (LIJ), led by Tetsuya Naito, appeared in ROH as part of the NJPW-ROH partnership. Featuring stars like Naito, Hiromu Takahashi, and BUSHI, LIJ brought their unique blend of chaos and skill to ROH events, competing in high-profile tag matches and showcasing their international appeal.

Low Ki
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2006, regular appearances; 2008, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and ROH World Champion.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: Ki Krusher (Fisherman Driver), Warrior’s Way (Double Foot Stomp), Dragon Clutch.
Brief description: Low Ki was one of the foundational figures of ROH, competing in the main event of ROH’s inaugural show and becoming the first-ever ROH World Champion. Known for his intense style and realistic strikes, Low Ki delivered classic matches against stars like Bryan Danielson, Samoa Joe, and AJ Styles, playing a critical role in establishing ROH’s reputation for high-quality wrestling.

LSG (Leon St. Giovanni)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Starjammer (Springboard Elbow Drop), Tornado DDT, Rocket Bye Baby (Double-Team Suplex with Shaheem Ali).
Brief description: As one-half of Coast 2 Coast with Shaheem Ali, LSG competed in ROH’s tag team division, showcasing his athleticism and innovative offense. Later transitioning to singles competition, LSG became a fan favorite for his resilience and ability to adapt to different match styles.

Lucha Brothers (Penta El Zero M and Rey Fenix)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and special attractions.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre.
Signature moves: Fear Factor (Package Piledriver/Diving Double Stomp Combo), Double Superkick, Fenix’s Rolling Cutter.
Brief description: The Lucha Brothers competed in ROH as part of their partnership with AEW and other promotions, showcasing their incredible athleticism and high-flying offense. Their brief tenure included thrilling tag team matches that highlighted their innovative style and international star power.

Luke Hawx
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical.
Signature moves: Diving Leg Drop, Spinebuster, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Luke Hawx competed in ROH during its early years, showcasing his aggressive style in singles and tag team matches. While his appearances were limited, he contributed to the depth of the roster during the promotion’s formative years.

Mafia (Dan Maff’s earlier name in ROH as part of Da Hit Squad)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2005, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Burning Hammer, Cannonball Senton, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Competing as Mafia in the early years of ROH, Dan Maff was one-half of Da Hit Squad, a dominant tag team known for their physical and hardcore style. The team participated in several notable matches, helping to define ROH’s tag team division in its infancy.

Mandy Leon
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2022, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Astral Projection (Modified Neckbreaker), Paradise Lock, Moonsault.
Brief description: Mandy Leon was a cornerstone of the Women of Honor division, competing in singles and tag team matches. Known for her charisma and in-ring ability, she participated in notable feuds and tournaments, playing a significant role in developing the women’s division in ROH.

Marcos
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2006, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and comedic act.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Double-Team Suplex, Springboard Dropkick, Moonsault.
Brief description: Marcos was one-half of The Ring Crew Express with Dunn, a tag team known for their lighthearted and entertaining style. Despite their underdog status, the duo gained popularity for their spirited performances in ROH’s tag team division, often competing against top teams.

Maria Kanellis
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2015, 2021-2022, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Manager and Women’s division.
Wrestling style: Managerial interference with occasional in-ring action.
Signature moves: Superkick, Facebuster, Slap.
Brief description: Maria Kanellis was an integral part of ROH as the manager of The Kingdom (Matt Taven and Mike Bennett). Her presence added a dynamic layer to the faction’s storylines. Maria later returned to ROH to help oversee the development of the women’s division, playing a pivotal role in promoting and organizing the ROH Women’s World Championship Tournament in 2021.

Mark Briscoe
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2023, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical.
Signature moves: Froggy Bow (Diving Elbow Drop), Cutthroat Driver (Spinning Death Valley Driver), Spicolli Driver.
Brief description: Mark Briscoe, as one-half of The Briscoe Brothers with his brother Jay Briscoe, was a cornerstone of ROH for over two decades. Together, they became the most decorated tag team in ROH history, capturing the ROH World Tag Team Championships a record 13 times. Mark also competed in singles matches, known for his wild charisma and high-risk offense. His contributions helped shape ROH’s identity and legacy.

Mark Haskins
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Star Armbar (Omoplata Crossface), Death Valley Driver, Bridging Suplex.
Brief description: Mark Haskins joined ROH as part of the Lifeblood faction, bringing his fast-paced technical wrestling style to the promotion. Known for his gritty determination and ability to adapt, Haskins competed in singles and tag team matches, delivering standout performances against top stars in ROH.

Marty Scurll
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and faction leader.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Crossface Chicken Wing, Black Plague (Swinging Neckbreaker), Superkick to a Kneeling Opponent.
Brief description: Marty Scurll, "The Villain," quickly became one of ROH’s most prominent stars after debuting in 2016. A former ROH World Television Champion, Scurll’s charisma and in-ring skill made him a fan favorite. As a member and later leader of Villain Enterprises, Scurll played a pivotal role in faction rivalries and main-event storylines, solidifying his legacy as a key figure in ROH during his tenure.

Masada
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2005, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and hardcore matches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, Masadamizer (Double Underhook Piledriver), Suplex variations.
Brief description: Masada brought a hardcore edge to ROH during his appearances, often participating in violent and stipulation-heavy matches. Known for his toughness and resilience, Masada added variety to the ROH roster with his willingness to endure punishment in intense bouts.

Masato Yoshino
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006, guest appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Lightning Spiral (Rolling Cutter), Sol Naciente (Arm Trap Submission), Torbellino (Tornado DDT).
Brief description: Masato Yoshino appeared in ROH as part of the Dragon Gate collaboration, participating in the legendary "Supercard of Honor" 2006 match between Blood Generation and Do FIXER. His speed and innovative offense made him a standout in one of the most celebrated matches in wrestling history.

Masato Tanaka
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005, special appearance.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Striking and hardcore.
Signature moves: Roaring Elbow, Diamond Dust (Flipping Stunner), Sliding D.
Brief description: Masato Tanaka made a rare ROH appearance during the promotion’s collaboration with international talent. A renowned hardcore wrestler, Tanaka brought his signature hard-hitting style to the promotion, competing in a memorable match that highlighted his veteran status and intensity.

Matt Cross
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007-2010, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, Handspring Back Elbow, Moonsault.
Brief description: Matt Cross, known for his agility and innovative offense, competed in singles and tag team matches in ROH. A highlight of his tenure was as a member of The Resilience faction, where he participated in faction-based rivalries and showcased his high-flying style in competitive matches.

Matt Hardy
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005, sporadic appearances; 2013-2015, sporadic appearances; 2017, guest appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team division, and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: Twist of Fate, Side Effect, Diving Leg Drop.
Brief description: Matt Hardy competed in ROH across several eras, initially appearing in 2005 and returning in 2013 as a heel aligned with S.C.U.M. He later teamed with his brother Jeff Hardy during their “Broken Hardys” run, capturing the ROH World Tag Team Championships in 2017. Hardy’s versatility and star power contributed to ROH’s tag and singles divisions.

Matt Jackson (of The Young Bucks)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2009-2010, 2014-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and main event.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Meltzer Driver (Springboard Assisted Piledriver), Superkick, Indytaker (Spike Tombstone).
Brief description: Matt Jackson, alongside his brother Nick as The Young Bucks, became one of the most iconic tag teams in ROH history. Known for their innovative offense and charisma, The Young Bucks were multi-time ROH World Tag Team Champions. Their matches against teams like The Briscoes and reDRagon were among the highlights of ROH’s modern era, cementing their legacy as one of the best tag teams in wrestling history.

Matt Sydal
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004-2007, regular appearances; 2015-2016, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, Cyclorama (Top Rope Belly-to-Belly Suplex), Standing Moonsault.
Brief description: Matt Sydal was a high-flying sensation in ROH, known for his innovative offense and exciting matches. He teamed with Christopher Daniels and Delirious during his tenure, competing in both singles and tag team matches. Sydal’s agility and charisma made him a fan favorite and a key contributor to ROH’s early growth.

Matt Taven
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2012-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event, tag team division, and ROH World Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Climax (Headlock Driver), Just the Tip (Knee Strike), Frog Splash.
Brief description: Matt Taven is one of the most decorated stars in ROH history. A former ROH World Champion, ROH World Tag Team Champion, and ROH World Six-Man Tag Team Champion, Taven made his mark as a singles competitor and as the leader of The Kingdom faction. His 2019 ROH World Championship victory at G1 Supercard in Madison Square Garden remains a highlight of his career, solidifying his legacy as a cornerstone of ROH.

Matt Striker
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2005, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Golden Rule (Inverted Death Valley Driver), STF, Figure Four Leglock.
Brief description: Matt Striker competed in ROH during its formative years, showcasing his technical wrestling ability in singles matches. Known for his methodical approach and submission prowess, Striker contributed to the depth of ROH’s mid-card scene.

Matt Stryker
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2004, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Pure Division competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Stryker Lock (Modified Cloverleaf), German Suplex, Snap Suplex.
Brief description: Matt Stryker was a prominent figure in the early ROH Pure Division, known for his technical expertise and methodical wrestling style. He competed in several Pure Rules matches, delivering solid performances against stars like Nigel McGuinness and showcasing the spirit of pure wrestling.

Max Buck (later known as Matt Jackson of The Young Bucks)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2009-2010, 2014-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and main event.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Meltzer Driver (Springboard Assisted Piledriver), Superkick, Indytaker (Spike Tombstone).
Brief description: Max Buck, competing as part of The Young Bucks with his brother Nick Buck, became one of the most iconic tag teams in ROH history. They were multi-time ROH World Tag Team Champions and delivered some of the promotion's most memorable matches against teams like The Briscoes and reDRagon, cementing their legacy as one of the best tag teams in ROH’s history.

Max The Impaler
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Into Oblivion (Backbreaker Rack into a Slam), Spear, Running Body Block.
Brief description: Max The Impaler debuted in the revitalized Women’s Division during ROH’s later years. Known for their monstrous persona and sheer dominance, Max brought a unique character to the roster, competing in matches that showcased their power and intensity.

Mayu Iwatani
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division and special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Moonsault, Dragon Suplex, Running Double Knees.
Brief description: Mayu Iwatani was a key part of ROH’s partnership with Stardom, competing in the Women of Honor division. She captured the Women of Honor World Championship in 2019, becoming one of the top stars of the division. Her matches brought international attention to the women’s division, showcasing her exceptional in-ring ability.

Mercedes Martinez
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006, sporadic appearances; 2021-2022, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division and ROH Women’s World Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: Brass City Sleeper (Guillotine Choke), Fisherman Buster, Surfboard Stretch.
Brief description: Mercedes Martinez appeared in ROH’s early years and later returned as a prominent figure in the reestablished women’s division. She captured the ROH Women’s World Championship in 2022 and competed in high-profile matches, showcasing her veteran experience and toughness while elevating the division.

MexiSquad (Bandido, Flamita, and Rey Horus)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2020-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and ROH World Six-Man Tag Team Champions.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre.
Signature moves: 21-Plex (Bandido), Flam Fly (Flamita’s Tilt-a-Whirl Cutter), Rey Horus’ Tornillo.
Brief description: MexiSquad brought their high-energy lucha libre style to ROH, capturing the ROH World Six-Man Tag Team Championships. Known for their dynamic teamwork and aerial maneuvers, they delivered thrilling performances against other top factions, solidifying their legacy in the six-man tag division.

Michael Bennett
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2011-2015, regular appearances; 2020-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based.
Signature moves: Hail Mary (Spike Piledriver with Matt Taven), Box Office Smash (Fireman’s Carry into Cutter), Spear.
Brief description: Michael Bennett was a prominent member of The Kingdom alongside Matt Taven and Maria Kanellis, capturing the ROH World Tag Team and World Six-Man Tag Team Championships. Known for his charisma and in-ring versatility, Bennett returned to ROH in 2020, reuniting with Taven to reestablish their dominance in the tag division.

Michael Elgin
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2010-2016, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and ROH World Champion.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical.
Signature moves: Elgin Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Buckle Bomb, Spinning Backfist.
Brief description: Michael Elgin rose to prominence in ROH with his incredible strength and workhorse mentality. As a member of The House of Truth, Elgin delivered standout performances in matches against stars like Kevin Steen and Jay Lethal. He captured the ROH World Championship in 2014, solidifying his place among ROH’s top-tier competitors.

Michael Shane
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Picture Perfect Elbow (Diving Elbow Drop), Sweet Shane Music (Superkick), Backbreaker.
Brief description: Michael Shane was a notable competitor in ROH’s early years, participating in hard-hitting matches against talents like Paul London. Known for his charisma and Shawn Michaels-inspired style, Shane contributed to the promotion’s early focus on exciting in-ring action.

Mike Bennett
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2011-2015, regular appearances; 2020-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based.
Signature moves: Hail Mary (Spike Piledriver with Matt Taven), Box Office Smash (Fireman’s Carry into Cutter), Spear.
Brief description: Mike Bennett was a key member of The Kingdom alongside Matt Taven and Maria Kanellis. He captured the ROH World Tag Team and World Six-Man Tag Team Championships, participating in numerous high-profile matches. Bennett’s second run in ROH saw him reuniting with Taven to deliver standout performances in the tag team division.

Mike Mondo
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2011-2013, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical.
Signature moves: No Fear DDT (Lifting Double Underhook DDT), Running Bulldog, Snap Suplex.
Brief description: Mike Mondo, a former WWE talent, brought his "No Fear" attitude to ROH. Competing in both singles and multi-man matches, Mondo showcased his fiery persona and resilience in bouts against stars like Kevin Steen and Adam Cole. His energetic style and promos made him a unique presence during his tenure.

Mike Quackenbush
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Quackendriver (Sit-Out Scoop Slam Driver), Lightning Lock (Modified Submission), Top Rope Hurricanrana.
Brief description: Mike Quackenbush appeared in ROH during its early years, bringing his technical expertise and innovative offense to the promotion. Known for his work in CHIKARA, Quackenbush participated in both singles and tag team matches, contributing to ROH’s reputation for showcasing diverse wrestling styles.

Mike Sydal
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2010-2013, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Standing Moonsault, Tornado DDT, Dropkick.
Brief description: The younger brother of Matt Sydal, Mike Sydal competed in ROH’s tag team division and undercard. Known for his athleticism and high-flying abilities, Sydal participated in multi-man matches and contributed to the promotion’s depth during his appearances.

Mikey Nicholls
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical.
Signature moves: Mikey Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Spinebuster, Frog Splash.
Brief description: Mikey Nicholls appeared in ROH as part of the NJPW-ROH partnership, competing in tag team and multi-man matches. Known for his strength and teamwork, Nicholls added international flavor to the roster during his tenure.

Milano Collection AT
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2007, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Technical and innovative.
Signature moves: Paradise Lock (Leg Lock Submission), Armani Shoe Exchange (Flying Forearm), Italian Stretch #32 (Modified Armbar).
Brief description: Milano Collection AT was a standout performer during ROH’s collaboration with Dragon Gate, bringing his unique character and technical wrestling expertise to the promotion. Known for his stylish persona and impressive in-ring skills, Milano delivered memorable performances in singles and multi-man matches.

Minnesota Home Wrecking Crew (Lacey and Rain)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2007, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division and faction members.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Running Forearm, Corner Splash.
Brief description: The Minnesota Home Wrecking Crew was a dominant tag team in the Women of Honor division. Managed by Lacey, the team showcased strong chemistry and participated in faction-based storylines alongside Lacey’s Angels. Their blend of technical and brawling styles made them standout competitors in the division.

Minoru Suzuki
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Striking and submission-based.
Signature moves: Gotch-Style Piledriver, Sleeper Hold, Armbar.
Brief description: Minoru Suzuki appeared in ROH during the Death Before Dishonor XV event as part of ROH’s partnership with NJPW. Competing in a high-profile match against Cody Rhodes for the ROH World Championship, Suzuki brought his legendary aura and hard-hitting style to the promotion, captivating audiences.

Miranda Alize
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking.
Signature moves: Drive-By (Running Knee Strike), Cutter, Tilt-a-Whirl DDT.
Brief description: Miranda Alize was a finalist in the ROH Women’s World Championship Tournament in 2021, delivering standout matches that highlighted her agility and charisma. Known for her fiery persona and in-ring versatility, she played a significant role in the revitalized Women of Honor division.

Mistico (later known as Carístico)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2011, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre.
Signature moves: La Mistica (Tilt-a-Whirl Armbar), Springboard Moonsault, Tornillo.
Brief description: Mistico competed in ROH as part of the promotion’s partnership with CMLL, showcasing his iconic lucha libre style in special attraction matches. Known as one of the most celebrated luchadores of his generation, Mistico’s appearances brought international appeal and excitement to the ROH ring.

Mitch Franklin
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2007, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Diving Crossbody, Springboard Dropkick, Small Package Roll-Up.
Brief description: Mitch Franklin was a graduate of the ROH Wrestling Academy, competing in undercard matches to showcase his growing skills. Known for his resilience and energy, Franklin contributed to ROH’s developmental system during its early years.

Mogul Embassy
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2023-present, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical (varied based on members).
Signature moves: Double-Team Spinebuster, Lariat, Chokeslam.
Brief description: The Mogul Embassy, led by Prince Nana, is a modern iteration of The Embassy faction, featuring members like Kaun, Toa Liona, and Brian Cage. Dominating ROH’s tag and six-man tag divisions, the group continues the legacy of Prince Nana’s vision of wealth and destruction, capturing championships and asserting faction dominance.

Monsta Mack
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2004, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Cannonball Senton, Spinebuster, Running Splash.
Brief description: Monsta Mack was one-half of Da Hit Squad alongside Dan Maff, a physically dominant tag team that competed in ROH’s early years. Known for their hardcore and hard-hitting style, Da Hit Squad participated in brutal matches and were key players in shaping the promotion’s tag division.

Monster Mafia (Ethan Page and Josh Alexander)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical.
Signature moves: Assisted Spinebuster, Double Suplex, Powerbomb/Neckbreaker Combo.
Brief description: Monster Mafia competed in ROH’s tag team division, showcasing their strength and cohesion as a team. While their appearances were limited, the team delivered competitive performances, demonstrating their potential as a powerhouse duo.

Moose
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2016, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and main event.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and athletic.
Signature moves: Spear, Go to Hell (Sit-Out Chokeslam), Discus Clothesline.
Brief description: Moose transitioned from professional football to wrestling, quickly becoming a standout in ROH. His combination of size, speed, and charisma made him a fan favorite, competing in high-profile matches and feuds against stars like Roderick Strong and Cedric Alexander. Moose’s rise in ROH established him as one of the promotion’s top heavyweights.

Moses
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Double Powerbomb (with Kaun), Running Splash, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Moses was one-half of Soldiers of Savagery (SOS) alongside Kaun, competing as part of Shane Taylor Promotions. The duo captured the ROH World Six-Man Tag Team Championships and brought a physical, no-nonsense style to the division, solidifying their place in ROH’s tag team scene.

Motor City Machine Guns (Alex Shelley and Chris Sabin)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2008, sporadic appearances; 2017, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and special attractions.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Made in Detroit (Sliced Bread #2/Powerbomb Combo), Skull and Bones (Diving Crossbody/Neckbreaker Combo), Superkick.
Brief description: The Motor City Machine Guns were a highlight of ROH’s tag team division during their tenure. Known for their seamless chemistry and innovative double-team offense, Shelley and Sabin delivered classic matches against teams like The Briscoes and The Young Bucks, earning critical acclaim and fan adoration.

Mr. Ernesto Osiris
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007-2010, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Manager and lower card.
Wrestling style: Comedic and brawling.
Signature moves: Interference spots, Chair Shots, Low Blows.
Brief description: Mr. Ernesto Osiris served as a member of Prince Nana’s Embassy faction, often playing the role of a henchman and comedic character. While primarily a manager and enforcer, Osiris occasionally competed in matches, contributing to the faction’s chaotic antics and heel presence.

MsChif
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2011, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and unorthodox.
Signature moves: Desecrator (Inverted DDT), Green Mist, Standing Moonsault.
Brief description: MsChif was a standout in ROH’s Women of Honor division, bringing her unique gothic persona and unorthodox in-ring style to matches. She competed against top names in women’s wrestling, leaving a lasting impression with her creative offense and distinct character.

MVP
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2011, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical.
Signature moves: Playmaker (Overdrive), Drive-By Kick (Running Big Boot), Ballin’ Elbow.
Brief description: MVP competed in ROH following his departure from WWE, participating in matches that highlighted his star power and versatility. His brief stint added a level of mainstream recognition to the promotion during his appearances.

Naomichi Marufuji
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2007, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Shiranui (Sliced Bread #2), Tiger Flowsion (Modified Driver), Superkick.
Brief description: Naomichi Marufuji was a key figure in ROH’s partnership with Pro Wrestling NOAH. Known for his innovative offense and technical brilliance, Marufuji competed in classic matches against ROH’s top stars, including Nigel McGuinness and Bryan Danielson. His presence elevated ROH’s international reputation.

Naruki Doi
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2007, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Bakatare Sliding Kick, Doi 555 (Fireman’s Carry into Flapjack), Muscular Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb).
Brief description: Naruki Doi appeared in ROH during its partnership with Dragon Gate, participating in acclaimed multi-man tag matches. His appearances in bouts such as the legendary Dragon Gate Rules match at Supercard of Honor cemented his place in ROH’s history as a high-energy performer.

Nate Webb
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and hardcore.
Signature moves: Moonsault, Webb of Death (Tornado DDT), Suicide Dive.
Brief description: Nate Webb, known for his charisma and innovative style, competed in early ROH events. While his appearances were sporadic, he entertained fans with his unorthodox offense and energetic personality, adding variety to the promotion’s roster.

Natural Born Sinners (Homicide and Boogalou)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Brawling and hardcore.
Signature moves: Cop Killa (Homicide’s Vertebreaker), Double-Team Suplex, Chair Shots.
Brief description: The Natural Born Sinners were a hardcore tag team that brought an intense and violent edge to ROH’s early years. Known for their gritty persona and unrelenting style, the team participated in memorable matches that showcased their willingness to push boundaries in the tag team division.

Necro Butcher
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2009, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Hardcore matches and faction member.
Wrestling style: Brawling and hardcore.
Signature moves: Tiger Driver, Chokeslam, Death Valley Driver.
Brief description: Necro Butcher became a cult favorite in ROH for his wild, hardcore matches and unorthodox style. As a member of The Age of the Fall, he participated in faction warfare and brutal stipulation matches, leaving a lasting impression as one of wrestling’s most fearless competitors.

New and Improved Carnage Crew (Loc, DeVito, and Justin Credible)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004-2005, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and hardcore matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling and hardcore.
Signature moves: Double Team Suplex, Spike Piledriver, Chair-Assisted DDT.
Brief description: The New and Improved Carnage Crew brought an even more intense and violent approach to ROH’s tag team scene. With the addition of Justin Credible, the group participated in feuds that often involved hardcore stipulations, solidifying their legacy as one of ROH’s toughest teams.

Nick Jackson (of The Young Bucks)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2009-2010, 2014-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and main event.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Meltzer Driver (Springboard Assisted Piledriver with Matt Jackson), Indytaker (Spike Tombstone), More Bang for Your Buck (Double-Team Sequence).
Brief description: Nick Jackson, as one-half of The Young Bucks with his brother Matt Jackson, became one of the most iconic tag teams in ROH history. Known for their innovative and fast-paced offense, The Young Bucks won multiple ROH World Tag Team Championships and delivered classic matches against teams like The Briscoes and reDRagon. Their influence on ROH and tag team wrestling is undeniable.

Nicole Savoy
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2021, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Savolock (Butterfly Lock), Dragon Suplex, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Nicole Savoy appeared in ROH’s revitalized Women’s Division, competing in the ROH Women’s World Championship Tournament. Known for her technical prowess and grappling ability, she delivered standout performances that added credibility and depth to the women’s roster during her tenure.

Nigel McGuinness
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2009, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and ROH Pure Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Tower of London (Rope-Assisted Cutter), Jawbreaker Lariat, Headstand Kick.
Brief description: Nigel McGuinness is one of ROH’s most celebrated stars, having held both the ROH World Championship and the ROH Pure Championship. Known for his incredible technical skills and hard-hitting style, McGuinness delivered legendary matches against stars like Bryan Danielson and Austin Aries. His long reigns and classic bouts solidified him as one of the greatest competitors in ROH history.

Ninja Mack
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2022-present, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: High-flyer and special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and unorthodox.
Signature moves: Ninja Bomb (450 Splash), Handspring Backflip Kick, Moonsault.
Brief description: Ninja Mack brought his unique and acrobatic style to ROH following its 2022 relaunch under AEW management. Known for his high-risk maneuvers and dynamic performances, he quickly became a fan favorite in ROH’s evolving roster.

No Remorse Corps (Roderick Strong, Davey Richards, and Rocky Romero)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007-2008, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Stronghold (Elevated Boston Crab by Roderick Strong), Richards’ DR Driver (Brainbuster), Romero’s Armbar Submission.
Brief description: The No Remorse Corps was a hard-hitting heel faction that focused on intense rivalries and faction warfare. Led by Roderick Strong, the group had memorable feuds with The Resilience and other top ROH teams. Their matches emphasized technical precision and brutality, making them a standout faction during their tenure.

Nosawa
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2005, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: Roundhouse Kick, Death Valley Driver, Crossface.
Brief description: Nosawa appeared in ROH as part of its collaboration with Japanese promotions. Known for his charisma and unpredictable style, he competed in tag team and singles matches, showcasing his talent to international audiences.

O’Shay Edwards
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction member and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Powerslam, Spinebuster, Lariat.
Brief description: O’Shay Edwards was a member of Shane Taylor Promotions, contributing to the faction’s dominance in ROH’s six-man tag team division. Known for his strength and explosive offense, Edwards helped the group secure victories and maintain their position as a top faction in the promotion.

OGK (Matt Taven and Mike Bennett)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2015, regular appearances; 2020-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and main event.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Proton Pack (Backpack Stunner/Powerbomb Combo), Hail Mary (Spike Piledriver), Superkick.
Brief description: The OGK (Original Kingdom) was a tag team within The Kingdom faction, led by Matt Taven and Mike Bennett. Together, they captured the ROH World Tag Team Championships and participated in numerous high-profile matches. Their reunion in 2020 revitalized the tag team division, further solidifying their legacy in ROH.

Oman Tortuga
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and lower card.
Wrestling style: Brawling and comedic.
Signature moves: Double Axe Handle, Suplex, Running Clothesline.
Brief description: Oman Tortuga, as one-half of The Outcast Killaz with Diablo Santiago, competed in ROH’s tag team division during the promotion’s early years. Primarily used in comedic and undercard roles, the team contributed to ROH’s diverse roster and added levity to events.

Ortiz
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and brawling.
Signature moves: Street Sweeper (Powerbomb/Blockbuster Combo with Santana), Superkick, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Ortiz appeared in ROH as part of LAX (Latin American Exchange) during the promotion’s partnership with Impact Wrestling. Known for his energetic and hard-hitting style, Ortiz competed in tag matches that brought excitement and intensity to ROH events.

Osirian Portal (Ophidian and Amasis)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2008, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Egyptian Destroyer (Double Team Flipping Piledriver), Hypnosis Spot (Comedic "Hypnosis"), 450 Splash.
Brief description: Osirian Portal made limited appearances in ROH, showcasing their unique Egyptian-themed gimmick and innovative offense. Known for their mix of comedy and athleticism, the team added a distinct flavor to ROH’s tag division during their brief tenure.

Outcast Killaz (Diablo Santiago and Oman Tortuga)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and lower card.
Wrestling style: Brawling and comedic.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Corner Clothesline, Double Axe Handle.
Brief description: The Outcast Killaz were a comedic tag team that frequently appeared in ROH’s early years. While primarily used in undercard roles, their entertaining antics and chemistry added variety to ROH’s tag team division, earning them a place in the promotion’s formative history.

Outlaw Inc. (Homicide and Eddie Kingston)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2013-2014, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Brawling and hardcore.
Signature moves: Cop Killa (Homicide’s Vertebreaker), Backfist to the Future (Eddie Kingston’s Spinning Backfist), Double-Team Suplex.
Brief description: Outlaw Inc. brought their tough, no-nonsense style to ROH’s tag team division, engaging in feuds with teams like reDRagon and The Briscoes. Known for their intensity and grit, Homicide and Kingston were a formidable pair during their time in ROH.

PAC (formerly Neville in WWE)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Black Arrow (Corkscrew Shooting Star Press), Brutalizer (Rings of Saturn), Springboard Moonsault.
Brief description: PAC competed in ROH during its early collaborations with international promotions, showcasing his incredible athleticism and high-flying style. Known as one of the best aerial performers in the world, PAC delivered exciting performances that highlighted his potential as a global wrestling star.

Paul London
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances; 2013, guest appearance.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: London Calling (Shooting Star Press), Dragon Suplex, Dropsault.
Brief description: Paul London was one of ROH’s breakout stars during its early years, delivering thrilling high-flying performances. His matches against Bryan Danielson and Michael Shane were highlights of his tenure. London briefly returned in 2013 to face Davey Richards, showcasing his incredible talent and connection with the ROH audience.

PCO
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and ROH World Champion.
Wrestling style: Brawling and powerhouse.
Signature moves: PCO-sault (Moonsault), Package Piledriver, Quebec Cannonball.
Brief description: PCO reinvented himself as a monster character in ROH, capturing the ROH World Championship in 2019. As a member of Villain Enterprises, he participated in faction wars and multi-man matches, bringing a mix of chaos and unpredictability to ROH’s main event scene. His career resurgence became one of ROH’s most talked-about stories during this period.

Pelle Primeau
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2008, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and underdog.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Springboard Crossbody, Diving Dropkick, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Pelle Primeau was a scrappy underdog in ROH’s roster, often competing in multi-man matches and lower-card bouts. Despite his small stature, Primeau connected with fans through his perseverance and high-energy performances. He also earned recognition as part of the ROH Wrestling Academy’s alumni.

Penta El Zero Miedo
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017-2018, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre and striking.
Signature moves: Fear Factor (Package Piledriver), Pentagon Driver (Pumphandle Half Nelson Driver), Sling Blade.
Brief description: Penta El Zero Miedo, competing with his brother Rey Fénix as the Lucha Brothers, brought their high-octane lucha libre style to ROH. Known for their exciting double-team maneuvers and intense rivalries, the Lucha Brothers delivered standout performances in tag team matches, elevating the division during their appearances.

Petey Williams
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2008, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Canadian Destroyer (Flip Piledriver), Sharpshooter, Tilt-a-Whirl Headscissors.
Brief description: Petey Williams, best known for his innovative Canadian Destroyer finisher, competed in ROH during his career's peak. While his appearances were limited, he showcased his exciting and fast-paced style, delivering memorable performances in multi-man and singles matches.

PJ Black (formerly Justin Gabriel in WWE)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Pure Division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: 450 Splash, Springboard Clothesline, Crucifix Bomb.
Brief description: PJ Black joined ROH as a veteran talent, competing in the Pure Division and singles matches. Known for his high-flying abilities and smooth in-ring style, Black participated in tournaments and rivalries that highlighted his versatility, adding depth to ROH’s roster.

Player Dos (later known as Stu Grayson of The Dark Order)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2009-2010, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and power-based.
Signature moves: Fatality (Double-Team Gory Bomb/Blockbuster with Player Uno), Moonsault, Springboard Dropkick.
Brief description: Player Dos competed in ROH as part of the Super Smash Bros tag team with Player Uno. Known for their innovative double-team moves and high-energy performances, the duo contributed to ROH’s tag team division with their unique style and dynamic offense.

Player Uno (later known as Evil Uno of The Dark Order)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2009-2010, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and innovative.
Signature moves: Fatality (Double-Team Gory Bomb/Blockbuster with Player Dos), Pumphandle Reverse STO, Senton Splash.
Brief description: Player Uno, as part of the Super Smash Bros with Player Dos, brought a unique and creative energy to ROH’s tag team division. Known for their fun yet competitive style, the team left an impression with their innovative double-team maneuvers and dynamic in-ring chemistry.

Portia Perez
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2010, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Superkick, Snap Suplex, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Portia Perez competed in ROH’s Women of Honor division, showcasing her technical prowess and charismatic presence. Known for her blend of skill and heel antics, Perez participated in several notable matches during her tenure in ROH’s early women’s division.

Pretty Boy Killers (Shane Taylor and Keith Lee)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2017, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Ground Zero (Double Team Sit-Out Chokebomb), Pounce, Spinebuster.
Brief description: The Pretty Boy Killers (PBK) dominated the ROH tag team division with their raw power and destructive offense. Shane Taylor and Keith Lee delivered impressive performances against teams like War Machine and The Briscoes, showcasing their strength and chemistry before transitioning to singles success.

Primal Fear
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2021, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team and six-man tag division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and power-based.
Signature moves: Triple-Team Powerbomb, Springboard Cutter, Assisted Suplex.
Brief description: Primal Fear, a trio comprised of Gabriel Hodder, Adrian Soriano, and Matthew Omen, competed in ROH’s tag and six-man divisions. Known for their dark persona and cohesive teamwork, they participated in competitive matches that showcased their potential as a rising faction.

Prince Nana
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2023, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Manager and faction leader.
Wrestling style: Managerial interference with occasional in-ring action.
Signature moves: Managerial Distraction Spots, Low Blows, Chair Interference.
Brief description: Prince Nana is one of ROH’s longest-tenured personalities, known for leading The Embassy, a faction that spanned multiple eras of ROH. As a manager, Nana brought charisma and villainy, guiding talents like Jimmy Rave, Brian Cage, and Kaun to success. His presence provided continuity and added depth to ROH’s storytelling.

The Prophecy (Christopher Daniels, Donovan Morgan, Xavier, and others)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2004, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking (varied based on members).
Signature moves: Best Moonsault Ever (Christopher Daniels), Wrist-Clutch Exploder Suplex (Donovan Morgan), X Breaker (Xavier).
Brief description: The Prophecy, led by Christopher Daniels, was one of the original factions in ROH. Their mission was to disrupt ROH’s Code of Honor while cementing their dominance in the promotion. Members of The Prophecy captured the ROH World Championship and the ROH World Tag Team Championships, contributing significantly to the early years of ROH.

Punishment Martinez (later known as Damian Priest in WWE)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2018, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and ROH World Television Champion.
Wrestling style: Striking and powerhouse.
Signature moves: South of Heaven (Chokeslam), The Reckoning (Rolling Cutter), Suicide Dive.
Brief description: Punishment Martinez was a standout in ROH, capturing the ROH World Television Championship in 2018. Known for his combination of size, speed, and striking ability, Martinez delivered standout matches against stars like Jeff Cobb and Silas Young. His intensity and unique character made him a key player during his tenure.

The Purists (John Walters and Tony Mamaluke)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Dragon Suplex, Guillotine Choke, Bridging Suplex.
Brief description: The Purists focused on technical wrestling and submission mastery, aligning with ROH’s Pure Wrestling ideals. As a tag team, they competed in competitive matches that showcased their grappling expertise, contributing to the foundation of ROH’s Pure Division.

QT Marshall
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2012-2015, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: QT Special (Diving Corkscrew Suplex), Spinebuster, Lariat.
Brief description: QT Marshall competed in ROH as a mid-card wrestler and occasional faction member, aligning with RD Evans and others. Known for his technical skills and ability to work in various roles, Marshall participated in storylines that added depth to ROH’s roster.

Quiet Storm
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and lower card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Storm Cradle Driver (Fisherman Driver), Moonsault, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Quiet Storm appeared in ROH during its early years, competing in tag team and singles matches. Known for his agility and technical ability, he contributed to ROH’s foundation, often participating in competitive undercard bouts.

Quinn McKay
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2020-2022, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Broadcaster and occasional wrestler.
Wrestling style: Technical.
Signature moves: Armbar, Dropkick, Small Package.
Brief description: Quinn McKay primarily served as a backstage interviewer and broadcaster for ROH during its later years. She occasionally stepped into the ring, participating in matches that highlighted her growing skills and connection with the audience. McKay played a key role in promoting the Women’s Division and engaging with fans.

Rain
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2007, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Implant DDT, Running Forearm, Snap Suplex.
Brief description: Rain competed in the Women of Honor division and was part of the Minnesota Home Wrecking Crew alongside Lacey. Known for her heel antics and solid in-ring skills, Rain contributed to the early development of ROH’s women’s wrestling scene.

Rampage Brown
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Doctor Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Spinebuster, Lariat.
Brief description: Rampage Brown made limited appearances in ROH, showcasing his strength and hard-hitting style. Known for his work in the UK scene, Brown competed in singles and multi-man matches, bringing an international flavor to ROH events.

Rasche Brown
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2009-2010, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Burning Hammer, Running Powerslam, Spear.
Brief description: Rasche Brown was a dominant force in ROH’s mid-card, known for his incredible strength and intensity. Competing in both singles and tag matches, he stood out with his powerhouse offense, engaging in memorable rivalries during his tenure.

Raven
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Brawling and psychological.
Signature moves: Raven Effect DDT (Even Flow DDT), Russian Leg Sweep, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Raven brought his signature dark and cerebral style to ROH during its early years. His feud with CM Punk, highlighted by brutal and emotionally charged matches, became one of ROH’s most iconic rivalries. Raven’s presence added depth and star power to the promotion during this era.

Ray Rowe (later known as Raymond Rowe and Erik in WWE)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2013-2018, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and striking.
Signature moves: Death Rowe (Powerbomb into Knee Strike), Exploder Suplex, Spinning Heel Kick.
Brief description: Ray Rowe was one-half of War Machine (later known as The Viking Raiders) alongside Hanson. Together, they captured the ROH World Tag Team Championships and became one of the most dominant tag teams in the promotion’s history. Rowe’s mix of power and agility made him a standout in both singles and tag competition.

RD Evans
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2010-2014, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and manager.
Wrestling style: Technical and comedic.
Signature moves: Crossface, Running Knee Strike, Roll-Up.
Brief description: RD Evans brought a mix of in-ring ability and humor to ROH. Known for his alliance with Veda Scott and his streak gimmick, Evans participated in entertaining matches and storylines that added variety to the promotion. His work as a manager and wrestler highlighted his versatility.

Rebellion (Kenny King, Caprice Coleman, Rhett Titus, and Shane Taylor)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2017, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling (varied based on members).
Signature moves: Royal Flush (Kenny King’s Fireman’s Carry Cutter), Sky Splitter (Caprice Coleman’s Top Rope Leg Drop), Taylor Made (Shane Taylor’s Sit-Out Powerbomb).
Brief description: Rebellion was a faction formed to oppose ROH’s traditional ideals and compete against other prominent teams and factions. Known for their aggressive style and faction warfare, they were heavily involved in tag and six-man tag matches, delivering competitive performances across ROH events.

reDRagon (Bobby Fish and Kyle O’Reilly)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2012-2017, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and main event.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Chasing the Dragon (Brainbuster/Head Kick Combo), Fish Hook (Leglock Submission), Cross Armbar.
Brief description: reDRagon is regarded as one of the greatest tag teams in ROH history. As multi-time ROH World Tag Team Champions, they delivered classic matches against teams like The Young Bucks and The Briscoes. Known for their innovative double-team offense and technical mastery, reDRagon played a pivotal role in elevating ROH’s tag division.

Resilience (Austin Aries, Erick Stevens, and Matt Cross)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: 450 Splash (Austin Aries), Doctor Bomb (Erick Stevens), Shooting Star Press (Matt Cross).
Brief description: The Resilience was a faction led by Austin Aries, formed to counter the No Remorse Corps. Known for their exciting and athletic in-ring style, the group engaged in faction warfare, delivering standout multi-man matches and contributing to ROH’s storylines in 2007.

Rey Fenix
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017-2018, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre.
Signature moves: Black Fire Driver (Samoan Driver), Springboard Tornado DDT, Rolling Cutter.
Brief description: Rey Fenix, as one-half of the Lucha Brothers with Penta El Zero Miedo, brought their breathtaking lucha libre style to ROH. Known for their innovative and acrobatic offense, the Lucha Brothers competed in thrilling matches against top teams, adding international flair and excitement to the promotion.

Rey Horus
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and six-man tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre.
Signature moves: Tornillo, Satellite DDT, Springboard Crossbody.
Brief description: Rey Horus was a key member of MexiSquad alongside Bandido and Flamita. The trio captured the ROH World Six-Man Tag Team Championships and delivered show-stealing performances with their high-energy, high-flying style. Horus also competed in singles matches, further establishing himself as a standout performer in ROH.

Rhett Titus
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2022, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division, mid-card, and ROH World Television Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Thrust Buster (Pumphandle Sit-Out Powerbomb), Cloverleaf.
Brief description: Rhett Titus was a long-time competitor in ROH, initially known for his tag team work as part of The All-Night Express with Kenny King. Later, he transitioned to singles competition, capturing the ROH World Television Championship in 2021. Known for his consistency and dedication, Titus was a reliable and versatile performer throughout his tenure.

Rhino
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2011-2013, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Gore (Spear), Spinebuster, Belly-to-Belly Suplex.
Brief description: Rhino appeared in ROH as an enforcer for S.C.U.M., engaging in faction warfare and high-profile matches. Known for his intensity and hard-hitting style, Rhino brought an element of chaos and unpredictability to ROH during his time with the promotion.

Ricky Marvin
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2007, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Moonsault, Dragon Suplex, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Ricky Marvin appeared in ROH during its collaboration with Pro Wrestling NOAH. Known for his high-flying ability and international experience, Marvin participated in tag team and multi-man matches, adding a dynamic, lucha-inspired style to the ROH roster.

Ricky Morton
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019, guest appearance.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Traditional and technical.
Signature moves: Double Dropkick (with Robert Gibson), Sunset Flip, Bulldog.
Brief description: Ricky Morton, as part of the legendary Rock 'n' Roll Express, made a special appearance in ROH, participating in matches that celebrated the legacy of classic tag team wrestling. His involvement highlighted ROH’s respect for wrestling history and its connection to multiple eras of the sport.

Ricky Reyes
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2008, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Dragon Sleeper, Saito Suplex, Backdrop Driver.
Brief description: Ricky Reyes was a significant part of ROH’s tag team division as a member of The Havana Pitbulls alongside Rocky Romero. The team captured the ROH World Tag Team Championships, delivering standout performances against some of the best tag teams of the era. Reyes also competed in singles matches, showcasing his technical expertise and hard-hitting style.

The Righteous (Vincent, Bateman, Dutch, and others)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Brawling and psychological.
Signature moves: Vincent’s Orange Sunshine (Diving Flatliner), Dutch’s Black Hole Slam, Bateman’s Death from Above (Diving Stomp).
Brief description: The Righteous was a sinister faction led by Vincent, characterized by their eerie persona and brutal in-ring style. The group participated in faction-based storylines and tag team matches, contributing to the dark, character-driven storytelling of ROH in its later years.

Ring Crew Express (Dunn and Marcos)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2006, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and comedic act.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Assisted Senton, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: The Ring Crew Express, consisting of Dunn and Marcos, was a beloved underdog team that provided comic relief and spirited performances in ROH’s tag team division. Known as "your favorite wrestlers' favorite tag team," they competed against top teams and became fan favorites despite rarely securing victories.

Robbie Eagles
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Turbo Backpack (Backpack Stunner), 450 Splash, Ron Miller Special (Inverted Figure Four Leglock).
Brief description: Robbie Eagles appeared in ROH as part of its partnership with NJPW, showcasing his incredible agility and technical prowess. Known for his innovative offense and striking ability, Eagles competed in multi-man and singles matches that highlighted his skills on an international stage.

Robert Gibson
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019, guest appearance.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Traditional and technical.
Signature moves: Double Dropkick (with Ricky Morton), Bulldog, Sunset Flip.
Brief description: Robert Gibson, as one-half of The Rock 'n' Roll Express, made a special appearance in ROH alongside Ricky Morton. Their presence brought classic wrestling nostalgia to ROH events, bridging generations of tag team wrestling excellence.

Rock 'n' Roll Express (Ricky Morton and Robert Gibson)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019, guest appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Traditional and tag team.
Signature moves: Double Dropkick, Bulldog, Sunset Flip.
Brief description: The legendary Rock 'n' Roll Express made special appearances in ROH, competing in matches that celebrated their legacy as one of wrestling’s most iconic tag teams. Their involvement added historical significance to ROH events and brought nostalgia to fans of classic tag team wrestling.

Rocky Romero
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004-2008, 2015-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Diablo Armbar, Forever Clotheslines, Sliced Bread #2.
Brief description: Rocky Romero was a key figure in ROH’s tag team division, first as part of The Havana Pitbulls with Ricky Reyes, where they captured the ROH World Tag Team Championships. Romero later returned in partnerships with NJPW, competing in matches as part of Roppongi Vice and Roppongi 3K. His versatility and charisma made him a fan favorite across multiple eras of ROH.

Roderick Strong
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2016, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event, tag team division, and ROH World Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: End of Heartache (Vertical Suplex Double Knee Backbreaker), Stronghold (Elevated Boston Crab), Death by Roderick (Gutbuster).
Brief description: Roderick Strong is one of the most accomplished wrestlers in ROH history. A former ROH World Champion, ROH World Television Champion, and multi-time tag team champion, Strong delivered countless classic matches against stars like Bryan Danielson, Jay Lethal, and Samoa Joe. Known as the "Messiah of the Backbreaker," Strong’s technical prowess and endurance made him a cornerstone of ROH for over a decade.

Rohit Raju
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2023, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: Drive-By Kick, Tornado DDT, Flatliner.
Brief description: Rohit Raju brought his experience and charisma to ROH’s reimagined roster in 2023. Known for his striking ability and mic skills, Raju competed in matches that highlighted his versatility and added depth to ROH’s new era.

Rok-C (later known as Roxanne Perez in WWE)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division and ROH Women’s World Champion.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Code Red, Running Bulldog, Standing Moonsault.
Brief description: Rok-C made history as the inaugural ROH Women’s World Champion, defeating Miranda Alize in the finals of the 2021 tournament. Known for her youthful energy and polished in-ring skills, Rok-C quickly became a standout in the Women of Honor division, leaving an enduring legacy despite her brief tenure.

Romantic Touch (Rhett Titus under a mask)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2013-2015, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Comedy act and lower card.
Wrestling style: Technical and comedic.
Signature moves: Romantic Suplex, Diving Elbow Drop, Roll-Up.
Brief description: As the masked Romantic Touch, Rhett Titus showcased his comedic side, providing lighthearted entertainment during his matches. While primarily a lower-card act, Romantic Touch added variety to ROH’s programming with his over-the-top persona and playful antics.

Roppongi Vice (Rocky Romero and Trent Beretta)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2017, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Strong Zero (Assisted Dudebuster), Forever Clotheslines, Double Knee Strike.
Brief description: Roppongi Vice competed in ROH as part of the promotion’s partnership with NJPW, delivering exciting matches in the tag team division. Known for their chemistry and entertaining style, Romero and Beretta brought their unique flair to ROH events, engaging in memorable rivalries with teams like The Young Bucks.

Roppongi Vice (Rocky Romero and Trent Beretta)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2017, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Strong Zero (Assisted Dudebuster), Forever Clotheslines, Double Knee Strike.
Brief description: Roppongi Vice brought their dynamic teamwork and energetic style to ROH, competing as part of the NJPW-ROH partnership. They participated in high-profile matches and rivalries against teams like The Young Bucks, delivering consistently entertaining performances that elevated the tag team division.

Rottweilers (Homicide, Low Ki, Ricky Reyes, and others)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2006, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical.
Signature moves: Cop Killa (Homicide’s Vertebreaker), Dragon Sleeper (Ricky Reyes), Warrior’s Way (Low Ki’s Double Stomp).
Brief description: The Rottweilers were a dominant heel faction led by Homicide, featuring a mix of singles and tag team competitors. Known for their ruthless tactics and intense rivalries, the group played a significant role in shaping the tone of ROH during their tenure. Feuds with The Briscoes and Samoa Joe solidified their place in ROH history.

Ruckus
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007-2009, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and faction member.
Wrestling style: High-flying and unorthodox.
Signature moves: Razzle Dazzle (Handspring Elbow), 450 Splash, Moonsault Leg Drop.
Brief description: Ruckus competed in ROH as a member of The Vulture Squad alongside Jigsaw and Jack Evans. Known for his innovative aerial offense and flashy style, Ruckus participated in exciting multi-man and tag team matches, adding a unique flavor to ROH’s roster during his tenure.

udy Boy Gonzales
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Trainer and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Technical.
Signature moves: Armbar, Snap Suplex, Dropkick.
Brief description: Rudy Boy Gonzales, a respected trainer and mentor, appeared in ROH’s early years, helping to establish the promotion’s talent pipeline. While his in-ring appearances were limited, his contributions to developing future stars and his association with ROH’s beginnings were significant.

Rush
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and ROH World Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Bull’s Horns (Running Corner Dropkick), La Lanza (Diving Stomp), Belly-to-Belly Suplex.
Brief description: Rush quickly ascended to the top of ROH after debuting, becoming a two-time ROH World Champion. As the leader of La Facción Ingobernable, he brought charisma and intensity to his matches and rivalries. His dominant reigns as champion and his faction’s influence made him one of ROH’s top stars in its later years.

Ryan Nova
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2021, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Springboard Crossbody, Superkick, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Ryan Nova, a graduate of the ROH Dojo, competed in tag team and multi-man matches, often as part of ROH’s developmental system. While his appearances were primarily on undercard bouts, Nova showcased potential and dedication to improving his craft.

Ryo Saito
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2007, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Fisherman Suplex, Double Knee Gutbuster, Dragon Suplex.
Brief description: Ryo Saito appeared in ROH as part of its partnership with Dragon Gate, competing in high-energy multi-man matches and tag team bouts. Known for his quick pace and technical skills, Saito contributed to some of ROH’s most acclaimed matches during his tenure.

Ryusuke Taguchi
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2016, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Dodon (Modified Sit-Out Facebuster), Hip Attack, Diving Senton.
Brief description: Ryusuke Taguchi competed in ROH as part of the NJPW-ROH partnership, bringing his blend of comedy and athleticism to the promotion. Participating in multi-man matches and tournaments, Taguchi added international flair to ROH’s roster during his appearances.

Sal Rinauro (also known as Salvatore Rinauro)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2008, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and lower card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Springboard Dropkick, Tornado DDT, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Sal Rinauro is best known in ROH as a member of The Embassy and for his tag team work, including a reign as ROH World Tag Team Champion alongside Tony Mamaluke. Known for his agility and charismatic personality, Rinauro added versatility to ROH’s roster during his tenure.

Sami Callihan
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2010-2013, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Brawling and hardcore.
Signature moves: Stretch Muffler (Leg Submission), Death Valley Driver, Suicide Dive.
Brief description: Sami Callihan brought his intense, unpredictable energy to ROH, competing in singles and tag team matches. Known for his brutal style and resilience, Callihan stood out as a versatile competitor capable of delivering high-quality matches across different settings.

Sammy Guevara
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: 630 Splash, Shooting Star Press, Spanish Fly.
Brief description: Sammy Guevara appeared in ROH during its later years, showcasing his exceptional high-flying ability and charisma. Competing in singles and multi-man matches, Guevara left an impression with his dynamic style and fearless approach to in-ring competition.

Samoa Joe
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2008, regular appearances; 2023-present, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and ROH World Champion.
Wrestling style: Striking and submission-based.
Signature moves: Coquina Clutch (Rear-Naked Choke), Muscle Buster, Uranage Slam.
Brief description: Samoa Joe is one of the most iconic names in ROH history, with a legendary 645-day reign as ROH World Champion. Known for his brutal strikes, technical mastery, and unmatched intensity, Joe’s feuds with stars like CM Punk and Bryan Danielson defined ROH’s golden era. In his 2023 return, he brought his star power and legacy to a reimagined ROH roster.

SANADA
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Skull End (Dragon Sleeper), Moonsault, TKO Cutter.
Brief description: SANADA appeared in ROH as part of Los Ingobernables de Japon during its partnership with NJPW. Known for his athleticism and technical skills, SANADA competed in multi-man and tag team matches, delivering standout performances that showcased his international star power.

Santana (of LAX, with Ortiz)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and brawling.
Signature moves: Street Sweeper (Powerbomb/Blockbuster Combo with Ortiz), Superkick, Death Valley Driver.
Brief description: Santana appeared in ROH as part of LAX (Latin American Exchange), showcasing their intense tag team style during the NJPW-ROH partnership. Known for their chemistry and exciting offense, Santana and Ortiz elevated ROH’s tag division with their dynamic performances.

Sara Del Rey
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2012, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Royal Butterfly (Double Underhook Suplex), Death Rey (Powerbomb), Big Boot.
Brief description: Sara Del Rey was a pioneer in ROH’s Women of Honor division, delivering standout matches that showcased her technical expertise and power. As a member of Sweet & Sour Inc., she also contributed to faction storylines. Del Rey’s influence helped establish women’s wrestling as a key part of ROH programming.

Sarah Stock (also known as Dark Angel)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007-2008, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division and special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Tiger Bomb, Diving Crossbody, Springboard Arm Drag.
Brief description: Sarah Stock competed in ROH during its early Women of Honor matches, bringing her international experience and high-flying style to the promotion. Known for her grace and technical ability, Stock added depth and excitement to ROH’s women’s roster during her appearances.

SAT (Spanish Announce Team: Jose and Joel Maximo)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Spanish Fly (Double-Team Moonsault Slam), Springboard Moonsault, Double Suplex.
Brief description: The SAT was one of the key tag teams in ROH’s early years, known for their innovative high-flying offense. They helped establish the promotion’s reputation for exciting tag team wrestling with standout performances in multi-man and tag team matches.

Satoshi Kojima
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and striking.
Signature moves: Lariat, Koji Cutter (Ace Crusher), Brainbuster.
Brief description: Satoshi Kojima appeared in ROH as part of its partnership with NJPW, bringing his legendary status and hard-hitting style to the promotion. Kojima competed in high-profile matches, showcasing his strength and charisma to ROH audiences.

Scoot Andrews
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and powerhouse.
Signature moves: Force of Nature (Sit-Out Spinebuster), Death Valley Driver, Running Powerslam.
Brief description: Scoot Andrews competed in ROH during its formative years, showcasing his technical ability and athleticism in singles matches. Known as "The Black Nature Boy," Andrews provided a solid presence in ROH’s early mid-card scene.

Scorpio Sky
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2008-2009, sporadic appearances; 2017-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team division, and faction member.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Ace of Spades (TKO Cutter), Springboard Cutter, Dragon Sleeper.
Brief description: Scorpio Sky initially appeared in ROH in the late 2000s, delivering strong performances in singles and tag matches. His career in ROH reached new heights as part of SoCal Uncensored (SCU) with Christopher Daniels and Frankie Kazarian, where he captured the ROH World Six-Man Tag Team Championship. Sky’s versatility and athleticism made him a standout competitor.

SCUM (Suffering, Chaos, Ugliness, and Mayhem; led by Steve Corino and Kevin Steen)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2012-2013, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Brawling and hardcore.
Signature moves: Package Piledriver (Kevin Steen), Old School Expulsion (Steve Corino’s Lariat), Double-Team Suplex.
Brief description: SCUM was a dominant heel faction led by Kevin Steen and Steve Corino, whose goal was to dismantle ROH’s values and principles. The faction engaged in violent feuds with top stars like Jay Lethal and The Briscoes, leaving a trail of destruction and chaos in their wake. SCUM’s influence during this period made them one of the most hated factions in ROH history.

Sean Davis
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2006, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Powerslam, Spinebuster, Bearhug.
Brief description: Sean Davis, as part of The Heartbreak Express, competed in ROH’s tag team division. Known for their over-the-top personas and physicality, The Heartbreak Express provided comedic relief while participating in competitive tag team bouts.

Search and Destroy (Jay White, Jonathan Gresham, Chris Sabin, and Alex Shelley)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: White’s Blade Runner (Swinging Flatliner), Shelley and Sabin’s Skull and Bones (Diving Crossbody/Neckbreaker Combo), Gresham’s Octopus Stretch.
Brief description: Search and Destroy was a faction united to uphold ROH’s pure wrestling tradition, emphasizing skill and sportsmanship. The group engaged in memorable feuds with teams like The Rebellion, showcasing a mix of experienced veterans and rising stars. Their teamwork and in-ring chemistry made them a fan-favorite faction during their tenure.

Second City Saints (CM Punk, Colt Cabana, and Ace Steel)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2004, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Punk’s Pepsi Plunge (Top Rope Pedigree), Cabana’s Colt .45 (Double Underhook Backbreaker), Steel’s Spike Piledriver.
Brief description: The Second City Saints were one of the most impactful factions in ROH’s early years. Based out of Chicago, the trio engaged in legendary rivalries with The Prophecy and Generation Next. Known for their blend of charisma, technical ability, and intensity, the Saints helped define ROH’s rebellious and competitive spirit.

Seleziya Sparx
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2015, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Manager and occasional wrestler.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and striking.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Powerslam, Running Elbow.
Brief description: Seleziya Sparx appeared in ROH as a manager for The Embassy, where her imposing presence and physicality added a new dimension to the faction. She occasionally competed in matches, showcasing her strength and charisma in the Women of Honor division.

Serena Deeb
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2008, sporadic appearances; 2021, guest appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Serenity Lock (Modified Stretch Muffler), Spear, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Serena Deeb competed in ROH’s early Women of Honor matches and later returned during the revitalization of the division in 2021. Known for her technical expertise and poise, Deeb contributed to elevating women’s wrestling in ROH during both stints.

Session Moth Martina
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2020-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division and comedy act.
Wrestling style: Brawling and comedic.
Signature moves: Springboard Stunner, Bronco Buster, Suplex.
Brief description: Session Moth Martina brought her unique mix of humor and chaos to the Women of Honor division. Known for her party-loving character and unconventional style, Martina entertained fans while adding variety to ROH’s women’s roster during her tenure.

Shaheem Ali
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based.
Signature moves: Rocket Bye Baby (Double-Team Suplex with LSG), Spinebuster, Frog Splash.
Brief description: Shaheem Ali was one-half of Coast 2 Coast with LSG. Known for their underdog story and energetic performances, the duo eventually gained recognition in ROH’s tag team division. Ali’s blend of power and agility complemented LSG’s high-flying style, making them a well-rounded team.

Shane Douglas
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003, guest appearance.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: Belly-to-Belly Suplex, Piledriver, Snap Suplex.
Brief description: Shane Douglas made a guest appearance in ROH during its early years. As a legend of ECW, his presence brought attention to the promotion and helped bridge the gap between wrestling’s past and ROH’s rising reputation as a home for pure wrestling.

Shane Hagadorn
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2011, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Manager, lower card, and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Neckbreaker, Back Suplex.
Brief description: Shane Hagadorn initially competed as a wrestler before transitioning into a managerial role. He served as the manager for The Kings of Wrestling (Chris Hero and Claudio Castagnoli) and The American Wolves (Davey Richards and Eddie Edwards), playing a pivotal role in their storylines. Hagadorn’s presence as a conniving manager added layers to ROH’s faction-based rivalries.

Shane Haste (later known as Shane Thorne)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Bomb Valley Death (Powerbomb into Death Valley Driver), Senton Bomb, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Shane Haste appeared in ROH as part of the NJPW-ROH collaboration, competing in tag team matches. Known for his agility and explosive offense, Haste showcased his talent as part of an international roster.

Shane Hollister
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2008-2010, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and lower card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Buzzsaw Kick, Tiger Bomb, Springboard DDT.
Brief description: Shane Hollister competed in ROH in the late 2000s, participating in singles and multi-man matches. Known for his fast-paced style and solid technical skills, Hollister added depth to ROH’s mid-card scene during his tenure.

Shane Taylor
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card, tag team division, and ROH World Television Champion.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Greetings from 216 (Sit-Out Tombstone Piledriver), Marcus Garvey Driver (Package Piledriver), Splash from the Top Rope.
Brief description: Shane Taylor rose from being a mid-card powerhouse to one of ROH’s top competitors. As a singles wrestler, he captured the ROH World Television Championship, delivering hard-hitting matches against top-tier opponents. His strength, size, and charisma made him a major player in ROH’s later years.

Shane Taylor Promotions (Shane Taylor, Moses, Kaun, and O’Shay Edwards)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; tag team and six-man tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical.
Signature moves: Marcus Garvey Driver (Shane Taylor), Double-Team Spinebuster (Moses and Kaun), Running Powerslam (O’Shay Edwards).
Brief description: Shane Taylor Promotions (STP) became one of the most dominant factions in ROH, capturing the ROH World Six-Man Tag Team Championships. Led by Shane Taylor, the faction embodied strength, unity, and a mission to elevate underrepresented voices in wrestling. STP’s combination of physical dominance and team cohesion made them a force to be reckoned with.

Shawn Daivari
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2008-2009, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical.
Signature moves: Magic Carpet Ride (Diving Splash with a Carpet), Cobra Clutch, Running Clothesline.
Brief description: Shawn Daivari competed in ROH as a seasoned performer, delivering solid matches against rising stars. His charisma and storytelling ability made him a memorable addition to the promotion during his appearances.

Shelton Benjamin
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2010-2013, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical.
Signature moves: Paydirt (Jumping Flatliner), T-Bone Suplex, Superkick.
Brief description: Shelton Benjamin competed in ROH as part of Wrestling’s Greatest Tag Team with Charlie Haas. Together, they captured the ROH World Tag Team Championships and delivered standout matches against teams like The Briscoes and The Kings of Wrestling. Benjamin’s star power and in-ring versatility helped elevate ROH’s tag team division during his tenure.

SHINGO (Shingo Takagi)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2007, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and striking.
Signature moves: Last of the Dragon (Modified Death Valley Driver), Pumping Bomber (Lariat), Made in Japan (Sit-Out Side Slam).
Brief description: Shingo Takagi appeared in ROH during its collaboration with Dragon Gate, competing in acclaimed multi-man tag matches. Known for his strength, intensity, and innovative offense, Shingo became a fan favorite and contributed to some of the most celebrated matches in ROH history.

Shinobi Shadow Squad (Cheeseburger, Eli Isom, and Ryan Nova)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; six-man tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Triple-Team Powerbomb, Diving Crossbody (Isom), Palm Strike (Cheeseburger).
Brief description: Shinobi Shadow Squad (S3) was a trio of underdog competitors who brought energy and determination to ROH’s six-man tag team division. Cheeseburger led the group with his comedic and high-flying style, while Isom and Nova added youthful energy and technical skill. Despite limited success, they became a popular act among fans.

Shinsuke Nakamura
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2008, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: Kinshasa (Running Knee Strike), Cross Armbreaker, Inverted Powerslam.
Brief description: Shinsuke Nakamura competed in ROH during the promotion’s partnership with NJPW, showcasing his charismatic presence and hard-hitting style. His matches brought international flair to ROH and allowed fans to witness one of Japan’s premier stars on U.S. soil.

Shinobi Shadow Squad (Cheeseburger, Ryan Nova, and Eli Isom)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; six-man tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Shotei Palm Strike (Cheeseburger), Tornado DDT (Ryan Nova), Brainbuster (Eli Isom).
Brief description: The Shinobi Shadow Squad was a faction focused on teamwork and resilience, often competing in six-man tag team matches. Cheeseburger’s charisma, combined with the youthful energy of Nova and Isom, made them an entertaining underdog trio in ROH’s later years.

Slugger
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Enforcer and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse.
Signature moves: Chokeslam, Big Boot, Powerbomb.
Brief description: Slugger appeared in ROH as the bodyguard for Special K, a heel stable known for their party lifestyle gimmick. His imposing presence added an element of intimidation to the group, and he occasionally competed in matches, utilizing his size and power to dominate opponents.

Slyk Wagner Brown
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical.
Signature moves: Frog Splash, Running Powerslam, Neckbreaker.
Brief description: Slyk Wagner Brown competed in ROH’s early years, showcasing his strength and versatility in singles matches. Known for his athleticism and charisma, Brown delivered competitive performances that added depth to ROH’s roster.

SoCal Uncensored (SCU) (Christopher Daniels, Frankie Kazarian, and Scorpio Sky)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017-2020, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Best Meltzer Ever (Springboard Moonsault/Spike Tombstone Combo), Angel’s Wings (Christopher Daniels), Slingshot Cutter (Kazarian).
Brief description: SoCal Uncensored became one of the most dominant factions in ROH, capturing the ROH World Tag Team and Six-Man Tag Team Championships. Known for their mix of experience and innovation, SCU engaged in notable feuds with The Briscoes and The Kingdom, solidifying their legacy in the promotion.

Soldiers of Savagery (SOS) (Kaun and Moses)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team and six-man tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Double Powerbomb, Spinebuster, Double Lariat.
Brief description: SOS, a dominant tag team within Shane Taylor Promotions, showcased their raw power and intensity in ROH’s tag team division. Their role as enforcers of STP led to championship success, including capturing the ROH World Six-Man Tag Team Championships.

Sonjay Dutt
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2007, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: High-flyer and special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Hindu Press (Moonsault Double Foot Stomp), Standing Shooting Star Press, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Sonjay Dutt brought his exciting high-flying style to ROH, participating in singles and multi-man matches that showcased his agility and creativity. As an early pioneer of modern cruiserweight wrestling, Dutt contributed to the promotion’s emphasis on athletic and innovative in-ring action.

SOS (Soldiers of Savagery) (Kaun and Moses)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team and six-man tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Double Powerbomb, Spinebuster, Double Lariat.
Brief description: SOS was a dominant tag team under Shane Taylor Promotions. Known for their power-based offense and intimidating presence, Kaun and Moses captured the ROH World Six-Man Tag Team Championships as part of the faction. Their physical style and unity made them a standout team in the later years of ROH.

Spanky (later known as Brian Kendrick)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Sliced Bread #2 (Shiranui), Frog Splash, Superkick.
Brief description: Spanky competed in ROH during its formative years, delivering entertaining performances against top stars. Known for his charisma and innovative offense, he participated in several key matches that helped establish the promotion’s reputation for showcasing diverse talent.

Special K (Led by Izzy, Dixie, Deranged, and others)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2005, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; tag team and undercard.
Wrestling style: High-flying and chaotic.
Signature moves: Spanish Fly, Moonsaults, Multi-Man Suplexes.
Brief description: Special K was a heel faction of young, party-loving wrestlers who added a unique energy to ROH’s roster. Known for their flashy high-flying style, they participated in multi-man and tag team matches. Despite their comedic elements, they had standout matches against more established teams, contributing to ROH’s tag division in its early years.

Stella Grey
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2020, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division and lower card.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Crossbody, Small Package.
Brief description: Stella Grey was a competitor in ROH’s Women of Honor division, participating in singles and tag matches. As a graduate of the ROH Dojo, she showcased her developing skills and contributed to the division's growth during her appearances.

Sterling James Keenan (later known as Corey Graves in WWE)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004-2006, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: MK Ultra (STO), Elevated DDT, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Sterling James Keenan competed in ROH during its mid-2000s era, bringing a strong blend of technical skill and charisma to his matches. While not a mainstay, his performances added depth to the mid-card and highlighted his potential.

Steve Corino
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2016, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event, mid-card, and commentator.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical.
Signature moves: Old School Expulsion (Lariat), Sliding Lariat, Superkick.
Brief description: Steve Corino was a pivotal figure in ROH’s history, initially competing as a wrestler and later transitioning to commentary. As a member of factions like SCUM, he engaged in notable feuds with stars like Kevin Steen and BJ Whitmer. Corino’s contributions extended beyond the ring, as his work on commentary became an integral part of ROH’s presentation.

Stevie Richards
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2009, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Stevie Kick (Superkick), Figure Four Leglock, Flapjack.
Brief description: Stevie Richards made brief appearances in ROH, bringing his experience and veteran presence to the promotion. Known for his technical expertise and connection with fans, Richards added a nostalgic element to ROH’s programming during his tenure.

Stokely Hathaway
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2019, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Manager and occasional wrestler.
Wrestling style: Managerial interference and comedic antics.
Signature moves: Slap, Low Blow, Distraction Spots.
Brief description: Stokely Hathaway was a charismatic and entertaining manager in ROH, representing stars like Moose and Jonathan Gresham. His sharp mic skills and comedic timing made him a standout personality, contributing to the storytelling and character development in ROH’s mid-card and main event scenes.

Stu Grayson (formerly Player Dos)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2009-2010, sporadic appearances; 2022-present, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and power-based.
Signature moves: Fatality (Double-Team Gory Bomb/Blockbuster with Evil Uno), Springboard Moonsault, Suicide Dive.
Brief description: Stu Grayson, as one-half of the Super Smash Bros (later The Dark Order with Evil Uno), competed in ROH’s tag team division. Known for his athleticism and innovative offense, Grayson delivered standout performances that showcased his skill and chemistry with Uno. He returned to ROH in 2022 as part of the AEW-led era.

Sumie Sakai
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division and ROH Women of Honor Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Smash Mouth (Fisherman’s Buster), Moonsault, Cross Armbreaker.
Brief description: Sumie Sakai was a trailblazer in ROH’s Women of Honor division, becoming the inaugural Women of Honor Champion in 2018. Known for her charisma and technical ability, Sakai competed in high-profile matches, helping to establish the Women’s Division as a core part of ROH. Her tenure spanned nearly two decades, making her one of ROH’s longest-serving competitors.

Super Crazy
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2008, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre.
Signature moves: Trifecta Moonsaults, Springboard Dropkick, Tilt-a-Whirl Backbreaker.
Brief description: Super Crazy brought his exciting lucha libre style to ROH, competing in singles and multi-man matches. Known for his work in ECW and international promotions, Super Crazy’s appearances in ROH provided fans with high-energy performances and nostalgia for his innovative offense.

Super Dragon
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2006, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: Psycho Driver (Modified Driver), Curb Stomp, Moonsault Double Stomp.
Brief description: Super Dragon appeared in ROH as a representative of the West Coast independent scene, showcasing his hard-hitting and unorthodox style. Competing in both singles and tag matches, he made a memorable impact during his limited appearances.

Super Smash Brothers (Evil Uno and Stu Grayson)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2009-2010, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Fatality (Double-Team Gory Bomb/Blockbuster), Assisted Moonsault, Superkick Party.
Brief description: The Super Smash Brothers were a high-energy tag team that competed in ROH’s tag division, known for their innovative offense and unique personas. While their ROH appearances were limited, they gained recognition for their exciting performances and later evolved into The Dark Order in AEW.

Susumu Yokosuka
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2007, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Jumbo no Kachi! (Lariat), Yokosuka Cutter, Exploder Suplex.
Brief description: Susumu Yokosuka appeared in ROH as part of its partnership with Dragon Gate, participating in high-profile tag team and multi-man matches. Known for his technical precision and explosive offense, Yokosuka delivered standout performances in matches that are still celebrated as ROH classics.

SUWA
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Striking and power-based.
Signature moves: Lariat, Powerbomb, German Suplex.
Brief description: SUWA competed in ROH during its collaborations with Japanese promotions, bringing his hard-hitting style to the promotion. Known for his aggressive demeanor and physicality, SUWA added an international flavor to ROH’s roster during his brief tenure.

Suzuki-gun
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; special attraction and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Striking and submission-based.
Signature moves: Gotch-Style Piledriver (Minoru Suzuki), Superkick (Taichi), Guillotine Choke (Zack Sabre Jr.).
Brief description: Suzuki-gun appeared in ROH as part of its partnership with NJPW, featuring members like Minoru Suzuki, Zack Sabre Jr., and Taichi. Known for their brutal tactics and no-nonsense approach, the faction participated in multi-man and tag matches, showcasing their dominance and adding star power to ROH events.

Sweet 'n' Sour Inc. (Led by Larry Sweeney)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007-2009, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Varied based on members (technical, brawling, and comedic).
Signature moves: Larry Sweeney’s Promo Spots, Hero’s Hangman’s Elbow (Chris Hero), Tank Toland’s Power Press Slams.
Brief description: Sweet 'n' Sour Inc., led by Larry Sweeney, was a heel faction known for its blend of comedy and athleticism. Featuring talents like Chris Hero, Sara Del Rey, and Tank Toland, the faction engaged in faction wars and storylines that added depth and entertainment to ROH programming.

Swerve Strickland
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2022-present, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Swerve Stomp (Double Stomp from the Top Rope), House Call (Jumping Kick to the Back of the Head), Rolling Flatliner.
Brief description: Swerve Strickland brought his innovative and charismatic style to ROH during the AEW-led era. Known for his athleticism and unique offense, Strickland’s appearances highlighted his star power and ability to captivate audiences in high-stakes matches.

Tadarius Thomas
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2012-2014, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Capoeira-inspired striking and technical.
Signature moves: Capoeira Kick, German Suplex, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Tadarius Thomas brought a unique martial arts-inspired style to ROH, which set him apart in the promotion. As a member of The Decade, he competed in tag team matches and faction storylines, showcasing his agility and striking ability.

Taeler Hendrix
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2017, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division and faction member.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: Kiss Goodnight (Roundhouse Kick), Split Leg Drop, Chokehold STO.
Brief description: Taeler Hendrix was a prominent figure in the Women of Honor division and a key member of The House of Truth, managed by Truth Martini. Her heel persona and striking in-ring style made her a standout competitor, contributing to ROH’s effort to grow its women’s division.

Taiji Ishimori
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: 450 Splash, Yes Lock, Rewind Kick.
Brief description: Taiji Ishimori competed in ROH as part of its partnership with NJPW, bringing his exciting high-flying style to the promotion. Known for his incredible athleticism and innovative offense, Ishimori participated in singles and multi-man matches that showcased his talent.

Takaaki Watanabe (later known as EVIL)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2015, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Darkness Falls (Fireman’s Carry Spinebuster), STO, Lariat.
Brief description: Competing as Takaaki Watanabe during his excursion from NJPW, EVIL brought a mix of strength and aggression to ROH. He participated in competitive singles and tag team matches, showcasing his potential before returning to Japan to join Los Ingobernables de Japon.

Takeshi Morishima
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007-2008, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and ROH World Champion.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and striking.
Signature moves: Backdrop Driver, Lariat, Powerbomb.
Brief description: Takeshi Morishima had a dominant run in ROH as the ROH World Champion, holding the title for 231 days. Known for his raw power and intensity, Morishima had memorable matches against stars like Bryan Danielson and Nigel McGuinness. His reign as champion solidified his status as one of the most imposing figures in ROH history.

Tama Tonga
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and faction member.
Wrestling style: Brawling and high-flying.
Signature moves: Gun Stun (Cutter), Tongan Twist (Samoan Drop), Diving Headbutt.
Brief description: Tama Tonga appeared in ROH as part of the NJPW-ROH partnership and as a member of Bullet Club. Known for his charismatic and unpredictable style, Tonga competed in multi-man and tag team matches, leaving an impression as a key member of one of wrestling’s most influential factions.

Tanga Loa
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Apesh*t (Samoan Driver), Sit-Out Spinebuster, Diving Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Tanga Loa, alongside his brother Tama Tonga as the Guerrillas of Destiny (G.O.D.), competed in ROH’s tag team division as part of Bullet Club. Their intense style and dominance made them standout competitors in both tag and faction-based matches.

Tank Toland
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007-2009, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and comedic.
Signature moves: Power Press Slam, Running Powerslam, Bearhug.
Brief description: Tank Toland competed in ROH as part of Sweet 'n' Sour Inc., bringing his blend of power and humor to the faction. Known for his comedic antics and impressive strength, Toland contributed to ROH’s mid-card scene during his tenure.

Tate Twins (Brandon and Brent Tate)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2019-2021, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and lower card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Double Dropkick, Springboard Moonsault, Assisted Neckbreaker.
Brief description: The Tate Twins were part of the tag team division in ROH, showcasing their athleticism and chemistry in matches. While often used in undercard roles, they brought energy and versatility to the roster.

Taylor Rust
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2022-present, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Heel Hook, Rings of Saturn, Rolling Elbow.
Brief description: Taylor Rust brought his refined technical wrestling style to ROH during its AEW-led era, competing in singles and multi-man matches. Known for his mat-based approach and sharp execution, Rust added depth to ROH’s roster.

Team CZW (Chris Hero, Necro Butcher, Claudio Castagnoli, Nate Webb, and others)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006, regular appearances during the ROH vs. CZW feud.
Position on the card: Faction; mid-card and main event.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and technical (varied by member).
Signature moves: Hero’s Hangman’s Elbow, Necro Butcher’s Tiger Driver, Claudio’s Ricola Bomb.
Brief description: Team CZW invaded ROH as part of one of the most heated inter-promotional feuds in wrestling history. Their violent, hardcore approach contrasted with ROH’s emphasis on technical wrestling, leading to legendary matches, including the epic Cage of Death match. This rivalry remains one of ROH’s defining storylines.

Team ROH (Samoa Joe, BJ Whitmer, Adam Pearce, Bryan Danielson, and others)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006, regular appearances during the ROH vs. CZW feud.
Position on the card: Faction; main event.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling (varied by member).
Signature moves: Samoa Joe’s Coquina Clutch, Whitmer’s Exploder Suplex, Pearce’s Jumping Piledriver.
Brief description: Team ROH represented the promotion’s honor and technical tradition during the heated rivalry with CZW. The faction fought valiantly in brutal encounters, culminating in the iconic Cage of Death match, where ROH stood tall against its hardcore counterparts.

Team CMLL
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; special attraction and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre.
Signature moves: Springboard Moonsaults, Suicide Dives, High-Impact Armdrags.
Brief description: Team CMLL competed in ROH during the partnership with NJPW, bringing a vibrant lucha libre style to the promotion. Featuring stars like Dragon Lee, Rush, and others, Team CMLL participated in multi-man matches and tournaments, showcasing the athleticism and flair of Mexican wrestling.

Teddy Hart
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative.
Signature moves: Open Hart Surgery (Diving Corkscrew Elbow Drop), Hart Attack DDT, Springboard Moonsault.
Brief description: Teddy Hart competed in ROH during its early years, showcasing his high-flying and creative offense. Despite his limited appearances, Hart’s unique style left an impression on ROH fans, contributing to the promotion’s focus on athletic and dynamic wrestling.

Tempura Boyz (Sho and Yo, later known as SHO and YOH of Roppongi 3K)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2017, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: 3K (Double-Team Jumping DDT), Superkick, Assisted Suplex.
Brief description: Competing as the Tempura Boyz during their excursion from NJPW, SHO and YOH gained experience in ROH’s tag team division. Known for their energetic offense and crisp teamwork, they participated in competitive matches that showcased their potential before returning to NJPW as Roppongi 3K.

Tenille Dashwood (formerly Emma in WWE)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2019, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Spotlight Kick (Running Kick), Butterfly Suplex, Emmamite Sandwich (Running Corner Crossbody).
Brief description: Tenille Dashwood brought her star power to ROH’s Women of Honor division, competing in high-profile matches and tournaments. Known for her polished in-ring style and strong personality, Dashwood played a key role in elevating the division during her tenure.

Terry Funk
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2004, special appearance.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Spinning Toe Hold, Moonsault.
Brief description: Wrestling legend Terry Funk made a special appearance in ROH, bringing his decades of experience and hardcore reputation to the promotion. His involvement bridged generations of wrestling fans and added historical significance to ROH’s early years.

Tetsuya Naito
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and faction member.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking.
Signature moves: Destino (Somersault Reverse DDT), Gloria (Tilt-a-Whirl Slam), Missile Dropkick.
Brief description: Tetsuya Naito appeared in ROH as part of its partnership with NJPW, representing Los Ingobernables de Japon. Known for his charisma and unorthodox style, Naito competed in high-profile matches, bringing star power and international appeal to ROH events.

Texas Wrestling Academy
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2004, sporadic appearances (as a collective).
Position on the card: Faction; developmental talent and lower card.
Wrestling style: Varied (technical, high-flying, and brawling).
Signature moves: Varied based on members.
Brief description: The Texas Wrestling Academy (TWA), led by Rudy Boy Gonzales, was a key developmental pipeline for early ROH talent. Graduates such as Bryan Danielson, Paul London, and Spanky competed in ROH, showcasing their training and establishing the promotion’s reputation for in-ring excellence. TWA’s influence helped shape ROH’s early roster and ethos.

Thomas Penmanship (later known as Tommaso Ciampa)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2011-2015, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Project Ciampa (Powerbomb into Double Knee Backbreaker), Sicilian Stretch (Modified Crossface), Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Thomas Penmanship, better known as Tommaso Ciampa, evolved from a mid-card competitor into a key player in ROH’s singles division. His intense style and memorable rivalries, including his feud with Jay Lethal, made him a standout during his tenure.

Thunder Rosa
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2020, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Fire Thunder Driver (Thunder Fire Powerbomb), Peruvian Necktie, Diving Double Foot Stomp.
Brief description: Thunder Rosa competed in ROH during the revitalization of its Women of Honor division. Known for her intense style and international appeal, Rosa delivered strong performances that elevated the women’s roster during her brief appearances.

Tiana Ringer
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2007, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Diving Crossbody, Bridging Suplex, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Tiana Ringer competed in the early stages of ROH’s Women of Honor division, participating in singles and tag team matches. Known for her athleticism and determination, she contributed to the growth of women’s wrestling in ROH.

Tiger Mask (Fourth incarnation, Tiger Mask IV)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007-2008, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Tiger Driver (Double Underhook Powerbomb), Tiger Suplex, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Tiger Mask competed in ROH as part of the promotion’s partnership with NJPW. His appearances showcased his legendary status and high-flying style, which contributed to the international flavor of ROH during this period.

Tim Hughes
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2017, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical.
Signature moves: Elbow Drop, Suplex, Running Powerslam.
Brief description: Tim Hughes competed in ROH as a graduate of the ROH Dojo. Often featured in undercard and enhancement matches, Hughes contributed to developing ROH’s rising talent while showcasing his own abilities.

Time Splitters (KUSHIDA and Alex Shelley)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2015, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Outatime (Neckbreaker/Powerbomb Combo), Cross Armbreaker, Double-Team Superkick.
Brief description: Time Splitters, an acclaimed tag team in NJPW, brought their exciting and innovative style to ROH as part of the NJPW-ROH partnership. Their dynamic teamwork and fast-paced matches made them a standout team during their appearances.

TJ Perkins
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2010-2011, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: TJP Clutch (Modified Leglock), Detonation Kick (Fireman’s Carry Roundhouse), 450 Splash.
Brief description: TJ Perkins competed in ROH as a versatile competitor known for his technical precision and aerial abilities. His performances in singles and tag matches added depth to the roster during his tenure.

TK O’Ryan
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical.
Signature moves: Moonshot (Springboard Moonsault), Double Underhook DDT, Lariat.
Brief description: TK O’Ryan was a key member of The Kingdom alongside Matt Taven and Vinny Marseglia. The group captured multiple ROH World Six-Man Tag Team Championships, with O’Ryan’s athleticism and power complementing his partners’ styles.

Titan
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre and high-flying.
Signature moves: Titanics (Modified Spanish Fly), Suicide Dive, Springboard Armdrag.
Brief description: Titan represented CMLL in ROH as part of the NJPW-CMLL-ROH partnership. Known for his incredible agility and lucha libre prowess, Titan participated in multi-man and tag matches that highlighted his athletic abilities.

Toa Liona
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2022-present, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Samoan Drop, Chokeslam, Powerbomb.
Brief description: Toa Liona became a prominent part of ROH’s roster during its AEW-led era, competing as a member of The Embassy alongside Kaun and Brian Cage. Known for his incredible strength and presence, Liona contributed to The Embassy's dominance in the tag and six-man tag divisions.

Todd Sexton
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: German Suplex, Superkick, Leg Lariat.
Brief description: Todd Sexton appeared in ROH during its early years, competing in undercard and tag team matches. As a solid technical wrestler, he contributed to the development of the promotion’s growing roster in its formative years.

Tom Carter (also known as Reckless Youth)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Northern Lights Bomb, Top Rope Elbow Drop, Springboard Moonsault.
Brief description: Tom Carter, wrestling as Reckless Youth, was a part of ROH’s early roster, delivering technically sound and entertaining matches. He was considered one of the influential indie wrestlers who laid the groundwork for ROH’s reputation for in-ring excellence.

Tommaso Ciampa
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2011-2015, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: Project Ciampa (Powerbomb into Double Knee Backbreaker), Sicilian Stretch (Modified Crossface), Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Tommaso Ciampa became a standout in ROH, rising from mid-card status to compete in main-event-caliber matches. His feud with Jay Lethal over the ROH World Television Championship and his intense in-ring style made him a memorable figure in ROH’s history.

Tomohiro Ishii
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2017, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and ROH World Television Champion.
Wrestling style: Striking and powerhouse.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, Sliding Lariat, Vertical Drop Brainbuster.
Brief description: Tomohiro Ishii brought his hard-hitting, never-say-die style to ROH as part of its partnership with NJPW. He briefly held the ROH World Television Championship, defeating Roderick Strong. Ishii’s appearances added an intense, physical edge to ROH’s programming during his tenure.

Tony Deppen
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2020-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and ROH World Television Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Knee Trembler, Suicide Dive, Springboard Moonsault.
Brief description: Tony Deppen emerged as a breakout star in ROH’s Pure Division and later captured the ROH World Television Championship. Known for his gritty, technical style and determination, Deppen stood out as a versatile competitor during ROH’s rebooted era.

Tony Kozina
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Missile Dropkick, Snap Suplex, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Tony Kozina competed in ROH’s early years, participating in undercard and tag team matches. Known for his agility and technical skill, Kozina contributed to the promotion’s foundation during its formative years.

Tony Mamaluke
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2006, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and ROH World Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Sicilian Crab (Single-Leg Boston Crab), Tornado DDT, Cross Armbreaker.
Brief description: Tony Mamaluke formed a successful tag team with Sal Rinauro, capturing the ROH World Tag Team Championships. Known for his technical precision and smooth grappling, Mamaluke was a key part of ROH’s tag team division during his tenure.

Tony Nese
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2022-present, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Running Nese (Running Corner Knee Strike), 450 Splash, German Suplex.
Brief description: Tony Nese appeared in ROH during its AEW-led relaunch, showcasing his well-rounded style in singles and tag team matches. Known for his incredible conditioning and technical prowess, Nese added star power to the evolving ROH roster.

Too Cold Scorpio
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: 450 Splash, Tumbleweed (Corkscrew Leg Drop), Powerbomb.
Brief description: Too Cold Scorpio brought his legendary status and high-flying style to ROH during its mid-2000s era. Known for his innovation and charisma, his appearances added a nostalgic yet exciting element to the promotion.

Top Flight (Dante Martin and Darius Martin)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2022-present, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative.
Signature moves: Nose Dive (Springboard Moonsault Cutter), Assisted DDT, Double Springboard Dropkick.
Brief description: Top Flight brought their high-energy, acrobatic tag team style to ROH during its AEW-led era. Known for their incredible athleticism and innovative offense, they quickly established themselves as a rising force in the tag team division.

Toru Yano
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and comedic act.
Wrestling style: Brawling and comedic.
Signature moves: Low Blow, Turnbuckle Pad Removal Spot, Sit-Out Powerbomb.
Brief description: Toru Yano appeared in ROH as part of the NJPW partnership, bringing his unique blend of comedy and brawling to the promotion. Known for his antics and unconventional tactics, Yano provided entertaining moments and memorable matches during his appearances.

Tough Guy Inc. (Tim Hughes and Brutal Bob Evans)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2017, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and lower card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling.
Signature moves: Double Clothesline, Spinebuster, Bearhug Slam.
Brief description: Tough Guy Inc. was a rugged tag team that competed in ROH’s tag division. Managed by Brutal Bob Evans, the team showcased a no-nonsense style in their matches and added depth to the roster.

Tracy Brooks
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003-2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division and manager.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling.
Signature moves: DDT, Bulldog, Running Clothesline.
Brief description: Tracy Brooks appeared in ROH as both a wrestler and manager, supporting stars like CM Punk during her tenure. Known for her charisma and versatility, she contributed to the early development of ROH’s women’s wrestling presence.

Tracy Williams
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Crossface, Piledriver, High-Angle Suplex.
Brief description: Tracy Williams was a prominent member of Lifeblood and The Foundation, focusing on restoring honor and technical excellence to ROH. He won the ROH World Tag Team and Television Championships, solidifying his legacy as one of the promotion’s key players during its later years.

Trent (Trent Beretta)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2017, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Dudebuster (Cradle Back-to-Belly Piledriver), Strong Zero (Double-Team Dudebuster with Rocky Romero), Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Trent competed in ROH as part of Roppongi Vice alongside Rocky Romero. The team delivered standout performances in the tag division during the NJPW-ROH partnership, known for their chemistry and entertaining matches against teams like The Young Bucks.

Trent Acid
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and brawling.
Signature moves: Acid Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Yakuza Kick, Moonsault.
Brief description: Trent Acid, best known as one-half of The Backseat Boyz alongside Johnny Kashmere, competed in ROH’s tag team division during its formative years. The Backseat Boyz were known for their charisma and high-octane offense, contributing to the early success of ROH’s tag team scene.

Trent Beretta
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2017, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Dudebuster (Cradle Back-to-Belly Piledriver), Strong Zero (Double-Team Dudebuster with Rocky Romero), Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Trent competed in ROH as part of Roppongi Vice with Rocky Romero. The team, featuring a blend of humor and athleticism, delivered standout performances against top tag teams, enhancing the NJPW-ROH partnership’s tag division.

Trish Adora
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based.
Signature moves: Lariat Tubman (Lariat), German Suplex, Cross Armbreaker.
Brief description: Trish Adora competed in ROH’s revamped Women of Honor division, participating in the ROH Women’s World Championship tournament. Known for her powerful strikes and technical skills, Adora quickly became a fan favorite and a key figure in the division’s growth.

Truth Martini
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2009-2016, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Manager and faction leader.
Wrestling style: Managerial interference and storytelling.
Signature moves: Managerial distractions, low blows, foreign object interference.
Brief description: Truth Martini was the charismatic and manipulative manager of The House of Truth, a dominant faction in ROH. Managing stars like Roderick Strong, Jay Lethal, and Michael Elgin, Martini played a pivotal role in their successes, including championship wins. His over-the-top personality and mic skills made him a standout character in ROH’s storylines.

TWA Students
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2004, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Developmental talent and lower card.
Wrestling style: Varied (technical, high-flying, and brawling).
Signature moves: Varied based on individual students.
Brief description: Students from the Texas Wrestling Academy, led by Rudy Boy Gonzales, regularly appeared in ROH during its early years. These young wrestlers gained valuable experience while contributing to the promotion’s growth. Graduates such as Bryan Danielson, Paul London, and Spanky became some of ROH’s top stars.

Twisted Sisterz (Thunder Rosa and Holidead)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2017-2018, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s tag team division.
Wrestling style: Striking and high-flying.
Signature moves: Faceplant Bomb, Double Dropkick, Spinebuster.
Brief description: The Twisted Sisterz competed in ROH’s Women of Honor division, bringing a unique mix of intensity and charisma to the tag team scene. Their chemistry and aggressive style made them a compelling duo during their appearances.

Tyler Black (later known as Seth Rollins in WWE)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007-2010, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main event and ROH World Champion.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: God’s Last Gift (Small Package Driver), Buckle Bomb, Phoenix Splash.
Brief description: Tyler Black was one of ROH’s top stars during his tenure, capturing the ROH World Championship in 2010. Known for his athleticism and adaptability, Black engaged in iconic rivalries with stars like Bryan Danielson, Nigel McGuinness, and Austin Aries, solidifying his legacy as a cornerstone of ROH’s success.

Tyson Dux
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2007, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Sharpshooter, Snap Suplex, German Suplex.
Brief description: Tyson Dux competed in ROH during its mid-2000s era, showcasing his technical skills and durability. Known for his crisp in-ring work, Dux contributed to the promotion’s reputation for high-quality wrestling.

Ultimo Guerrero
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2017, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre and technical.
Signature moves: Guerrero Special (Reverse Superplex), Lariat, Moonsault.
Brief description: Ultimo Guerrero appeared in ROH as part of its partnership with CMLL. Known as one of lucha libre’s most accomplished stars, Guerrero competed in multi-man and tag matches, bringing international prestige to ROH events.

Up In Smoke (Cheech and Cloudy)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007-2010, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and lower card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Partly Cloudy with a Chance of Cheech (Double Team Moonsault/Senton Combo), Assisted Tornado DDT, Double Dropkick.
Brief description: Up In Smoke was a fast-paced, high-flying tag team that competed in ROH’s tag division. While primarily an undercard team, their innovative offense and teamwork earned them recognition and respect from fans.

Veda Scott
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2011-2016, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division, manager, and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Bridging Northern Lights Suplex, Spinning Heel Kick, Guillotine Choke.
Brief description: Veda Scott was a multifaceted performer in ROH, excelling as both a wrestler and a manager. She managed stars like RD Evans and Moose, while also competing in the Women of Honor division. Scott’s charismatic promos and solid in-ring performances made her a key figure in ROH’s women’s roster during her tenure.


Villain Enterprises (Marty Scurll, PCO, Brody King, and Flip Gordon)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2018-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Varied (technical, brawling, and high-flying).
Signature moves: Marty Scurll’s Crossface Chickenwing, PCO’s PCO-Sault (Moonsault), Brody King’s Gonzo Bomb, Flip Gordon’s 450 Splash.
Brief description: Villain Enterprises was one of ROH’s most dominant factions, capturing the ROH World Six-Man Tag Team Championship and the ROH World Tag Team Championship. Led by Marty Scurll, the faction combined technical excellence, brute strength, and aerial agility to deliver some of the most exciting matches in ROH’s later years.

Vin Gerard
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2005-2009, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: STF, Tornado DDT, Back Suplex.
Brief description: Vin Gerard, previously known as masked wrestler Equinox in CHIKARA, transitioned to a darker persona in ROH. Competing as part of ROH’s mid-card, Gerard showcased his technical abilities and added depth to faction-based storylines during his tenure.

Vincent
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2013-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction leader, and ROH World Six-Man Tag Team Champion.
Wrestling style: Brawling and psychological.
Signature moves: Orange Sunshine (Diving Flatliner), Sliced Bread #2, Guillotine Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Vincent, formerly known as Vinny Marseglia, transformed into a cult leader and led The Righteous faction. His dark, enigmatic character and storytelling added intrigue to ROH’s programming. As a part of The Kingdom and later The Righteous, Vincent achieved success in both tag team and six-man tag team divisions.

Vinny Marseglia
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2015-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team and six-man tag team divisions.
Wrestling style: Brawling and striking.
Signature moves: Redrum (Swanton Bomb), Spinning Enzuigiri, Snap Suplex.
Brief description: Vinny Marseglia was a key member of The Kingdom alongside Matt Taven and TK O’Ryan. Together, they captured multiple ROH World Six-Man Tag Team Championships. Known for his unique, horror-inspired persona, Marseglia brought an eerie and captivating presence to ROH.

Vita VonStarr
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2020-2021, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Manager and occasional wrestler.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: Missile Dropkick, Enzuigiri, Guillotine Choke.
Brief description: Vita VonStarr was a member of The Righteous, serving as both a manager and occasional in-ring competitor. Her unique look and dark persona complemented the faction’s ominous presence in ROH, adding a distinct dynamic to their storytelling.

VLNCE UNLTD (Brody King, Homicide, Chris Dickinson, and Tony Deppen)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical.
Signature moves: King’s Gonzo Bomb, Homicide’s Cop Killa, Dickinson’s Pazuzu Bomb, Deppen’s Knee Trembler.
Brief description: VLNCE UNLTD debuted as a violent, anarchistic faction determined to dominate ROH’s roster. Their hard-hitting style and high-profile rivalries made them one of the key factions during ROH’s final pre-hiatus period in 2021.

Volador Jr.
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre.
Signature moves: Superkick, Canadian Destroyer, Moonsault.
Brief description: Volador Jr. represented CMLL in ROH as part of the NJPW-CMLL-ROH partnership. Known for his incredible agility and lucha libre flair, Volador Jr. participated in multi-man and tag team matches that showcased his dynamic offense and star power.

Vulture Squad (Jack Evans, Jigsaw, Ruckus, and Julius Smokes)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2007-2009, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and unorthodox.
Signature moves: Evans’ 630 Splash, Ruckus’ Razzle Dazzle (Handspring Elbow), Jigsaw’s Jig N’ Tonic (Sit-Out Rear Mat Slam).
Brief description: The Vulture Squad was a high-energy faction known for their unorthodox and aerial-heavy style. Their feuds with The Age of the Fall and The Briscoes brought excitement to ROH’s tag and faction-based storylines.

War Machine (Ray Rowe and Hanson, later known as The Viking Raiders)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2018, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and ROH World Tag Team Champions.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and striking.
Signature moves: Fallout (Diving Leg Drop/Back Suplex Combo), Double Powerbomb, Running Dropkick.
Brief description: War Machine was one of ROH’s most dominant tag teams, capturing the ROH World Tag Team Championships and engaging in memorable rivalries with teams like The Young Bucks and The Briscoes. Their blend of power and agility made them a standout team during their tenure.

Wheeler Yuta
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2020-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and Pure Division.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Seatbelt Clutch (Leg-Trap Roll-Up), Octopus Stretch, Top Rope Crossbody.
Brief description: Wheeler Yuta made a significant impact in ROH’s Pure Division, showcasing his technical prowess and resilience in high-stakes matches. Competing in the revitalized Pure Rules format, Yuta quickly became a standout talent in the division during his tenure.

Will Ferrara
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2013-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Tornado DDT, Suicide Dive, Bridging German Suplex.
Brief description: Will Ferrara was a versatile competitor in ROH, excelling in singles matches and the tag team division. As a part of the ROH Dojo staff, Ferrara also played a key role in mentoring younger talent while contributing to memorable matches across various divisions.

Will Ospreay
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2018, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: OsCutter (Springboard Cutter), Robinson Special (Corkscrew Roundhouse Kick), 630 Splash.
Brief description: Will Ospreay appeared in ROH as part of the NJPW partnership, delivering breathtaking performances in singles and multi-man matches. Known for his exceptional agility and innovative offense, Ospreay elevated every match he participated in and became one of the most exciting international stars in ROH history.

Willie Mack
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and high-flying.
Signature moves: Chocolate Thunder Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Samoan Drop, Standing Moonsault.
Brief description: Willie Mack competed in ROH as a special attraction, bringing his unique combination of size, power, and agility to the promotion. His high-energy performances earned him a strong reception from fans during his brief tenure.

Willow Nightingale
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2020-2021, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Women’s division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical.
Signature moves: Babe Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Moonsault, Pounce.
Brief description: Willow Nightingale was a rising star in ROH’s Women of Honor division, showcasing her charisma and powerful in-ring style. Known for her infectious energy and crowd connection, she competed in singles and multi-woman matches, leaving a lasting impression despite her limited appearances.

World Famous CB (formerly known as Cheeseburger)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2013-2021, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Lower card to mid-card and Pure Division.
Wrestling style: Technical and comedic.
Signature moves: Shotei Palm Strike, Tornado DDT, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: World Famous CB, previously known as Cheeseburger, was a beloved underdog in ROH, known for his lighthearted demeanor and surprising resilience. Competing in singles and tag team matches, he became a fan favorite and later transitioned into a more serious competitor in the Pure Division.

Wrestling's Greatest Tag Team (Shelton Benjamin and Charlie Haas)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2010-2013, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and ROH World Tag Team Champions.
Wrestling style: Technical and powerhouse.
Signature moves: Leapfrog Stun Gun, Superkick/Backdrop Combo, Wrestling Clinic (Double-Team Suplex Variations).
Brief description: Wrestling’s Greatest Tag Team dominated ROH’s tag team division, winning the ROH World Tag Team Championships twice. Known for their technical expertise and teamwork, Shelton Benjamin and Charlie Haas delivered memorable matches against The Briscoes, The Kings of Wrestling, and other top teams.

Xavier
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2002-2004, regular appearances; guest appearance in 2020.
Position on the card: Main event and ROH World Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: X-Breaker (Corkscrew Neckbreaker), 450 Splash, German Suplex.
Brief description: Xavier was the second-ever ROH World Champion, defeating Low Ki in 2002 to win the title. Known for his technical skills and intense matches, Xavier helped establish the credibility of ROH’s top championship. He made a one-off return in 2020, adding to his legacy in the promotion’s history.

YAMATO
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2008, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Striking and submission-based.
Signature moves: Gallaria (Modified Driver), Ankle Lock, Over-the-Shoulder Back-to-Belly Piledriver.
Brief description: YAMATO appeared in ROH as part of its partnership with Dragon Gate, delivering stellar performances in tag team and multi-man matches. His hard-hitting style and submission expertise made him a standout in some of ROH’s classic inter-promotional bouts.

YOH
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: 3K (Double-Team Jumping DDT with SHO), Dragon Suplex, Crossbody.
Brief description: YOH, alongside SHO as Roppongi 3K, competed in ROH as part of its partnership with NJPW. Known for their crisp teamwork and energetic style, they delivered standout matches in the tag team division and gained international acclaim.

YOSHI-HASHI
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2019, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Striking and submission-based.
Signature moves: Karma (Pumphandle Half-Nelson Driver), Butterfly Lock, Lariat.
Brief description: YOSHI-HASHI appeared in ROH as part of the NJPW partnership, participating in multi-man and tag team matches. Known for his relentless fighting spirit, YOSHI-HASHI added an element of toughness and skill to ROH’s international showcases.

Young Bucks (Matt and Nick Jackson)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2009-2019, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Tag team division and faction members (Bullet Club, The Elite).
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative.
Signature moves: Meltzer Driver (Springboard Tombstone with an Assisted Somersault), Superkick Party, More Bang for Your Buck (450 Splash/Moonsault Combo).
Brief description: The Young Bucks were one of ROH’s most iconic tag teams, capturing the ROH World Tag Team Championships multiple times. Known for their revolutionary offense and role in Bullet Club and The Elite, they played a pivotal role in elevating ROH’s popularity worldwide and contributed to some of the most exciting matches in the promotion’s history.

YRR (Young, Rich, and Ready for Action)
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2008, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Faction; mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Varied (technical, high-flying, and striking).
Signature moves: Varied based on faction members, including powerbombs, splashes, and suplexes.
Brief description: YRR was a faction that showcased a blend of charisma and athleticism. Representing Full Impact Pro (FIP), they competed in ROH as part of inter-promotional storylines, bringing an exciting dynamic to tag team and faction warfare.

Yuji Nagata
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2015, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Striking and submission-based.
Signature moves: Nagata Lock (Crossface Hold), Exploder Suplex, Backdrop Driver.
Brief description: Yuji Nagata appeared in ROH during the NJPW partnership, showcasing his legendary status and technical mastery. Known as one of NJPW’s most respected veterans, Nagata competed in memorable matches that emphasized hard-hitting and disciplined wrestling.

Yujiro Takahashi
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2014-2017, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and faction member (Bullet Club).
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: Miami Shine (Fisherman Buster), Pimp Juice (DDT), Lariat.
Brief description: Yujiro Takahashi represented Bullet Club during his appearances in ROH. Known for his cocky demeanor and physical style, Takahashi participated in faction-based matches and helped expand the Bullet Club’s influence within ROH’s programming.

Zach Gowen
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2006-2007, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and lower card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Moonsault, Enzuigiri, Springboard Crossbody.
Brief description: Zach Gowen, known for his inspirational story as a one-legged wrestler, made brief appearances in ROH. His matches demonstrated his determination and unique athleticism, earning him respect from fans and peers alike.


Zack Sabre Jr.
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2016-2018, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Zack Driver (Bridging Half-Nelson Suplex), Hurrah! Another Year (Double Armbar Stretch), Penalty Kick.
Brief description: Zack Sabre Jr. appeared in ROH during its collaboration with NJPW, showcasing his world-class technical wrestling. Known for his innovative submissions and mat-based mastery, Sabre competed in memorable matches that highlighted his skills against some of ROH’s top talent.

Zebra Kid
Time in Ring of Honor (ROH): 2003, sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card and special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking.
Signature moves: Diving Elbow Drop, Missile Dropkick, Snap Suplex.
Brief description: Zebra Kid, representing the UK wrestling scene, competed in early ROH events. Known for his intensity and dynamic offense, his performances brought international flair to the promotion’s formative years.
